I~I ~q~O~LE~ ~ UNIVERSITY
Indira Gandhi
National Open University
National Centre of Disabiliy Studies
MCFT-003
Counselling and Family Therapy:
Basic Concepts and
Theoretical Perspectives
•• • • ..",J
SCHOOLS OF FAMILY THERAPY 3
/
"Education is a liberati ng force.and in our
age it is also a democratizing force,
cutting across the barriers of caste and
class, smoothing out inequalites imposed
by birth and other circumstances."
- Indira Gandhi
"mltTT l1RCf Cfil ~~ ~ llCRf Cfl«ft ~ 3ih:
~ ~ ~1T "# en ~ ~?f qft mq.:rr ~
aTI'I:ffi ~ ~ I ~(fm 3R ~ -B ~
~ ~ cmlffi fC!bliidlaTI Cfil ~~ ~ ~
1l1"&fCfil ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ I"
- ~·llim
/
•
~
~Ignou J:l THE PEOPLE'S
UNIVERSITY
Indira Gandhi National Open University
National Centre for Disability Studies
MCFT-003
Counselling and Family
Therapy: Basic Concepts and
Theoretical Perspectives
Block
3
SCHOOLS OF FAMILY THERAPY
UNIT 9
Structural Family Therapy 7
UNIT 10
Solution Focused and Strategic Family Therapy 27
UNIT 11
Systemic Family Therapy 49
UNIT 12
Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy 85
UNIT 13
Integrated Approach to Family Therapy 103
I
EXPERT COMMITTEE 1Prof. V.N. Rajasekharan Pillai (Chairperson)
Vice Chancellor
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Reeta Sonawat
Dean & Head, Department of
Human Development, St\TDT
Women's University, Mumbai
Prof. Shagufa Kapadia
Head, Department of Human
Development and Family Studies
The M.S. University of Baroda
Vadodara .
Dr. Rajesh Sagar
Associate Professor,
Deptt. of Psychiatry, AIIMS &
Secretary, Central Mental Health
Authority of India, Delhi
Prof. Anisha Shah
Department of Mental Health and
Social Psychology, NIMHANS,
Bangalore
Prof. Minhotti Phukan
Head, Deptt. of HDFS
Assam Agricultural University
Assam
Dr. 'Jayanti Dutta
Associate Professor of HDCS,
Lady Irwin College, New Delhi
Prof. Vibha Joshi
Director, School of Education
lGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
(Programme Coordinator)
Professor of Child Development
School of Continuing Education
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Mathew Verghese
Head, Family Psychiatry Centre
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. Manju Mehta
Department of Psychiatry
AIIMS, New Delhi
Prof. Rajni Dhingra
Head, Department of Human
Development
Jammu University, Jammu
Prof. Sudha Chikkara
Department of Human
Development and Family Studies
CCS HA U, Hisar
Mrs. Vandana Thapar
Deputy Director (Child
Development), NIPCCD
New Delhi
Ms. Reena Nath
Practising Family Therapist
New Delhi
Prof. c.R.K. Murthy
STRIDE
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Girishwar Misra
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi, New Delhi
Prof. Abalya Raghuram
Department of Mental Health
and Social Psychology,
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. T.B. Singh
Head, Department of Clinical
Psychology, IHBAS, New Delhi
Prof. Aruna Broota
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi
New Delhi
Dr. Indu Kaura
Secretary, Indian Association for
Family Therapy, New Delhi
Dr. Rekha Sharma Sen
Associate Professor
(Child Development), SOCE
IGNOU, New Delhi
Mr. Sangmeshwar Rao
Producer, EMPC, IGNOU
New Delhi
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
(Convenor & Programme
Coordinator)
Research Officer, NCDS
IGNOU, New Delhi
Acknowledgment:
We acknowledge our thanks to Prof. Omprakash Mishra, Former PVC, IGNOU; Prof. C.G. Naidu, Former Director (l/c)
P&DD and Head, Nodal Unit; Or. Hemlata, Former Director (l/c) NCDS; and Dr. Arun Banik, Director, NCDS, for facilitating
the development of the programme of study.
PROGRAMME COORDINATORS - M.Se. (CFT) / PGDCFT
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
I
COURSE COORDINATORS
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
COURSE WRITERS
Units 9 & 12
Unit 11
Unit 13
Dr. Poomima Bhola, Assistant Professor, Dept. of Psychiatry,
St. John's Medical College Hospital, Bangalore
Dr. Bino Thomas, Junior Consultant, Dept. of Social Work, Christ
University, Bangalore
Ms Reena Nath, Practising Family Therapist, New Delhi
Prof. Methew Varghese, Professor of Psychiatry, Head & Consultant,
Family Psychiatry Centre, NIMHANS, Bangalore
Unit 10
Acknowledgement
Art work for Units 9 & 12 pave been provided by the author Dr. Poomima Bhola,
Assistant Professor, Dept. of Psychiatry, St. John's Medical College Hospital, Bangalore.
BLOCK EDITORS
Prof. Ahalya Raghuran
Department of Mental Health
and Social Psychology
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
(All Units)
March 2011
© Indira Gandhi National Open University, 2011
iSBN: - 978-81-266-5214-3
All rights reserved. No part of this work may be reproduced in any form, by mimeograph or
any other means, without permission in writing from the Indira Gandhi National Open University,
New Delhi.
Further information on Indira Gandhi National Open University courses may be obtained
from the University's office at Maidan Garhi, New Delhi- 110 068 or the official website of
IGNOU at www.ignou.ac.in.
Printed and published on behalf of Indira Gandhi National Open University by Registrar,
MPDD.
Laser Composed by: Rajshree Computers, V-166A, Bhagwati Vihar, (Near Sector-2, Dwarka),
Uttam Nagar, New Delhi-ll0059

BLOCK 3 SCHOOLS OF FAMILY
THERAPY
Introduction
/
Block 3 "Schools of Family Therapy" will acquaint you with the various
approaches to family therapy. The Block consists of five Units.
Unit 9 is on "Structural Family Therapy". The Unit deals with the primary
assumptions of structural family therapy. It also describes the key concepts
of struc~ural family therapy like family structure, subsystems, power and
alignments. Indications and contraindications for structural family therapy is
explained in this Unit. The main goals of structural family therapy are also
discussed. Techniques that are used in structural family therapy are discussed :
in detail, which include joining techniques, family mapping and structural diagnosis,
and restructuring techniques. The efficacy and effectiveness of structural family
therapy is discussed at the end of this Unit.
Unit 10 is on "Solution Focused and Strategic Family Therapy". Basically,
this Unit is divided into two parts, The first part deals with the solution focused
family therapy and the other part is concerned about strategic family therapy.
In the first part of this Unit, we will study the historical perspectives of solution
focused family therapy and its objectives and basic assumptions. Further, the
principles of solution focused family therapy are discussed. The significant
aspects of solution focused family therapy are the questions put to the client
asked to silent during sessions. These questions may be goal-defining, problemdefining, exception questions, existing resources questions, miracle questions,
scaling questions, advantage questions or coping questions. We will discuss
the importance of these questions in this Unit. Various techniques are used
in solution focused family therapy; we will study there in detail. Further, we
will learn the process of solution focused family therapy including the role of
family therapist in this therapy. The second part of the Unit deals with the strategic
family therapy. The strategic family therapy are defined in this part along with
its assumptions and main goals. The theoretical models in strategic family therapy
are also discussed. Further, you will learn about the techniques used in strategic
family therapy. At the end of this Unit you will study various stages of strategic
family therapy.
Unit Jl entitled "Systemic Family Therapy", will provide you an insight of
systemic approach to family therapy. The Unit begins with the introduction of
systemic family therapy which also includes the target group of systemic family
therapy and it redefines the term 'family'. Historical development of systemic
family therapy is also explained in detail in this Unit. Further, you will understand
the basic features of systemic family therapy and learn the concepts that help
to understand family communication process. The Unit also discusses the process
of change in systemic family therapy. The practice of systemic family therapy
may include several steps such as convening the family, mapping the family
through the genogram and the cultural genogram and identifying areas for
investigation. Aspects such as hypothesising, circularity, neutrality, interview
techniques and intervention have also been discussed in detail in this Unit. We
will learn about the therapist's role in systemic couple and family therapy. The
Unit will help you to identify the success and failure of systemic family therapy.
/
/
At the end of this Unit, you will become aware of various factors and contexts
that lead to success and failure of systemic family therapy.
Unit 12 is entitled "Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy". The Unit begins
with the introduction of cognitive behavioural family therapy which includes the
assumptions and key concepts of this form of family therapy. Further, the Unit
deals with the processes in cognitive behavioural therapy, that are, clinical
assessment, cognitive interventions and behavioural interventions. Cognitive
interventions include educating couple or family about the cognitive behavioural
model, identification and modification of automatic thoughts, identification of
distorted cognition and cognitive restructing techniques, where as behavioural
interventions include communication skills training, problem solving skills training
and behavioural change agreements. At the end of this Unit, you will learn
about the efficacy and effectiveness of cognitive behavioural family therapy.
Unit 13 is on "Integrated Approach to Family Therapy". The Unit deals
with the historical evolution of family therapy in India and historical evolution
of the integrated model. The Unit also acquaints you with the knowledge and
consideration of special sociocultural issues in family therapy and major constraint
factors in family therapy.
7
UNIT 9 STRUCTURAL FAMILY THERAPY
Structure
9.1 Introduction
9.2 What is Structural Family Therapy?
9.2.1 Assumptions of Structural Family Therapy
9.2.2 Key Concepts in Structural Family Therapy
9.3 Processes in Structural Family Therapy
9.3.1 Indications and Contraindications for Structural Family Therapy
9.3.2 Goals of Structural Family Therapy
9.4 Techniques in Structural Family Therapy
9.4.1 Joining Techniques
9.4.2 Family Mapping and the Structural Diagnosis
9.4.3 Restructuring Technique
9.S Efficacy and Effectiveness of Structural Family Therapy
9.6 Let Us Sum Up
9.7 Glossary
9..8 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
9.9 Unit End Questions
9.10 Further Readings and References
9.1 INTRODUCTION
Salvador Minuchin is the founder of structural family therapy (SFT), which has
been serving as a leading model in family therapy since its inception. Drawing
from the systemic model, structural family therapy emerged in the 1960s and
1970s as a new model. The general systems model developed by Karl Ludwig
von Bertalanffy, a Viennese biologist, looked at the world in terms of relationships
and integration between the parts of the system that constitute the whole. Boundaries
regulate the flow of information and energy required by a living system. Open
systems are in dynamic interactionwith the environment and maintain an equilibrium.
Families are seen asliving systems of interconnected and interdependent individuals,
none of whom can be understood in isolation. A change in one member of the
family has an impact on the others, which in turn influences the individual member.
The tendency of the family system to function in a predictable way, even if this
is maladaptive, is known as homeostasis. In all families there is an ongoing
dynamic tension between trying to maintain stability and introducing change.
These basic principles have contributed to the development of the structural family
therapy approach, which continues to be one of the most widely used models for
family therapy.
Schools of Family Therapy
8
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Define the primary assumptions and concepts of structural family therapy;
• Explain the goals of structural family therapy;
• Illustrate the indications and contraindications for structural family therapy;
• Elaborate on the therapeutic processes and techniques of structural family
therapy; and
• Summarise the research evidence on the effectiveness of structural family
therapy.
9.2 WHAT IS STRUCTURAL FAMILY
THERAPY?
Let us examine the basic assumptions and key concepts of structural family
therapy (SFf).
9.2.1 Assumptions of Structural Family Therapy
• Structural family therapy focuses upon the person within the family system,
rather than solely on the individual (Colapinto. 1982; Minuchin, 1974). The
structural family therapy approach moved away from the focus on individual
pathology in the traditional mental health model. It recognised that individual
symptoms and dysfunction are best understood in the context of family
interactional patterns.
• The underlying philosophy of the structural family therapy approach is that
"man is not an isolate" (Minuchin, 1974). The concept of interrelationships
of the whole system implied that the individual, while a separate being, is
also a part of the whole family. Thus, the influence of each person's behaviour
within the family cannot be separated from other family members' behaviours.
In other words, any behaviour is contingent on someone else's behaviour
(Colapinto, 1982). For example; a husband who complains that his wife
never listens to him also has a set of behaviours that reinforces his wife' not
•
listening.
• Structural family therapy focuses on the present rather than on the past. The
rationale behind this idea is that past dysfunctions are manifest in current
functioning; hence a change in current functioning could alter embedded
dysfunctional behaviour (Minuchin, 1974).
• Structuralfamily therapy attributesproblems to dysfunctional family structures.
The solutions and changes also arise from the changes of the family structure.
For example, a family may have a pattern in which the father and daughter
are extremely close and frequently side against the mother. In order to
change this pattern, the father and mother must make changes in their
interpersonal transactions in order to re-establish their roles as a parental
subsystem.Minuchin and Nichols (1993) described the family as being naturally
inclined to continue with familiar patterns of interacting even though
developmental changes have made these patterns less functional. The therapist
must undermine this homeostasis, introduce crisis and instability and move
the system towards better functioning.
• Structuralfamily therapy assumesthatfamily dysfunctionarisesout of difficulties
in adapting to the changing demands of various developmental stages.Minuchin
and Fishman (1981) identifed four main developmental stages: The first stage
is couple formation where the two individuals form a new system and
establish new roles and rules. The stage of families with young children
entails a rearrangement of family relationships and developing specificfunctions
for each spouse. The third stage offamilies with school-age or adolescent
children is characterised by a need for the family to relate to other systems.
The last stage of families with grown children is when children leave the
nest (house), the family re-negotiates its roles, members learn to relate to
each other as adults and the parents become a couple again.
• Structural family therapy also recognises the strengths and inner resources of
-the family to participate in the change process with the therapist's assistance.
This approach also assumes that families generally act with good intentions
and therefore, allocation of blame is unnecessary (Powell & Dosser, 1992).
• Structural family therapy is an approach with an active therapist role where
families are directed and challenged to realign structural relationships and
learn more effective conflict resolution.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Choose the correct answer
i) In family therapy, the therapist must attend to all of the following except:
a. Each member of the family as an isolated individual.
b. Each member of the family in interaction with other family members.
c. Subgroups within the family in interaction with each other.
d. The family as a whole.
ii) Structural family therapy originated in the work of :
a. Bowen.
b. Satir.
c. Haley.
d. Minuchin.
iii) Structural family therapy is most concerned with:
a. Improving family members' insight.
b. Rigid boundaries.
c. Identifying and changing the underlying organisation of the family.
d. Permanent, long-term change.
Structural Family
Therapy
9
Schools of Family Therapy
10
------------------------~ iv) The role of the structural family therapist is: - -I a. Involved, active and directive.
b. As a neutral observer.
c. Focus on the symptomatic family member.
d. Identify dysfunctional cognitions.
9.2.2 Key Concepts in Structural Family Therapy
Structural family therapy utilises many concepts to organise and understand the
family.Of particular importance are structure,subsystems, boundaries, enmeshment,
disengagement, alignment and coalition. Each of these concepts will be explored
in the following section.
1. Family structure: As defined by Minuchin (1974), "family structure is the
invisible set of functional demands that organisesthe ways in which family members
interact. A family is a system that operates through transactional patterns. Repeated
transactions establish patterns of how, when, and with whom to relate, and these
patterns underpin the system".
Colapinto (1988) found that the family structure is governed by two principles.
Firstly,families have a hierarchical structure in which parents have greater authority
than children. Functional farnilies are believed to have a clear hierarchy with
"consistent rules about who is in charge of what" (Nelson & Utesch, 1990).
Secondly, every family is unique and each of its members develops ways of
interacting with each other that are distinctive. All families contend with stress but
those with a clear and organised structure will recover quicker and function better
in the long term than those families that have dysfunctional structures.
2. Subsystems: Subsystems are the smaller units of the family system, for
example, the spousal subsystem, parental subsystem, sibling subsystem and
extended family subsystem. It is important that each of these subsystems is
differentiated from each other so that all members feel both belonging and
separateness which promotes a healthy environment for living. Relationships
between subsystems are governed by spoken and unspoken rules.
The spousal subsystem works best when the spouses negotiate their roles and
accept their interdependency. One of their most important tasks is to develop a
boundary around their subsystem. Children learn about intimate relationships from
the transactions in this subsystem.
As the couple has children, the parental subsystem is formed. In some families,
the parental subsystem may consist of extended family or single parents. Adults
are responsible for meeting the child's needs but also have rights in this position
of authority. As children grow, the parental subsystem must change and grow as
well.
The sibling subsystem contains family members who are of the same generation
and forms the child's first peer group. Here children learn how to get along, how
to negotiate and how to deal with conflict. The parental subsystem should allow
the sibling subsystem to function without too much interference.
I
3. Boundaries: Boundaries are the invisible barriers that govern the contact
that subsystems have with other subsystems and are necessary for a healthy family
structure (Minuchin & Fishrnan. 1981).A functional organisation within the family
must have appropriate boundaries between subsystems that are, the parental, the
siblings, the family unit as a whole, andthe individual. For example, the boundary
that separates the nuclear family from the extended family or the boundary between
parents and children in the family. In order to function well, boundaries must be
clear and not too rigid. For instance, the spousal subsystem should be clear in that
children and other members of the family not interfere when a husband and wife
are focused on marital relations. Importantly, boundaries must go through
developmentally appropriate changes as the family progresses through the family
life cycle. For example, a father may intervene when his young children are
fighting but would expect them to work out their differences when they became
adults.
Structural Family
Therapy
Clear boundaries allow for family members to feel connected while maintaining
their individuality and autonomy. They can freely exchange information and give
and receive corrective feedback. Sometimes families have boundaries that are too
rigid or too diffuse.
Enmeshment: Families with boundaries that are diffuse are described as enmeshed.
This is a state in which the boundaries are too permeable and thus autonomy is
reduced in order to maintain the greater sense of belonging to the family system
(Minuchin. 1974). Dependence is encouraged and family members tend to stay
close to home, expecting to have all of their needs met by the family (Gladding,
1998a). These members are hesitant to form close relationships outside of the
family. This system lacks the necessary resources to change under stressful
conditions and is sensitive to even minor events within the family.
Disengagement: Disengagement occurs when families have boundaries that are
overly rigid (Minuchin, 1974).Inflexible boundaries serve to keep people separated
from each other. Members have significant independence but little interdependence
exists within the family system and there is little communication between the
subsystems (Minuchin, 1974). As a result, family members have inadequate
relatedness with each other and become disconnected from other family members.
Often, individual problems may not be perceived until very severe. The figure (Fig
9.1) below represents the enmeshed and disengaged families.
ENMESHED FAMILY DISENGAGED FAMILY
3. Power: The concept of power refers to the level of influence that each family
member has on the outcome of an activity. It is theability to get something done.
11
Parents Children Parents Children
Figure 9.1: Enmeshed and disengaged families
Schools of Family Therapy
12
The hierarchy of power in the family structure defines who makes the decisions
in the family and also who controls the behaviours of family members. Power is
generated by the way in which family members react. For example, a father's
power may depend on the response from his wife and children, either reinforcing
.or negating his power.
The inversion of power hierarchies; for example 'father-as-homemaker and motheras-breadwinner' in traditional cultures, children holding more power than the
parents or mother and child functioning as the parental unit; can be extremely
disabling.
4. Alignment:An alignment can include the joining of two people for a common
interest (frequently called an alliance). Alliances within the family structure can be
!l healthy and positive influence on the system. For example, the father and
children may share their love of sports and spend time together engaged in
activities. However, alignments can also be pathological when they include the
joining of two people actively excluding a third person.
5. Coalition:A coalition is an alignment between two people in a system which
excludes a third person. There is a rigid boundary around the coalition. Minuchin's
concept of triangulation describes arrangements of two family members pitted
against a third. For example, where the parents disagree and they ask the child,
"Is mother right or is father right?". Detouring and cross-generational coalitions
are two types of triangulation described by Minuchin.
Conflict-detouring: There are two types of detouring triads. In the detouringattacking the parents are unable to resolve problems between them and they
identify the child as the problematic member of the family. They band together and
focus negativity on the child. This serves to distract from the tension in the marital
dyad and also reinforcesmaladaptivebehaviour in the child.This type of triangulation
also is sometimes referred to as scapegoating as the child's well-being is sacrificed
in order that the marital conflict might be avoided (Minuchin 1974). In the
detouring-supportive triad, the parents are able to mask their differences by
providing enormous, overprotective concern towards a child who is defined as
"sick".
Cross-generational coalition is defined as an "inappropriate family alliance that
contains members of two different generations". For example, a cross-generational
•
coalition could develop when one of the parents responds to the child's needs
with excessive concern and devotion while the other parent withdraws and becomes
less responsive. Husband and wife are unable to resolve their conflicts, so they
continue to argue through the children. Both husband and wife are critical of each
other's ways, but both perpetuate the other's behaviour with his or her own. For
example, father says mother is too permissive; mother says he's too strict. He
withdraws, she criticises; he withdraws further. An enmeshed relationship is
perpetuated between mother and child, while father disengages, not responding
even when a response is necessary.
Research indicates associations between cross-generational coalitions and the
presence of psychosomatic illness (Minuchin, Rosman, and Baker 1978) and
marital distress (Kerig 1995).
The table below depicts the symbols used to depict the structural relationships
within the family system (see Table 9.1).
I
Table 9.1: Symbols depicting structural relationships in the family svstcrn Structural I'alllih
IhCrllJi\'
,
i Symbol Description
~---'---------- ~ J
---1 1-
l
J
Open or clear boundary
Closed or rigid boundary
Diffuse boundary
Clear alliance
Over involved atTiliation
Con 11 ictcd affiliation
Mother
~
Father
Dauec-htcr Son
l
Daughter
D
Detouring eont1ict through a third family member. For
example, lather and mother detouring cont1ict between
themselves by detouring conflict onto their ~hild
Father Mother
ii) Families that have diffuse boundaries are called larnilics.
Check Your Progress Exercise '2
Note: <I) Read the following questions carefully and aI1Sv\Crin the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end ofthis
l'nit.
1. lil] in the blanks:
i) The way coalitions mask tensions by focusing on a third pan)' as the
problematic family member is called
iii) An inappropriate family alliance that contains members ()!I\\O
di Hcrcnt ~enerill iOI}Sis called a
rv) In disengaged families. the bo undurics are round to be
\) The subsystem including the children in the family is called the
subsystem.
\1) The symbol=: indicates an affiliation that is
I
~
.1

Schools of Family Thcrapv
14
19.3 PROCESSES IN STRUCTURAL FAMILY
THERAPY
In this section, we will study the important indications and contraindications for
structural family therapy. The primary therapeutic goals are outlined and followed
by the description of therapeutic techniques and processes.
9.3.1 Indications and Contraindications for Structural
Family Therapy
There are a number of factors that guide the selection of patients for structural
family therapy. Most of the indications and contraindications are common across
v : many forms of family intervention. The indications for structural family therapy
include:
1. The clinical problem manifests in explicitly family terms, that is, family
dysfunction. For example, a marital conflict dominates; or tension between
parents and an adolescent child dislocates family life with everyone getting
involved in the conflict. Here family therapy is the treatment of choice.
2. The family has experienced a major stressful or disruptive life event, which
has led or is leading to dysfunction. These events are either predictable or
accidental and include, for instance, accidental or suicidal death, diagnosis of
a serious physical illness, or the unexpected departure of a child from the
home. As such, the ensuing disequilibrium becomes associated with family
dysfunction and/or the development of symptoms in one or more members.
3. Continuing demanding circumstances in a family are of such a magnitude as
to lead to poor or inappropriate adjustment. The family's resources may be
inadequate and external sources of support may be scanty or unavailable.
Typical situations are chronic physical illness or a persistent or recurrent
psychiatric illness.
4. An identified patient may have become symptomatic in the context of a
poorly functioning family. Symptoms are an expression of that dysfunction.
For example, depression in a mother, an eating problem in a daughter and
alcohol use in a father may be judged to reflect underlying family difficulties.
•
5. A family member is diagnosed as having a psychiatric illness such as
schizophrenia or depression. The complicating factors are the adverse effects
in the family stemming from that diagnosis. For example, the son with
schizophrenia taxes his parents in ways that exceed their problem-solving
capacity; a recurrently depressed mother comes to rely solely on the support
of her eldest daughter. In these circumstances, family members might begin
to respond maladaptively towards the diagnosed relative, which paves the
way for deterioration of his or her condition.
Following are the contraindications for structural family thL"!ClPY :
1. Family members are unavailable because of geographical location or death.
2. There is no shared motivation for participation and change among family
members.
3. The level of family disturbance is so severe or long-standing, or both, that
a family approach seems futile. For example, a family that has fought bitterly
I
for years is unlikely to engage in the constructive purpose of exploring their
patterns of functioning.
4. Family equilibrium is so precarious that the inevitable turbulence arising from
family therapy is likely to lead to decompensation of one or more members.
5. The patient or family member is too incapacitated to withstand the demands
of family therapy. For example, a person in the midst of a psychotic episode
may be too affected by the illness to engage in family work.
Structural Family
Therapy
9.3.2 Goals of Structural Family Therapy
The goals of structural family therapy cover a wide spectrum in order to bring
about positive changes in the family's level of functioning. The primary objective
is to help families change their structure and organizational makeup.
Friesen (1995) outlined five main goals of structural family therapy. These are as
follows:
(1) Creating an effective hierarchical structure in the family,
(2) Helping parents to complement each other in their roles as parents in order
to be an effective parental subsystem,
(3) Aiding the children to become a subsystem of peers,
(4) Increasing the frequency of interactions and nurturance, if the family is
disengaged, and
(5) The differentiation of family members, if the family is enmeshed.
Since, the dysfunction in families reflects the organisational arrangement of the
system, the structural family therapist also focuses on adjusting coalitions and
alliances and promoting the acquisition and learning of new coping mechanisms,
to alleviate maladaptive functioning. These changes are accomplished by making
modifications to the current familial rules and developing healthier boundaries
between each of the family's subsystems. The structural changes should result in
the reduction of the initial "symptoms" that brought the family in for intervention.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer.in, the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit
ii) Very severe and chronic family disturbance. TrueIFalse
iii) Lack of motivation for participation and change. TrueIFalse
iv) Prior exposure to other therapeutic modalities. TrueIFalse
15
1. Mark 'True' or 'False':
The following characteristics are considered as relative contraindications for
structural family therapy;
i) History of psychiatric diagnosis in more than one family member.
TrueIFalse
v) Precarious family equilibrium and vulnerability for decompensation of
___ individual family members~TrueIFalse _
:-'dlOols of '·amil.' Thcnl(J\
16
2. Describe the main goals of structural family therapy.
9.4 TECHNIQUES IN STRUCTURAL FAMILY
THERAPY
Structural family therapists have developed and adapted a variety of therapeutic
techniques. They can be classified into following categories:
1. Techniques that are primarily used in the formation of the therapeutic system,
2. Family mapping and making a structural diagnosis, and
3. Techniques that are directly aimed at provoking disequilibrium and charige.
9.4.1 Joining Techniques
Joining is one of the main tenets of structural family therapy and a prerequisite to
restructuring. The therapist must first form an empathetic collaborative relationship
with the family to create a 'therapeutic system'. Part of the joining process
requires the therapist to reflect back an understanding of the family's problems
and highlight the strengths in the family Although the joining process is more
evident during the initial phase of therapy,the maintenance of a working relationship
with the family is important throughout the therapeutic process. Contrary to a
rather common misunderstanding, joining is not just the process of being accepted
by the family; it is being accepted as a therapist, with the authority to advocate
changes.
Accommodation specifically refers to the adjustment process that each therapist
undergoes when integratingherself or himselfinto the family structure. The therapist
must be nonjudgemental and accommodate by adopting the family's organisation
and communication style. However, the therapist must maintain some distance and
not be enveloped by family rules.
There are three main phases of the joining process in family therapy; these are
given below:
1. Maintenance,
2. Tracking, and
3. Mimesis.
1. Maintenance: The therapist lets himself be organised by the basic rules that
regulate the transactional process in the specific family system. The therapist
needs to analyse and accurately perceive the family structure or the
characteristics of its individual members. For example, if a three-generation
family has a rigid hierarchical structure, the therapist may find it advisable to
approach the grandfather first and then'to proceed downward. The therapist
may stand a better chance to generate a therapeutic impact by respecting the
rules of the family system. However, the therapist needs to use this technique
I
to point out the strengths and potential of family members while also retaining
the power to challenge the system.
2. Tracking: While maintenance concentrates on process of interactions in the
sessions, tracking consists ofan accommodation of the therapist to the content
of speech. In tracking, the therapist closely follows the subjects offered by
family members. In tracking the content of the therapy session, the therapist
clarifies and amplifies the verbal messages of the individual members to show
approval and reinforce positive communication patterns in the family structure.
A structural family therapist may use such statements as "urn-hum" to show
interest and promote the continuation of the interaction (Minuchin, 2003).
3. Mimesis: At times the therapist will find it necessary to establish a closer
relation with a certain member. This may be done through verbal interventions
or through mimesis, that is a nonverbal respense where the therapist adopts
the other person's mood, tone of voice or posture, or imitates her or his
behaviour. For example, crosses her or his legs. In a jovial family, the therapist
may adopt a jovial and expansive manner or slow her or his pace in tune
with the family's communication style.
The act of joining helps the therapist fit into the family system but is also an
act of diagnosis. The therapist develops the family map and makes a tentative
structural diagnosis in the initial sessions.
Structural Family
Therapy
9.4.2 Family Mapping and the Structural Diagnosis
Family mapping is a vital and necessary tool as it gives therapists a broad picture
of the dynamics and structure of each family that they are treating and formulate
proposed structural changes and intervention plan. These maps are evaluated
using two fundamental concepts; these are, family shape and family development.
Family shape deals with the demographic makeup of the family (that is, twoparent, single-parent, extended family) whereas family development refers to the
fact that each family has its own distinct cultural environment with standards for
acceptable behaviours. The therapist must join the family and then disengage to
take an observer role in order to diagram the most accurate map of the family
structure (Minuchin, 2003).
For example, in Fig 9.2, the family map depicts a closed family unit boundary with
an over involved mother and son making up the parental subsystem. There is a
rigid boundary between them and the daughter. However, all members of the
family are in a coalition against the father.
Mother == Son
Daughter
-------\.. Father
Figure 9.2: An example of a family map
17
Schools llr Falllih Thcrap-,
18
The structural diagnosis is an important therapeutic task in the initial phase of
therapy. This includes the therapist's reflections on a) the alliances, coalitions and
splits among family members; b) hierarchical distribution of power; c) boundary
problems; and d) the critical interactional sequences within the family. Thus, the
structural diagnosis is a hypothesis about the systemic interaction between the
family context and the symptomatic behaviours of the individual members. It,
illustrates the purpose that the symptomatic behaviour serves within the family
system. For example, in a family, the child's anxiety symptoms, refusal to go to
school and clinging to mother make him the identified patient. The structural
reformulation may suggest that these symptoms serve to deflect from the marital
difficulties and provide an opportunity for the couple to demonstrate that they are
united as parents.
This reformulation of the presenting problem from a focus on the individual to the
family system is a tentative hypothesis that is tested in subsequent sessions. The
structural diagnosis is translated back,to family members in an acceptable way so
that they can participate in the therapeutic process. This also enables the therapist
to plan the structural changes required, and who in the family needs to be involved
at the different stages of the intervention.
9.4.3 Restructuring Techniques
The second, larger group of techniques encompasses all interventions 'aimed at
changing the system. Some of them, like enactment and boundary-making, are
primarily employed in the creation of a different sequence of events, while others
like reframing, punctuation and unbalancing tend to foster a different perception
of reality.
Let us discuss some of the restructuring techniques in detaiL These are as follows:
a) Reframing: Reframing is putting the presenting problem in a perspective
that is both different from what the family brings and more workable. Typically
this involves changing the definition of the original complaint, from a problem of
one person to a problem of the entire family within a structural perspective. For
example, the problems of an "uncontrollable" child might be reframed in terms of
the patterns of transactions between an ineffective mother, an undisciplined child,
and an authoritarian father.
•
Reframing through complementarity involves the presentation of an individual's
behaviour as contingent on somebody else's behaviour. In the earlier example, the
child's uncontrollability could be related to the mother's ineffectiveness which is
maintained by father's taking over; which, on the other hand, is triggered by
mother's ineffectiveness in controlling the child. Thus, all family members can be
described as mutually contributing to each other's difficulties.
Once the problem is reframed in terms of complementarity, all family members
can participate in changing transactions within the family system.
2. Enactment: Enactment refers to the way in which the family therapist
"constructs an interpersonal scenario in the session in which dysfunctional
transactions among family members are played out" (Minuchin & Fishman, 1981).
This can occur spontaneously or be contrived by the therapist. The rationale for
using an enactment is that by making changes in the transactions between family
members in the therapy session, changes will occur in their transactions outside
the session.

One of the common enactments in Minuchin's work with anorexics was to join
the family for a meal and observe the family's typical way of functioning. Nichols
and Minuchin (1999) states that the way to begin an enactment is to have one
family member respond to something that another family member has said.
Enactments in the first few sessions are best used for assessment and should have
very little interference by the therapist. Enactments can illustrate many things about
the family's structure. For example, can the adults discuss an issue without bringing
the children into the argument? Can two family members talk without being
interrupted? Enactments allow the therapist to observe what roles each family
member performs and demonstrate enmeshment or disengagement.
Structural Family
Therapy
In the later stages of therapy the therapist might prescribe enactments, directing
family members to behave differently in relation to each other. In this way, the
therapist intervenes in the rules that regulate who should interact with whom,
about what, when and for how long. For example, the therapist may say to a
father who tends to talk to his son through his wife, "Talk to your son about your
concerns, I don't know if he understands what you feel". Thus the therapist
keeps the mother out of the transaction. This simple enactment can provide the
family with a different experience of reality.
3. Boundarymaking:Boundary making aims at helping the family define, or
change the boundaries within the family. It is a special case of enactment, in which
the therapist defines which interactions are open to some members of the family
but closed to others (Colapinto, 1982). It is a restructuring manoeuvre because
it changes the rules by which family functions. With physical boundary making, the
therapistmay rearrange seating or use hand gesturesto silenceother family members.
• Verbal boundary making includes giving specific instructions to the family and
.givingverbal reminders to prohibit interruptions (Minuchin & Fishman, 1981). For
example, if a therapist wants to block a son from making decisions that should
be made by his father, this could be done verbally, by stating "I see you like
making decisions for your father, what about if you let him make this one?" or
physically by asking the son to sit in a chair on the other side of the room, away
from his parents or through a combination of both. Another form of delineating
boundaries and fostering individuation would be by seeing certain subsystems or
individuals for separate sessions. The one-way mirror may be used where the ,
therapist separates an enmeshed or unproductive family member to point out
transactions happening within the family.
4. Punctuation: Punctuation is the selective description of a transaction in
accordance with the therapist's goals. A variety of pi ctuation is intensity, a
technique that consists of emphasisng the importance of a given event in the
session. Usually, the therapist magnifies something that the family ignores or takes
for granted, as another way of challenging the reality of the system. Intensity is
achieved sometimes through repetition, for example, repeatedly asking a family
member who had decided to move out of her or his parents' home and did not
do so: "Why didn't you move?". Other times the therapist creates intensity through
emotionally charged interventions or confrontation like "What your father did just
now is very disrespectful". Importantly, structural family therapist needs to monitor
the intensity of the therapeutic process, so that the level of stress imposed on the
system does not become either unbearable or too comfortable.
5. Unbalancing: Unbalancing is a technique in which the therapist supports
an individual or subsystem against the rest of the family. This should be viewed
19
Scholll, of Familx Therapy
20
as a challenge to the system rather than an attack on any member. For example, 1a therapist may sit next to a daughter who is being accused of not living up to
the family's tradition. When this technique is used to support the underdog in the
. family system, a chance for change within the total hierarchical relationship is
fostered. Therefore, if the therapist must enter into a coalition with certain members
against others, the family must always understand that thistemporary alignment is
for the best of the entire familial system (Minuchin, 2003).
6. Taskassignments: The structural family therapist may also allocate tasks
to be completed by individual members or whole subsystems. Structural therapists
use tasks to explore or highlight a particular area of the family's functioning. The
main function of these tasks may be, for example, to promote proximity between
particular members or to help parentsIearneffective parenting skills related to
. disciplining their children. The therapist can allot tasks in imagination, for example,
"Just imagine shifting your chair to sit next to your mother"; propose action in the
session, 'Please say that clearly to your wife right now."; or as a homework task,
''Today you let your husband take your child out in the evening for an hour". The
therapist needs to highlight and reinforce positive behaviours.
7. Support, education and guidance: Finally, one of the most important
interventions that a structural therapist can give a family is support, education and
guidance to help them with their particular problem. This part of the intervention
process is similar to joining and has also aims at enabling the family to offer
support, nurturance and healing to each of its members (Minuchin, 2003).
Therapist's role is to provide encouragement to each member of the system with
regard to what aspects of treatment are going well for them (Vetere, 2001).
Since, the symptoms of the identified patient is the primary reason for the family's
seeking therapy, the structural therapist utilises the symptoms as a way to diagnose
and change the family's maladaptive transactional patterns. The role that the
identified patient's symptoms play in the overall interaction process is challenged
by re-labelling, de-emphasising, as well as encouraging the progress of the identified
patient. The interventions should result in a stage when retaining the symptom is
no longer functional to the family system.
The techniques and the degree of therapist participation and involvement vary
,
according to the unique needs of each family. Restructuring interventions should
result in changes at the level of individuals, subsystems and the overall family
system.
When doing structural family therapy it is especially important to recognise the
fact that too much change can lead to prematurely ending therapy by the individual
members. On the other hand, not enough movement in the family's structure can
causeindividuals to maintain the same maladaptive patterns that were originally
the presenting problem in therapy (Vetere, 2001).
According to Salvador Minuchin, change during the therapeutic process occurs
for three main reasons: a) the perception of the client's reality is challenged, b)
alternative ways for acting within the family unit are presented and c) new
relationships provide self-reinforcement to them once they have utilized alternative
transactional patterns (Minuchin, 2003).

Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Match the following:
i) Adoption of the family members' mood, tone of
voice, posture and behaviour by the therapist.
a) Tracking
ii) The therapist's perception and adaptation to the
family's hierarchical structure.
iii) The therapist's close attention to the content of
communication within the family system.
b) Maintenance
c) Mimesis
2. Draw a family map depicting a family system with over involvement between
mother and child, conflict between the parents and inadequate
communication and relatedness between father and child .
................................................................................................................
................................................................................................................
3. Choose the correct answer:
i) According to Minuchin, when the therapist deliberately supports one
family member against the rest of the family, the technique used is
called:
a) validation.
b) unbalancing.
c) jommg.
d) enacting.
ii) A family is seeing a structural family therapist because there are huge
arguments at home every time the topic of the daughter's career
choices comes up. The therapist tells the family, "I want you to act
out exactly what happens when this topic is raised by your daughter."
The structural family technique being used is:
a) introjection.
b) restructuring.
c) joirung.
d) enacting.
iii) The structural family therapist might try to alter boundaries by:
a) Focusing on the symptomatic family member.
b) altering dysfunctional cognitions.
Structural Family
Therapy
21
Schools of Family Therapy
22
------------------------=-~
c) changing the seating arrangement during sessions. I ~d) drawing a three-generation genogram.
iv) Which of the following techniquesis not used in structuralfamily therapy.
a) Refrarning.
b) enactments.
c) asking the 'miracle question'.
d) unbalancing.
9.5 EFFICACY AND EFFECTIVENESS OF
STRUCTURAL FAMILY THERAPY
Structural family therapy has been applied to many different populations. Although
a large part of the research is based on case studies, there is increasing evidence
about its effectiveness as a form of psychological treatment.
Initial evaluations by Minuchin and his collaborators demonstrated the effectiveness
of structural family therapy in cases of labile diabetes, anorexia nervosa and
intractable asthma (Rosman, Minuchin, Liebman & Baker, 1978).
Stanton and Todd (1 979) reported the effectiveness of structural family therapy
in the treatment of drug addicts and their families. Specifically, these researchers
found that post-treatment addict families displayed better boundaries between
subsystems. In another study, Szapocznik and colleagues (1989) found that
structuralfamily therapy was superior to psychodynamic child therapy in improving
family functioning.Both treatment conditions were essentially equivalent in reducing
behavioural and emotional problems in boys with problem behaviour. Research
indicates the usefulness of this approach with families of drug-abusing adolescents
(Stanton & Shadish, 1997).
Many studies in this area have been done with children and adolescents and there
is a paucity of research on adults and on applications in psychosomatic and
medical disorders. The structural family therapy model appears to be an effective
model for a variety of client issues. However, further systematic research is required
to support the experiences of therapists working in the field.
Structural family therapy has faced criticism due to its primary focus on the family
group that may ignore the influences of extended family, neighbourhood, schools
and other social institutions. There is concern that this approach might reinforce
traditional gender roles and may not adequately address the unequal power between
couples due to gender differences. Critics point out that Minuchin expects women
to fulfill expressive roles and men to fulfil executive roles, with the optimal family
hierarchy of a two parent system with the male holding the position of power and
authority (Gladding, 1988; McGoldrick, 1989).The structural focus on the present
in the description and alleviation of problems, may limit the ability to explain and
predict symptomatic behaviour. The structural view that the symptom serves a
purpose within the family system has been challenged. Current clinical practice
must understand and address the needs of the range of contemporary family
structures; for example, single-parent families or couples who are not legally
married. It is also important to define concepts like "enmeshment" differently in
Western and Eastern cultures like India.

Structuralfamily therapy offers therapists a model that is active and clearly defined,
transforming an abstract concept like 'family' into concrete concepts like boundary
and hierarchy. This teachable model retains a focus on the strengths of families
and has had an undeniable impact on the field of family therapy.
Structural Family
Therapy
9.6 LET US SUM UP
In this Unit, we have leamt about structuralfamily therapy approaches in therapeutic
intervention. The unit focused on:
• Outlining the basic assumptions of structural family therapy,
• Learning about the key concepts in structural family therapy,
• Delineating the primary goals of structural family therapy,
• Listing the indications and contraindications for structural family therapy,
• Describing the therapeutic processes and techniques in structural family
therapy, and
• Summarising the research evidence on the effectiveness of structural family
therapy and critically evaluating its strengths and limitations.
9.7 GLOSSARY
Boundaries Invisible lines of demarcation in a family which
may be defined, strengthened, loosened or changed
as a result of structural family therapy. Boundaries
range from enmeshed (extreme togetherness) to
disengaged (extreme separateness). Ideally,
boundaries are clear.
Coalition A (usually) covert alliance between two family
members against a third. For example, when one
parent joins a child in a rigidly bounded crossgenerational coalition against the other parent, this
is called a stable coalition.
Detouring
Enmeshed family
A process by which stresses between a couple
get redirected to the child so that the spouse
subsystem gives the impression of harmony.
An extreme pattern of family organisation in which
members are so separate or psychologically
isolated that they seem oblivious of the effects of
their actions on each other. Boundaries among
family members are typically impermeable.
An extreme pattern of family organisation in which
members are so tightly locked that autonomy is
impossible. Boundaries among family members are
typically diffuse.
Disengaged family
Family mapping The diagrammatic representation of family's
organisational structure, boundaries and patterns
of interaction.
23
Generational
Boundaries
Invisible lines of demarcation between generations.
Healthy generational boundaries allow parents to
maintain parental roles and children to maintain {
child roles.
,
Hierarchy A boundary that demarcates the leader of an
organisation from others. In a family, the parents
are usually higher up in the hierarchy when
compared to the children, meaning that they have
a greater say in decisions regarding how the
children should behave.
Joining The therapist's efforts to be accepting and
accommodating to families to win their confidence
and circumvent resistance.
Parental child An overly responsible child who has power and
authority that more appropriately belongs to the
parents.
Reframing Relabeling a family's description of behaviour with
more positive connotations to make it more
amenable to therapeutic change. For example,
describing some one as "discouraged" rather than
"depressed" .
Subsystems Units within a family based on characteristics such
as age, gender, or function.
A process in which two family members demand
that a third (usually a child) side with each against
the other.
Triangulation
9.8' ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. i) a , ii) d , iii) c , iv) a
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. i) conflict-detouring
ii) enmeshed
iii) cross-generational coalition
iv) rigid
v) sibling
vi) over involved
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. i) False
24 ii) True
iii) True
iv) False
v) True
Structural Family
Therapy
2. The main goals of structural family therapy are described as follows:
i) Creating an effective hierarchical structure in the family,
ii) Restructuring an effective parental subsystem,
iii) Effective functioning of the sibling subsystem as peers,
iv) Increasing the frequency of interactions and nurturance, if the family is
disengaged, and
v) The differentiation of family members, if the family is enmeshed.
Check your Progress Exercise 4
1. i) c)
ii) b)
iii) a)
2. Following family map depicts a family system with over involvement between
mother and child, conflict between the parents and inadequate communication
and relatedness between father and child:
Child
3. i) . b)
ii) d)
iii) c)
iv) c)
9.9 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. Discuss the key assumptions of structural family therapy.
2. Enumerate the characteristics of enmeshed and disengaged families.
3. What is triangulation? lllustrate 'conflict detouring' and 'cross-generational
coalitions" by drawing structural diagrams.
4. Describe the initial "joining" stage in structural family therapy.
5. Discuss the processes of family mapping and making a structural diagnosis.
6. What are some of the restructuringtechniques used in structuralfamily therapy?
lllustrate with examples. 25
26
9.10 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES ~
Barker, P. (2007). Basicfamily therapy. NJ: Blackwell Publishing.
Minuchin, S. (1974). Families andfamily therapy. Cambridge, MA: Harvard
University Press.
Minuchin, S. & Fishman, H. C. (1981). Family therapy techniques. Cambridge,
MA: Harvard University Press.
Nichols, M. & Schwartz, R. (2004). Family Therapy: Concepts and methods.
USA: Pearson.
Vetere, A. (2001). Structural family therapy. Child Psychology and Psychiatry
Review, 6, 133-139.

In this Unit, we will study about two important approaches for family therapy that
are solution focused family therapy and strategic family therapy. In solution focused
family therapy we willleam about its main objectives and important assumptions .
.Further, we will have a glimpse of historical perspective of this approach. Principles
of solution focused family therapy are also discussed in this Unit.
The other part of the Unit deals with strategic family therapy. We will study the
assumptions and main goals of strategic family therapy. Theoretical models given
by Haley, Madanes and Milan group are also discussed in this part of the Unit.
At the end of this Unit, we will discuss some conditions necessary for change
in strategic family therapy. 27
UNIT 10 SOLUTION FOCUSED AND
STRATEGIC FAMILY THERAPY
Structure
10.1 Introduction
10.2 Solution Focused Family Therapy
1O.2.l Objective of Solution Foused Therapy
10.2.2 Assumptions of Solution Focused Therapy
10.3 Historical Perspective
10.4 Principles of Solution Focused Family Therapy
10.5 Questions in Solution Focused Family Therapy
10.6 Techniques Used in Solution Focused Family Therapy
10.7 Therapeutic Processes in Solution Focused Family Therapy
10.8 Strategic Family Therapy
10.8.1 Assumptions of Strategic Family Therapy
10.8.2 Goals of Strategic Family Therapy
10.9 Theoretical Models in Strategic Family Therapy
10.10 Techniques Used in Strategic Family Therapy
10.11 Stages of Strategic Family Therapy
10.12 Conditions for Change
10.13 Let Us Sum Up
10.14 Glossary
10.15 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
10.16 UnitEndQuestions
10.17 Further Readings and References
10.1 INTRODUTION
Schools of Family Therapy
28
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Understand the solution focused and strategic family therapy;
• Explain the principles of these therapies;
• Describe various techniques used in solution focused and strategic family
therapy; and
• Discuss the therapeutic process of solution focused family therapy and strategic
family therapy.
10.2 SOLUTION FOCUSED FAMILY THERAPY
Solution focused family therapy (SFFT) is an approach to psychotherapy based
on solution-building rather than problem-solving. It explores current resources
and future hopes rather than present problems and past causes and typically
involves only three to five sessions. Solution focused theory was a front runner
in the adoption of the social constructivist thinking that became prominent in the
late 1980's and early 1990's. Solution focused family therapy (SFFT) is pragmatic,
cognitive and easy to both practice and teach. It emphasises brevity and a nonpathological view of people. It projects optimism, uses praise of people's strengths
and accomplishments, and refers to the past only to search for exceptions (times
when things had been progressing smoothly or past solutions tried by the client),
Solution focussed family therapy is sometimes linked to general brief therapy,
problem-focused therapy and possibility therapy. All these therapies share same
common points of focus.
10.2.1 Objective of Solution Focused Family Therapy
The objective of this approach is to focus en the process of change rather than
dissecting the problem. The aim in solution focused family therapy is to help
clients transform troubling issues into specific goals and evolve an action plan for
achieving them. Solution focused family therapy is an effective way of helping
people solve many kinds of problems, including relationship problems, depression,
•
substance abuse, eating disorders, and many other issues.
10.2.2 Assumptions of Solution Focused Therapy
The main assumption in solution focused faniily therapy is that creating a detailed
picture of what it will be like when life is better, creates a feeling of hope, and
this makes solutions seem possible. The therapist helps the client focus on the
future and how it will be better when things change. The therapist also helps in
developing a set of specific, detailed goals. These goals drive the therapy process
and keep it focused and efficient.
10.3 HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
The roots of this therapy were developed at the Mental Research Institute (MRI)
in Palo Alto and mutated from a problem solving focus to a solution focus. Most
of the innovators of solution focused family therapy came from the Brief Family
Therapy Centre (BFTC) in Milwaukee in the late 1970's. The initial partners of
BFTC, Steve deShazer and Insoo Berg are credited with being the primary
developers of SFFf. Other members of this team were Eve Lipchik, Wallace
Gingerich, Elam Nunnally, Alex Molnar and Michele Weiner Davis. All these
names are important, not just as pioneers of a new way of doing therapy but also
because their collaborative work and writings have brought about drastic changes
in the conceptualization of social functioning, mental health and well being.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Fill in the blanks:
i) Solution focused family therapy is _
ii) The roots of solution focused family therapy developed at
ill) The main objective of.SFFT is focus on the process of change rather
than the problem.
iv) The main assumption of solution focussed family therapy is that creating
a detailed picture of what it will be like when life is better, creates a
feeling of and makes the seem possible.
10.4 PRINCIPLES OF SOLUTION FOCUSED
FAMILY THERAPY
Let us discuss the important principles of solution focused family therapy. These
are given as follows:
• Clients have resources and strengths to resolve problems: It is the
therapist's task to access these abilities and help clients put them to use.
• Change is constant: Therapists can do a great deal to influence clients'
perceptions regarding the inevitability of change and what is likely to happen
during the therapy session.
• Therapists' tasks are to identify and amplify change: The therapist
accomplishes this through choice of questions, topics focused on or' ignored.
The main focus is on what seems to be working, however small; to label it
as worthwhile; and work toward amplifying it. If the change is in a crucial
area, it can change the whole system.
• It is usually unnecessary to know a great deal about the complaint in
order to resolve it: What is significant is to understand what the clients are
doing that is working. It is also necessary to learn from clients what is
different when the problem is not troublesome. This can be then used to help
clients learn to function that way again to solve the problem.
• It is not necessary to know the cause or function of a complaint to
resolve it: Even the most creative hypotheses about the possible function
of a symptom will not offer therapists a clue about how people can change.
It simply suggests how people's lives have become static. People would be
happy if the problems are to disappear than to understand why it occurs.
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
29
Schools of Fainily Therapy
30
• A small change is all that is necessary: A change in one part of the
system can effect change in another part of the system. The introduction of
positive changes is likely to continue and may even expand and have beneficial
effects in other areas of the person's life.
• Clients define the goal: Do not assume that therapists are better equipped
to decide how their clients should live their lives. Ask people to establish
their own goals for treatment.
• Rapid change or resolution of problems is possible: We believe that, as
a result of our interaction during the first session, our clients will gain a more
productive and optimistic view of their situations. If this first session proceeds
as planned and clients gain a new perspective, then it is highly probable that
they would go home and do what is necessary to make their lives more
satisfying. Average length of treatment is less than 10 sessions, usually 4 to
5 sessions and occasionally just a single session may suffice.
. • There is no one "right" way to view things: Different views may be just
as valid and may fit the facts just as well. Views that keep people stuck are
simply not useful. Sometimes all that is necessary to initiate significant change
is a shift in the person's perception of the situation.
• Focus on what is possible and changeable rather than what is
impossible and intractable: Focus should be given on the aspects of a
person's situation that seem most changeable. This imparts a sense of hope
and power.
10.5 QUESTIONS IN SOLUTION FOCUSED
FAMILY THERAPY
The significant aspects of solution focused family therapy are the questions put to
the client during the interview session. The questions may be for goal identification
or for solutions. The main types of questions employed are discussed below:
1. Goal definition: Clients usually start out by describing their problems and
goals in broad terms and it takes careful and active listening and clarifying
before a clear goal can be determined. If a client specifies several goals ask
the client which one to start with. The initial goal also is to change the topic
in the session from problem talk to solution talk. The examples of questions
during goaf identification can be:
• What brings you here today?
• How will you know coming here is worthwhile?
• What will you be doing differently?
• What will other people notice?
• How will you know you don't have to come here anymore?
2. Problem definition: Solution-construction is easiest when the goal is focused
down to a problem that can be described in specific behavioural terms. For
example, the goal may be to be less depressed. The focused problem
description could be to have more energy to study, or to call up friends and
more outings. The questions a therapist could ask to define problems are:
• How is (example: depression) a problem for you?'
• Is that a problem for anyone else? How is it a problem for others?
• How does it effect you?
• How will things be different when the problem is solved - for you and
for others?
3. Exception questions: Proponents of solution focused family therapy insist
that there are always times when the problem is less severe or absent for the
client. Exceptions are times when things had been progressing smoothly. The
counsellor or therapist encourages the client to describe what different
circumstances exist in that case, or what the client did differently. Here the
therapist is looking for past solutions that clients have tried and that have
worked or what client had done in the past which was successful. The goal
for the client is to repeat what has worked in the past, and to help them gain
confidence in making improvements for the future. Don't ask for exceptions
until the therapist and the client are clear about what the problem and the
goal is.You should be clear about the following questions during the process:
• When don't you, or didn't you have this problem? ... even a little bit?
• What was different at those times?
• What will make it possible for more of that to happen?
• What small changes will you notice?
• How will the small changes make a difference for you and for others?
• What will you notice about yourself and others? What will they notice
about you?
4. Existing resource questions: A key task in solution focused family therapy
is to help clients in identifying and attending to their skills, abilities, and
external resources (for example, social networks). This process not only
helps to draw the client's attention to herself or himself as a competent
individual, but also aims to help the client identify new ways of utilizing these
resources to deal with the problem. Resources can be identified by the client
and the therapist will achieve this by empowering the clients to identify their
own resources through use of scaling questions, problem-free talk, or during
exception-seeking. Many resources can be internal like the client's skills,
strengths, qualities, beliefs that are useful to them and their capacities. These
types of questions aim at identifying the strengths and resources in the clients
which they can build on: .
• What have you tried to do to solve the problem? What helped even a
little bit?
• How have you dealt with similar problems in the past?
• What have you learned from previous experiences like similar past
situation that might be useful in this situation?
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
31
Schools of Family Therapy
32
5. Miracle question: The 'miracle question' is a method of questioning that a
coach, therapist, or counsellor uses to aid the client to envision how the
future will be different when the problem is no longer present. This may also
. help to establish goals. This question or any question asking about a
hypothetical solution is usually asked when the client cannot think of any
exceptions or when she or he is having difficulties in defining a goal. In 'The
Miracle Method', authors ScottD. Miller and Insoo Kim Berg described
how to create solutions with these steps:
1. State your desire for something in your life to be different,
t,
2. Envision that a miracle happens and your life is different,
3. Make sure the miracle is important to you,
4. Keep the miracle small,
5. Define the change with language that is positive, specific, concrete, and
behavioural,
6. State how you will start your journey rather than how you will end it, and
7. Be clear about who, where, and when, but not why.
The question may be formed in the following way:
• If a miracle happened tonight and you woke up tomorrow morning and your
problem was solved, how would things be different? Describe the differences
from.your point of view and what others would be doing and experiencing.
In response to clients' answers ask:
• Does some of that happen already at times? ... even a little bit?
• What will allow more of that to happen?
• What will you and others have to do to make it possible?
6. Scaling questions: Scaling questions are tools that are used to identify
useful differences for the client and may help to establish goals as well. The
client is asked to rate their current position on the scale, and related questions
are then used to help the client to identify resources, exceptions and to
describe a preferred future. These questions are usually asked to help clients
get a better perspective about how severe a problem is. This question is also
asked to track progress from session to session:
• On a scale from 0 to 10, with 0 being totally unacceptable and 10 as
good as you can imagine, where would you put your relationship at this
point?
Or
• On a scale from 0 to 100, with 0 being never and 100 being always,
what percentage of the time would you say you feel those anxious
feelings that make you afraid to leave the house?
Further, in response to answers ask:
• How many degrees would it have to change for you to feel better?
• What would a small step (For example, from 3 to 3.5) look like? What
will you be doing differently?
• What will others be doing differently?
7. Advantage questions: This type of question is asked when clients keep
giving negative answers. For example:
• This may seem like a strange question, and I don't want you to think
that I am not concerned about how serious this problem is for you, but
is there an advantage to your having this problem? ... Is there anything
positive about this negative situation?
In response to answers ask:
• How can you have the advantage without having to maintain this problem?
What can you do instead?
8. Coping questions: Coping questions are designed to elicit information about
client resources that will have gone unnoticed by them. Even the most hopeless
story has within it examples of coping that can be drawn out: For example,
I can understand that things have been really difficult for you, yet I am
very impressed by the fact that, inspite of these difficulties, you manage
to get up each morning and do whatever is required to get the kids
ready for school. How do you do that?" Genuine curiosity and admiration
can help to highlight strengths without appearing to contradict the client's
view of reality. The initial summary, "I can understand that things have
been really difficult for you" is true for them and validates their story. The
second part "you manage to get up each morning etc. " is also a truism.
Undeniably, they cope and coping questions start to gently and supportively
challenge the problem-focused narrative:
• How come things aren't worse? What have you done to keep them
from being worse?
If the client still does not answer with exceptions or positives ask:
• Do you think things can get worse? What will that be like for you? For
others?
• What is the smallest thing you can imagine that will make a difference?
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. What are the main principles of solution focused family therapy?
2. List the types of questions usually asked in solution focused family therapy.
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
33
Schools of Family Therapy
34
10.6 TECHNIQUES USED IN SOLUTION
FOCUSED FAMILY THERAPY
The family therapist uses different techniques in helping clients to achieve the goal.
Some of them are discussed below:
1. Introducing uncertainty: The therapist can introduce some uncertainty into
the problem definition by asking "What gives you the impression that things
seem difficult to handle?" Or she or he can imply that there are days when
the problem is nonexistent by asking "What is different about the days when
things seem manageable?"
2. .Framing questions: Certain questions can elicit information about strengths,
abilities and resources. Perceptions of problems then change significantly in
this context. They are mainly the Exception question and Miracle question
( Explained in section 10.5)
3. Reframing problem definitions: Therapists offer new, and more workable
problem definitions that are within the power of the client and therapist to
solve. They usually help the client to reframe the problem definition to a
more positive one or enable the therapist to listen for a hint of something in
the client's complaint that can be solved. This eo-creates the experience that
the problem is solvable and the client has some ability to solve it.
4. Problem solving techniques: Some of the problem solving techiques dispel
the idea that there is a problem by helping clients to see their situations in
new ways. Negotiate a solvable problem by reducing the size of the problem
in the client's eyes. (Get specific about the problem; focus on stage when it
is not so serious a problem). Foster the idea that clients have all the abilities
and resources to solve the problem by creating an atmosphere that facilitates
the realisation of strengths and abilities.
5. Matching the client's language: Use the exact words the client uses to
describe the problem, in asking questions about what they have done
before, when it is not so serious a problem, etc. Also, attend to client's
metaphors and utilise them to extend observations, learn about clients' interests
or hobbies.
6. Channeling the client's language: Make a conscious effort to move away
fromjargon into action descriptions used in every day language. This has the
effect of de-pathologising or normalising clients' situations. Gradually change
your terminology to less serious, more positive words. (Example: Use the
words, 'transitional period' as this gives the client the opportunity to take
solace in hearing that a problem is temporary, and helps shape their
expectations for the future). Use verb forms by creating a reality where the
problem is in the past and possibilities exist for the present and in the future.
"When you had this problem before, you used to ... you were having
difficulty ... how did the old you ... " Help clients make distinctions that
are helpful (feeling like or thinking about ... rather than doing it).
7. Normalizing and de-pathologising: Tell clients that their problems are
"understandable" and put the situation in an everyday frame of reference.
Say such things as "naturally", "of course", "welcome to the club", "so what
else is new", "that sounds familiar", or "yeah, me too."
I
8. Goal setting: Start with small goals like, "What will be the first sign that
things are moving in the right direction?" Goals must be concrete.
9. Fast-forwarding questions: Fast forwarding questions are useful when clients
cannot identify exceptions or past solutions, Clients are asked to envision a
future without the problem and describe what that looks like. For example,
The miracle question or a magic wand question). "What will" not "what
would be different?"
'10.7 THERAPEUTIC PROCESSES IN SOLUTION
FOCUSED FAMILY THERAPY
1. Find out about the client's life: Therapist should study the client's life
with special attention to interests,. motivations, competencies and beliefs.
This is accomplished in a social, conversational manner by "chatting" with the
client about their work, hobbies, vocations and commitments. This is an ongoing process in that the therapist is always learning about the client, but a
short time, usually 5-10 minutes, should be given in the first session to get
the sequence started.
2. Gathering a brief description of the problem behaviours: After the
solution-focused family therapist is acquainted with the client's life history,
she or he proceeds to gather a problem description from the client by asking
questions such as "What would make you know that it was worth your time "
to come and see me today?". The client will usually volunteer to provide
information about the presenting problem. The therapist asks follow-up
questions to gain a sense of the problem, context of the problem, duration,
severity, situations in which problems occur, the people involved, past attempts
to solve those problems and similar and related questions.
3. Asking relationship questions to help the client define the socially
constructed nature of the problem: Relationship questions are used
throughout the sessions at different points to help the client gain a metaperspective about the problem, and to assess the individual cognitive
constructions and social constructions, concerning the problem definition and
resolution. Relationship questions can be used to help clients to discuss their
problems from a third person's perspective, making the problems less
threatening. •
4. Tracking solution behaviours or exceptions to the problem: The therapist
proceeds to identify stage or times when the problem did not occur, when
there were effective coping responses and the contexts for the absence of
the problem. The therapist gathers as many exceptions to the problem pattern
as possible by repeatedly asking the client 'what else' ..., 'what other times' ...?
5. Scaling the problem: The therapist uses scaling questions to anchor the
problem and to track the progress toward problem resolutions. The client is
asked questions about where the client is on the scale in relationship to solve
the problem; or the level client is affected by the problem. Solution behaviours
described by the client, through the use of the scaling technique, are often
used in constructing specific tasks or homework assignments that are
prescribed and discussed in future sessions.
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
35
Schools of Family Therapy
36
6. Using coping and motivation questions to assess how the client perceives
they are coping and to determine their motivation for change: This is
a variation on the scaling questions that helps the therapist to assess the
client's motivation for solving the problem as well as to judge that the client's
perception of how well they are coping with the problem.
7. Asking the miracle question to develop solutions: Through the miracle
question, an extreme amount of detail is elicited to help develop a set of
solution behaviours that are concrete and behaviourally specific, through
envisioning the future.
8. Negotiating the goal for change: From the problem descriptions and the
miracle question, the therapist negotiates with the client small, concrete
behavioural goals that the client would like to work towards. The goals
should comprise the miracle picture of the client.The goal should be important
to the client. Goals should be small and attainable. Goals should be concrete,
specific and behaviourally defined so that clients are motivated to accomplish
them. The client should say they are committed to working toward the goal.
Clients should have clearly stated that this is something that they want for
their lives. Goals should include the presence rather than absence of a
behaviour. Goals should be represented to the client as a beginning to
behaviour change rather than an end to the process. The therapist may use
phrases like, "this is a step" or "this is a beginning".
9. Taking a session break for reflection, development of compliments,
and formulation of a set of behavioural tasks: Near the end of the
session the therapist takes a 5 to 10 minutes break for reflection and to have
time to construct the information gained into a behavioural task or homework
assignment. It is not absolutely necessary for the therapist to give a homework
assignment. He or she may simply offer a set of reflections for the client to
think about, but in most instances such an assignment is given. Part of the
work of the therapist is to formulate as many genuine compliments as possible
to deliver to the client when they return to the session.
10. Delivering compliments and tasks: The therapist delivers the compliments
and behavioural tasks. The session is ended by setting another appointment.
To complete this sequence in a successful manner the therapist should have
given 4 to 5 genuine compliIhents to the client, developed a set of meaningful
reflections or a concrete behavioural task for the client to work on inbetween sessions, obtain a con:irnitment from the client to do the task,
communicate that they will follow-up on their successes in the next session
and set another appointment.
11. Summation message: The summing up message should contain what the
therapist heard in terms of the complaint, the goals, any progress that has
already been made, client's delineation about how the situation is affecting
her or him (including emotionally), therapist's reaction to the situation,
reinforcement of positives and changes, normalisation, reframes or new
information, acknowledgement of clients' feelings, and the tasks set.
Role of Family Therapist
A solution-focused family therapist is likely to do the following. Instead of going
over past events and focusing on problems, the therapist helps to envision a future
without today's problems and discover solutions, identifies and encourages more
of what is already working, guides the client to identify what does not work and
to focus on doing less of it.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. List the various techniques that are used in solution focused family therapy.
2. What are the various steps of therapeutic process in solution focused
family therapy?
.................................................................................................................
Case Illustration
Therapist:
Therapist:
John:
Therapist:
John:
Therapist:
John:
Therapist:
John:
Therapist:
John:
Therapist:
John:
So John, what are your hopes for this session?
I don't know.
What do you think?
I suppose it will be useful.
In what way do you hope it will be useful?
I don't know.
What do you think?
Stop me drinking.
So if this meeting helps you stop drinking it will have been
worth your while?
Yes.
So can I ask you some unusual questions?
Sure - I have seen so many doctors and people, I am used
to it!
Okay, here's an unusual one: let's imagine that tonight while
you are asleep a miracle happens and your drink problem is
resolved. But because you are asleep you don't know. What
will you notice different in the morning that begins to tell you
that drink is no longer an issue for you?
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
37
Schools of Family Therapy
38
John .' I don't know, I can not imagine that.
Therapist .' Have a go!
John.' I don't believe in miracles.
Therapist.' No, neither do I but it's very helpful for me to have an idea
about how you want your life to be so we can move in the
right direction. So what time would you wake up?
John.' About nine.
Therapist.' And what is the first thing you will notice yourself doing
differently that begins to tell you a miracle has happened?
John .' Nothing will be different. I will get up, take some stuff to
clear my head, have a coffee and go out.
Therapist.' Stuff?
John .' I will take anything, anything I can get hold of, pills, the lot.
It helps clear the head.
Therapist.' So let's say the miracle stops you needing stuff as well as
drink. What will be different when you go out?
John.' Look, what you have to realize is that 90 per cent of my
friends drink, so what do you expect me to do?
Therapist.' No, it is certainly not easy. So what might you do if drink
and drugs are no longer a problem? .
John .' I do not know, there are all sorts of things.
Therapist.' So what might one of them be?
John.' The thing is, it isimpossible to concentrate on anything because
I am always worrying about money.
Therapist .' So what would you notice about the way you worried about
money if drink and drugs were no longer a problem?
John.' Well, then I would have to do something about it, would
not I?
Therapist : So what might you be thinking of doing?
John.' Well, I can get work if I need it. I do gardens.
The therapist makes no attempt to advise or encourage John to 'perform'
any Ofhis described activities and simply ends the session by complimenting
.John on his honesty, his continuing interest in fighting his problem, his loyalty
to his drinking friends and his courage in continuing to live such a hard life.
10.8 STRATEGIC FAMILY THERAPY
"
Strategic family therapy is based on strategy. The therapist devises and initiates
interventions for solving the families' presenting problems. Strategic therapists are
concerned with dysfunctional hierarchies and repetitive sequences of behaviour
between family members and other systems that help in maintaing the presenting
problem. They allsuggest that emotional problems and symptoms of family members
result from hierarchical structures in which the boundaries are unclear or
inappropriate for healthy family functioning. Problems are believed to be maintained
through attempted solutions of the problem at the wrong hierarchic level, denying
the presence of the problem or inventing a problem when there is none. The
strategic thought was expounded by Jay Haley, Chloe Madanes, Mental Research
Institute (MRI) and the Milan Group. Although each theorist explains somewhat
different motivations for the problems that surface, they all see the repetitive
sequences of behaviours as the process that maintains them. Each utilises strategic
methods designed to correct hierarchical distortions and improve more age and
role appropriate interactions. Strategic therapists work toward solving the presenting
problem.
10.8.1 Assumptions of Strategic Family Therapy
Let us discuss some important assumptions of strategic family therapy:
1. All families are viewed as being functional from their unique perspectives.
2. The social context is emphasised and problems involve at least two or three
people.
3. Functional families have an appropriate hierarchy of power with parents
having more power than children.
4. Therapy is symptom oriented. Symptoms are tactics used by one person to
deal with another.
5. Presented problems serve some function within the family.
6. Therapist assumes responsibility for determining the structure of the therapy.
Change occurs not through insight but through the family carrying out the
directives of the therapist.
7. Process is emphasized over content.
8. Family life cycle is considered important in understanding family dysfunction. .,
Families get stuck at a particular stage.
9. Families are rule governed systems.
10. Emphasis is given on the here and now and not to the past history. Emotional
expression is not encouraged. A brief therapy model is usually followed.
10.8.2 Goals of Strategic Family Therapy r ' ~
Main goals of strategic family therapy are given below:
1. Dealing with the current problem and intervening on other existing problems
if family asks for help. Strategic family therapists help the family by making
them form clear, straight forward, immediate, behavioural goals and sticking
to them.
2. Another goal of strategic family therapy is for structural re-organisation in
the family similar to what is attempted by the structural therapists, but that
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
39
Schools of Family Therapy would be the secondary goal. They are more concerned with the immediate
problem and deemphasise the importance of insight.
3. Another goal may be to bring harmony and balance into people's lives, to
love and be loved, to find fulfillment in work, to play and enjoy.
4. To create new patterns of behaviour, along with new beliefs, that are
supportive of the creation of new patterns.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. State 'true' or 'false' :
i) Strategic family therapy is not based on strategy. _
ii) In strategic family therapy all families are viewed as functional for their
unique perspective. _
iii) Structural reorganisation is primary goal of strategic family
therapy.
iv) Exphasis is given on here and now rather than past history. _
10.9 THEORETICAL MODELS IN STRATEGIC
FAMILY THERAPY
40
Haley's theories evolved through his diverse background. Although systemic in his
thinking about family reciprocal interactions, he believes strongly in the importance
of a hierarchical structure with parents in charge. He describes triads as the family
unit that maintains its stability. Another focus is on the sequences of behaviour
which refers to the communication patterns in the here and now. Paradoxical
directives are the hallmark of strategic therapy. They are not ploys to outsmart
families but thoughtful suggestions derived from long experience. In his view the
struggle for power and control is central to family patterns. According to him, the
symptoms result from repetitive, unproductive, attempts to control or influence
other family members. Madanes is of the view that all problems brought to
therapy can be thought of as stemming from the dilemma between love and
violence. According to her, the family problems may be because of the intention
to dominate and control or to be loved or to love and protect others or to repent
and forgive .
.The Milan group also believes that power games are unacknowledged patterns
used by the family to control each other's behaviour. These patterns maintain the
family as a self regulating system that controls itself according to rules formed over
time. They used a systemic search for differences in behaviour, relationships and
beliefs among family member to uncover the connections that keep the family
system in homeostatic balance. They also hypothesize that the symptoms a person
develops are to protect one or more other family members so as to maintain the
delicate network of family alliances. The Milan model stresses on neutrality and
curiosity and generates hypothesis through circular questioning. Neutrality is
described as the avoidance of taking side or being partial to family members and
maintaining a neutral position. Curiosity and concern for patterns generates a
respect for all participants, even as respect generates a sense of curiosity. The
therapist needs to deal with a system with the understanding that the system is
simply doing what it does and with no right or wrong label attached to what it
does. Curiosity encourages all participants to look for different descriptions and
explanations even when one cannot immediately imagine the possibility of any
other way of thinking about the problem. Hypothesization refers to the definition
of the problem or provides a tentative explanation about what functions the
symptoms are serving in the family context. Another important element in strategic
family therapy is the circular questioning. It is the technique nurtured by neutrality
and curiosity. This questioning undermines the family's belief system that says an
individualis the problem. Circular questioning is used to understand the relationships,
subsystems and alliances, the degree of concern between family members, to note
changes over time, to learn about a person's sense of control over another's
actions, to help people recognise how one's reactions behaviours and feelings link
with other family members or to help in looking for new insights. For example,
a therapist could ask "if your mother decided to stop worrying about you, what
would your father do?" Such questions create opportunities for new stories.
There are three basic models for problem development in the family, these are:
i) cybernetic (positive feedback loops), ii) structural (flawed family hierarchies)
and ii)functional (one member develops symptoms to control others).
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Define the following terms :
i) Sequence of behaviour
ii) Neutrality
.............................................................................................. ~ .
iii) Hypothesization
10.10 TECHNIQUES USED IN STRATEGIC
FAMILY THERAPY
The strategic approach focuses mostly on strategies adapted to the specific situation
of a person and the problem. Each of the three models is somewhat different.
Now let us discuss various techniques that are used in strategic family therapy.
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
41
Schools of Family Therapy
42
These are as given below,
1. Reframing: Reframing is providing the family with a rationale for treatment.
The Mental Research Instirute (MID) therapist may not believe what they tell
the family, but that is Unimportant as long as it is a rational explanation. The
point tJf Usingthis technique is not to bring insight, but to induce compliance.
2. Out-positioning: Out-positioning means one family member taking the role
and place of other fanllly m~mBefs,to the extreme or enacting it in a highly
exaggerated manner,
3. Parad'Oxte~linterventions: Paradoxical interventions are of two forms;
compliance based, to simply get the family to change their behaviour by
complying with a directive, or defiance based, in the hope that the family will
defy the directive find imprdVe: The therapist may tell the family, "Although
we as therapi~ls ~ ellatlge agents, we think you should not change because
it \8 'Il ~COd thing that Rohit has tantrums and that mother feels hopeless, as
this pulls father in to help her". This statement creates a therapeutic double
bind. If the family obeys, they disobey the therapist. If they don't change,
they maintain th~status quo and the pairi that comes with it. The therapist
is saying 'l}iYii 'f <change; and is specifying how the symptom behaviour is
sef\ih\g a useful purpose that might not continue if the symptom is stopped.
4. Symptom prescription: It is an exposure based paradox used to expose
the family's hidden relationships.
5. Restmining W@lUllqhes:Restraining techniques are telling the family that
the.y ~aB not move very fast because they are not ready.
6. Positive connotation: It is to reframe the problem but in a way that the
family members are not blamed or labeled as bad.
7. Rituals: Rituals are directives to engage the whcle family in some behaviour
that exaggerated or broke rules and family myths. they Me the ceremonial
acts proposed as tentative sUggestibns, as an experiment for the family to try
out, Ritunls j)'f6ffitWenew ways of doing things, which may alter tlIg family's
th~ti~l1ts,beliefs, and relationship options.
10.11 STAGES OF STRATEGIC FAMILY
THERAPY
In this section, we will study the stages of strategiCfamily therapy, In general, we
can say the strategic family therapy follows the following stages:
1. A structural initial interview;
2. Mutual definitibn of goal of therapy,
3. Observation of interactions by therapist as family members discuss problems,
4. Tasks and directives in the sessions and at home, and
5. Termination when symptom relief is achieved.
Milan group has described the stages of therapy in the following order:
1. Pre-session: In pre-session tentative hypotheses are made.
2. Session: The hypotheses are tested and refined in the session stage.
3. Inter-session: The team would meet with the therapist while the family
waited outside.
4. Intervention: The therapist would return to deliver the intervention. There
are several interventions that are used usually.
5. Post-session:The team would analyse the family's reaction and plan for the
next session.
Madanes has given the stages in the following order:
1. Social stage: In social stage, everyone is greeted and spoken to in order
to make everyone feel more relaxed and less defensive.
2. Problem stage: In problem stage, therapist introduce herself or himself and
repeats what she or he knows about the problem, then speaks to each
person and gets their opinions and ideas about the problem. Haley engages
the father first, and observes all the family members' interactions to uncover
hidden triangles.
3. Interaction stage: This is a stage wherein members talk about different
perspectives on the problem. Therapist observes the family interactions around
the problem. By asking what they have tried before, therapist gains information
and also underscores the family's need for her or his help. Therapist can end
the first session with a simple directive and no advice.
10.12 CONDITIONS FOR CHANGE
By attempting first order change or change in the behaviour, second order change
or change in the system's structure can be achieved. They do not need insight as
to why they have problems, nor do they need to understand why the change in
behaviour is needed. They simply need to act differently and see for themselves
that the family's rules for problem-solving can be more flexible. They try to keep
resistance low and motivation high.
Strategic family therapists believe insight to be of little use, try to keep resistance
low, and focus on behavioural change, arguing that before the family can think or
feel differently, they must act differently. They also believe that since one person
can change a system, she or he may be the most successful level to use in
producing change.
...................................................... -" .
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. List the techniques used in strategic family therapy .
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
43
Schools of Family Therapy
44
2. What are the stages of strategic family therapy, according to Milan group?
Case situation analysis
-
Situation: Rahul is 16 and has recently refused to go out of the house.
MRI would focus on getting Rahul out, believing the parents attempted
solutions kept him home.
Haley and Madanes would focus on the triadic relationship between
Rahul and both of his parents. Haley would wonder about the parents
unresolved conflicts and marital struggles while Madanes would wonder
about how Rahul staying home helped one or both of his parents.
Milan group would focus on the family's history and hidden power struggles,
or family games, in which Rahul is embedded and has to stay home to help
a family member "win."
10.13 LET US SUM UP
Since its origin in the mid-1980s, solution-focused family therapy has proved to
be an effective intervention across the whole range of problem presentations, that
is, in working with women and children, adult mental health issues, work in
schools, in counselling and group work. The two key therapeutic issues which
need to be kept in mind are; (1) how the client wants his or her life to be different,
and (2) what it will take to make it happen. Solution focused approach is now
in constant demand. Its efficacy is well established and supported by a solid and
ever increasing body of research. Solution-focused thinking has earned its place
and is widely accepted in the fields of therapy, social care, education and business.
Strategic family therapy been highly influential among all other approaches in
family therapy.This approach has been used with families with psychiatric disorders,
widely used in dealing with children or adolescents' problems, and also in couples
with relationship issues. The attitude of curiosity and prompting of circular questions,
have come to serve as the base of investigation for many family therapists. These
techniques have been used by family therapists in helping the family develop a
harmonious relationship.
10.14 GLOSSARY
BFfC Brief family therapy centre
Hypothesization Defining the problem or giving tentative explanation
about what purpose or function the symptoms are
serving in the family context
MRI Mental Research Institute Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy Neutrality To avoid side taking or being partial to members and
maintain a neutral position
SFFf
SFT
Solution focused family therapy
Strategic family therapy
10.15 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1 i) pragmatic
ii) Mental Research Institute (MRI)
iii) dissecting
iv) hope, solutions
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. Following are the main principles of solution focused family therapy:
i) Clients have resources and strengths to resolve complaints,
ii) Change is constant,
iii) The therapist's job is to identify and amplify change,
iv) It is usually unnecessary to know a great deal about the complaint to
in order to resolve it,
v) It is not necessary to know the cause or function of a complaint change
to resolve it,
vi) A small change is all that is necessary,
vii) Clients define the goal,
viii) Rapid change or resolution of problems is possible,
ix) There is no one "right" way to view things, and
x) Focus on what is possible and changeable rather what is impossible and
intractable.
2. The various types of questions asked in solution focussed family therapy are
given below:
i) Goal defining questions,
ii) Problem definition,
iii) Exception questions,
iv) Existing resource questions,
v) Miracle questions,
vi) Scaling questions,
vii) Advantage questions, and
viii) Coping questions.
45
Schools of Family Therapy
46
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. Following are the various techniques that are used in solution focused family
therapy:
i) Introducing uncertainty,
ii) Framing questions,
iii) Reframing problem definitions,
iv) Problem solving techniques,
v) Matching the client's language,
vi) Channeling the client's language,
vii) Normalising and depathologising,
viii) Goal setting, and
ix) Fast-forwarding questions
2. Therapeutic process in solution focused family therapy follows following
steps:
i) Finding out about the client's life,
ii) Gathering a brief description of the problem behaviours,
iii) Asking relationship questions to help the client defme socially constructed
nature of the problem,
iv) Tracking solution behaviour or exceptions to the problem,
v) Scaling the problems,
vi) Using coping and motivation questions to assess how the client perceives
they are coping and to determine their motivation for change,
vii) Asking the miracle question to develop solutions,
•
viii) Negotiating the goal for change,
ix) Taking a session break for reflection, development of compliments and
formulation of a set of behavioural tasks,
x) Delivering compliments and tasks, and
xi) Summation message.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
1. i) False
ii) True
iii) False
iv) True
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1. D Sequence of behaviour: Sequence of behaviour can be defined as the
communication patterns in the family in present situation.
ii) Neutrality: Neutrality can be defined as avoiding side taking or being
partial to family members and maintaing neutral position.
iii) Hypothesization: Hypothesization means defining the problem or giving
a tentative explanation about what function the symptoms are serving in
the family context.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1. Following are the various techniques used in strategic family therapy:
i) Reframing,
ii) Out-positioning,
iii) Paradoxical interventions,
iv) Symptom prescription,
v) Restraining techniques,
vi) Positive connotation, and
vii) Rituals.
2. According to Milan group, strategic family therapy has following stages:
i) Pre-session,
ii) Session,
iii) Intersession,
iv) Intervention, and
v) Post-session.
10.16 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. How will you differentiate between solution focused family therapy and strategic
family therapy?
2. How are the techniques used in solution focused family therapy different
from the techniques used in strategic family therapy?
3. Write a note on assumptions of solution focused family therapy and strategic
family therapy.
4. Explain theoretical models in strategic family therapy.
Solution Focused and
Srategic Family Therapy
47
Schools of Family Therapy
48
10.17 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Barker, P. (1998). Basic Family Therapy. 4th Edition. USA: Blackwell Publishing.
Becaver, R.J. & Becaver, D.S. (1982). Systems theory and family therapy: A
primer. Washington, DC: University Press of America.
Green, J.B. (2003). Introduction to Family Theory and Therapy: Exploring
and evolving field. Australia: Thomson Brooks/Cole.
Todd, T. Pretherapy assessment. Unpublished measure. The Brief Therapy Institute
of Denver, 8120 Sheridan Blvd., Ste. C-112, Westminster, CO, 80030.
49
UNIT 11 SYSTEMIC FAMILY THERAPY
Structure
11.1 Introduction
11.2 What is Systemic Family Therapy?
11.2.1 Who would Benefit from Systemic Family Therapy?
11.2.2 What is a Family?
11.3 Historical Development of Systemic Family Therapy
11.3.1 Contribution of Feminist Critique
11.3.2 Influence of Social Construction and Post-Modernism
11.4 Key Features of Systemic Family Therapy
11.4.1 The Family or Organization as a 'System'
11.4.2 Components of a 'System'
11.4.3 Systemic Theoretical Concepts
11.4.4 Definition of a Problem in Systemic Therapy
11.4.5 Function of. the Symptom
11.5 Concepts that Help to Understand Family Communication Process
11.6 Systemic Ideas About Change
11.7 Practice of Systemic Family Therapy
11.7.1 Convening the Family
11.7.2 Mapping the Family Through the Genogram and the Cultural Genogram
11.7.3 Identifying Transition Stage: The Family Life Cycle
11.7.4 Areas for Investigation
11.7.5 Hypothesizing, Circularity and Neutrality
11.7.6 Interviewing Techniques
11.7.7 Interventions as Part of Therapeutic Process
11.8 Therapist's Role in Systemic Couple/Family Therapy
11.8.1 Key Competency Skills
11.8.2 Working with Co-Therapist, Reflecting Team and Other Professionals
,
11.9 Recognising Success and Failure
1j .9.1 Indications that Therapy is Failing
11.9.2 Indications that Therapy is Successful
11.9.3 Therapist Factors and Therapist Context that Contribute to Success or
Failure
11.9.4 Family Factors and Family Context
11.10 Let Us Sum Up
11.11 Glossary
11.12 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
11.13 Unit End Questions
11.14 Further Readings and References
Schools of Family Therapy
50
11.1 INTRODUCTION
This Unit explains the theory of systemic family therapy. This is-important
because therapists who work with families need to thoroughly understand,
and be rooted in a conceptual framework, without which they are at risk of
viewing the family and its problems exactly as the family does. This Unit also
explains the shift from individual to a contextual focus, which is at the heart
of systemic thinking. Since systemic ideas offer us a way to work with
families and is a theory that is culture fair, giving culture a great deal of
importance, it is ideally suited to working with Indian families.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Define systemic family therapy;
• Explain historical development and key features of systemic family
therapy;
• Understand the process of systemic family therapy;
• Describe the role of therapist in systemic family therapy; and
• Recognise the success or failure of therapy;
11.2 WHAT IS SYSTEMIC FAMILY THERAPY?
Systemic family therapy is a model of family therapy and shares concepts and
ways of working with other family therapy models. The commonalities that
it shares with other family therapy models are:
• The unit of treatment is the family; no one family member is singled out
as a patient;
• The person whom the family identifies as the patient is considered as the
person reflecting the family disturbances;
•
• The family members are seen together for the session;
• Traditional concepts and theories that describe personality types to explain
individual behaviour are not useful in family therapy;
• Therapeutic goals and methods are family centered, and the whole family's
welfare is of concern; and
• Circular causality rather than linear thinking is a central concept in
family therapy.
Now, we will discuss what is systemic family therapy. The term systemic
family therapy was used to refer to the Milan model of family therapy but
the term now has a much wider meaning. It is used interchangeably with
'systems therapy' and refers to therapy in which systems principles are applied
to the work. All systemic family therapists are systems thinkers. The systemic
therapist is primarily interested in the relationships between individuals and
,
the system. Further, systems theory which is the basis for systemic family
therapyf Rivett & Street, 2003) states that:
• a family is a system of interrelated parts in which relationships develop
through a process of feedback;
• each family member's behaviour is determined by a pattern of interactions,
and every action is a' response at a point in a system;
• these patterns are repetitious and conform to rules that develop over
time;
• the rules that govern actions have meaning for the system, and it is the
meaning that reinforces the rules of behaviour, but change in behaviour
can bring about change in meanings and thereby, also a change in rules;
• these patterns demonstrate to us the circularity of interactions;
• some of these patterns happen in contexts that promote change while
others hinder change, so attention to the context is very important;
• feedback to the system determines which patterns are continued and
which are modified; and
• when the system is unable to adapt to change it develops a symptom.
You will be reading about these points in detail in further sections.
11.2.1 Who would Benefit from Systemic Family Therapy?
Systemic family therapy beneficiaries have been discussed below:
• Families of all types, from all cultural, racial, ethnic, religious, class and
caste backgrounds would benefit because of the attention paid to issues
of power and being 'different' in systemic family therapy. It is recognised
in systems work that a family who is a minority (e.g., ethnic, immigrant)
may have more problems in contexts where they are disadvantaged by
the majority viewpoint of what is considered normal or good. Systemic
therapists also are very open and respectful of cultural differences in
beliefs and practices (e.g., child rearing practices). In the session, systemic
family therapist gives power back to the family to create alternatives and
make choices.
• Families at every stage in the family life cycle, particularly when making
transitions from one stage to another. It is commonly seen that families
facing a developmental crisis of the addition of a member (as in birth or
through marriage), or a loss (death or divorce, children leaving home for
studies or employment) may have difficulty adapting to the change and
one or more family members may develop symptoms. Family therapy
offers a framework for diagnosing and treating families through the
developmental tasks required in various life cycle stages. Since systemic
work is oriented towards, families, it is also child-focused and research
shows that children greatly benefit from family therapy, from being able
to listen and talk in the sessions with family members.
• Families in which one member has a diagnosis for a minor or major
mental illness, for example, depression, anorexia, schizophrenia, anxiety
Systemic Family Therapy
-#'
51
Schools of Family Therapy disorders, conduct disorders, school related problems, truancy, etc.
Systemic family therapy helps the family to increase the options of the
roles and responsibilities of people and to establish boundaries between
-wellness and illness as well as to blur these boundaries as required. For
example, in a couple with a depressed wife, the husband had increasingly
become more the responsible 'care-taker' and the wife sank more onto
being the ill 'patient' doing less than she was able to do earlier. The
systems therapist intervened by expressing worry about the husband's
health due to the overload of work, and prescribed a day-off for the
husband every other day. It was seen that the wife became more active
in attending to her responsibilities and was more able to take turns in
being the 'car~-taker' with the husband as he gave up his rigid holding
of his role as the functional one in the relationship.
• Inter-generation families which have children, either young, adolescept
or adult, systems work with cross-generations in the same room allows
for the most effective way of working as proven by outcome research.
• Individuals whose families cannot or will not attend family therapy,
benefit from systems therapy.
11.2.2 What is a Family?
For some people this question may seem odd, because everyone knows that
a family is, at its core, a husband-wife unit, married to each other and living
together, with the children born to them. There may be values associated
with a family such as good child-rearing or taking care of elders. This basic
form of the family is considered the norm against which all other family
forms are judged as being 'not normal' or deviant. For others, say in parts
of India, the norm for a family is several generations living in the same house
as a joint family. Any division into smaller units is seen as a 'partition' that
is a disruptive fissure in family life that arouses a great deal of distress.
But for other people it may be more difficult to say what a family should be
like (Silva & Smart 1999). They see that people are in intimate relationships
with each other in many different ways. Some such examples are:
• married couples living in different places;
• unmarried heterosexuals living together;
• a family of friends, or a 'family' of choice;
• an orphan having relationships with people not related by blood;
• close relationship with someone not related by blood;
• a person in a loving relationship with a same sex partner;
• a divorced couple who are parenting their children and spend significant
time together including, birthdays, festivals etc.;
• divorced couple who have married other people and are in relationship
with ex-spouses, ex-inlaws, and stepchildren;
52
• as stepfamilies in which divorced people live together with their children
conceived in their earlier relationships;
• older woman in significant relationship with a man 20 years younger and
she is the primary earner;
• man with two spouses and their children who may live together or in
separate households; and
• single parent family, where often a single mother will head the household.
There are many people who live in these and other forms of 'family'. Instead
of seeing it as a sign of breakdown of society or of a moral and social
decline, it can be seen as evolution of family practices. These forms of family
have developed over time as a response to culture, history, and socio-economic
circumstances (response to new employment practices, gender relationships
or increasing acceptance of sexual or~entations). One way to define family
could be to call it a context for intimate relationship for the fulfillment of
emotional and material needs of all members.
Systemic family therapy takes a very broad definition of 'family' in which eoresidence, heterosexuality or even two adults are not a pre-requisite, in keeping
with its value base of being respecting all views and cultural practices.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. State 'true' or 'false':
i) In systemic family therapy, the unit of treatment is one family
member who has a problem, instead of the whole family. _
ii) Families of all types, from all cultural, religious, ethnic, ~ncial,
class and caste background would benefit from systemic family
therapy. _
iii) Systemic family therapy adopts a very broad definition of family
and respects variations. _
2. Describe any three common featuers of systemic family therapy and
other models of family therapy.
11.3 HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENT OF
SYSTEMIC FAMILY THERAPY
Family therapy developed out of the application of c voe. 'letic theory to
human relationships. The term cybernetics referred original'; to the science
of feedback mechanisms in machines, and later to communi .ation in humsystems. Gregory Bateson (1972), a pioneer in this new 'epistemology' said
that the organisation of events (psychological, social, behavioural) could 0:' I:
Systemic Family Therapy
53
Schools of Family Therapy be understood in terms of pattern and information. He studied schizophrenia
as an interactional phenomena rather than an intrapsychic one. Family therapy
. models including the Milan model developed out of the influence of Bateson's
work as well as communication theory based on the work of Watzlawick and
associates (1974). Later, the Milan model evolved into the current form of
systemic family therapy which also incorporates narrative therapy within it.
Given below is a brief description of the conceptual framework of the three
forms viz. (i) Systemic family therapy; (ii) Milan systemic model; and (iii)
Narrative therapy.
(i) Systemic family ~herapy: It evolved through innovations in earlier
approaches of family therapy like the structural, strategic and experiential
models. These developments grew out of the experience of working
with families, and one of the important ones that shaped systems thinking
came to be called the Milan group work because it evolved at a family
clinic in Italy; and another one came to be called narrative therapy
based on work done by Michael White in Australia. Both these family
therapy practitioners are social constructionists or constructivists, who
assume that a given situation can have several interpretations or versions, .
all being valid. There is no 'correct' view. According to their view it is
more important to ask which view is most helpful to the family. They
also say that the family's own view is the most important to take into
consideration because it is the factor that will hinder or help the family
in finding solutions to its problems. They emphasise Gregory Bateson's
view that when information different to the family's dominant mode of
thinking is presented to the family, it begins the change process.
(ii) Milan Systemic Model: The group of Mara Selvini Palazzoli, Luigi
Boscolo, Guiliana Prata, and Gianfranco Cecchin worked together to
develop systemic ideas with families with anorexia, encopretic and
emotionally disturbed children. They developed circular questioning,
hypothesising, and neutrality as systemic practices. They also emphasised
changes in thinking as an important therapeutic goal. They looked for
openings to provide families with a positive way of looking at problematic
behaviours, called positive connotation.
(Hi) Narrative Therapy: Michael White has incorporated social construction
ideas through playful ideas that address the dominant negative view of
the family, society and mental health field which is seen as oppressing
the family. He suggests that the family needs to be liberated from these
negative, oppressive frameworks by using their own expert knowledge.
He encourages families to notice when their problems do not oppress
them, when they do not have problems and small exceptions to their
negative experience. He calls these moments 'unique outcomes'. He
uses this new heightened awareness of positive experiences as bringing
forth a story or self definition of success that had been marginalised
earlier but now can be re-claimed as theirs.
11.3.1 Contribution of Feminist Critique
54
Feminists have critiqued sev.eral early family therapy ideas in structural and
strategic family therapy models and contributed significantly to the
development of a' gender-fair therapy (Burck & Speed,1995). Early family
therapy theory stated that all participants in an interaction contribute equally
to its maintenance. This pathologised women caught in abusive sexual and
physical abuse from their male partners. The challenge to this has encouraged
thinking about other situations where power is unequal, in maintaining
destructive and unhealthy patterns. Feminist thinking has also challenged
'mother-blaming' where women are held unfairly responsible for a number of
family problems. Women are blamed for their own and other people's
difficulties and this discourse in society is not only unfair to women but also
to men because it has prevented any real discussion on masculinity and men's
expenence.
Systemic family therapy has incorporated in its theory and practice a focus
on addressing issues of unequal power in relationships, not only in gendered
relationships, but in other relationships in the family, in the relationship of the
individual and family with practices of abusive power in the larger society,
and even in therapy.
11.3.2 Influence of Social Construction and Post-Modernism
Social construction: The influence of social construction has been significant.
In this viewpoint, all knowledge of the world is the result of our own
constructing, ordering, creating and not the result of the discovery of some
objective reality. In therapy this means that there is no one reality, the therapist
and clients eo-create new meaning of experience. This is the position taken
by systemic therapists.
Post-modernism:· This is a philosophical system that emerged in the 1970's
and 1980's that focuses on elaboration, eclecticism, and inclusiveness.
Modernism as seen in earlier models of family therapy ignored issues such
as gender, ethnicity, and the impact of larger systems such as political and
economic forces. Modernism also promoted the following of a single model
of therapy. Post-modernism ideas have been incorporated into systemic ideas
of working such as eclecticism and integration of theories.
11.4 KEY FEATURES OF SYSTEMIC FAMILY
THERAPY
Let us discuss important features of systemic family therapy. These are given
below:
11.4.1 The Family or Organization as a 'System'
A system is any set of interrelated parts that is structured on feedback. In
systemic family therapy the family is seen as a 'system', made up of people
who are part of that family. These family members can be called parts of the
system. Each of these separate Iparts has a function for the whole system.
Each part interacts and impacts every other part, like a stone thrown into a
still pool of water will set off waves in every direction. The focus is on the
relationship between the parts rather than on the parts themselves. Parts of
a system interact, eo-vary and evolve through feedback loops. Systemic
theory gives a great deal of importance to the creation and observation of
feedback processes.
Systemic Family Therapy
55
Schools of Family Therapy
56
11.4.2 Components of a 'System'
The parts of the system include the individuals who are in relationship with
each other, the extended, inter-generational family members they are connected
to, other groups to whom the family claims affiliation such as class, caste,
racial, ethnic, religious, professional, cultural, political, social etc. The system
also includes organisations and institutions that impact the family and are in
turn impacted upon by families, educational institutions, the judiciary and
legal system, social welfare system etc.
The relationship of the family to the world of ideas is also part of the system.
Families live in different systems of belief which affect their thinking and their
choices, for instance, the different belief systems about gender relationships
in any community will impact what is considered appropriate behaviour for
girls and boys. Each person, family, and community behaviours will in turn
impact belief systems over time.
In systemic therapy the therapist is part of the therapeutic system with the
family. The therapist is not an objective outsider but is a participant-observer
of the system.
11.4.3 Systemic Theoretical Concepts
Following are some of the key theoretical concepts in systemic family therapy,
as enunciated by Campbell etal. (1988):
1. Feedback over time creates patterns, that is, the rules that the system
follows. Feedback defines and regulates the system.
2. Patterns develop in context. Let us study the following case vignette to
understand this concept better.
Case Vignette
At dinner time, the eldest daughter, Tina (15 yrs.) starts by talking about
something that happened at school. Mother listens carefully while Father
starts watching Raman (5 yrs.), the youngest son who plays with his
food. Father tries to feed him while the middle child Anita (9 yrs.) eats
quietly looking down at her plate.' Father asks Mother to feed Raman
and Tina gets upset that Father only cares for Raman. Mother fusses
over Raman and asks Father to listen to Tina. But Tina gets upset and
walks away from the table. Father gets angry at Tina. No-one notices
that Anita is silent. This interactional sequence is repeated over and over
again. Several patterns of interaction can be identified.
Now, let us answer some of these questions:
Ques 1. In the given case what behaviours are manifested by each family
member during dinner-time? If this family continues to interact
in this way, which behaviours may get reinforced into patterns
in each of the family members?
Ans 1: For the example given above, it is the father's pattern of
behaviour that has got reinforced over time. Father believes that
he has to be incharge of teaching the children correct behaviour,
since his wife is unable to do it. He continues to teach Raman
how to eat and later to study and what sport to play, and
--------------------------
continues to direct his wife to be a proper mother to Raman and
the girls.
Ques 2: Suggest a few sentences for the rest of the family members
regarding their behaviour patterns; Mother, Tina, Anita, and
Raman.
Ans 2: There is no correct answer, given below are suggestions:
Mother believes that she has to be the peace keeper between
people especially between Tina and her husband. In trying to be
a good wife and good mother, she feels less and less able to
intervene to resolve conflicts.
Tina believes that her father favours Raman because he is a boy.
Her behaviour becomes more confrontational, and she sees that
is the only way that she can get her father to notice her, even
though it is negative attention. For her, Mother's attention is
not as important as Father's. She has learnt to follow the family
rule that males are more important than females, even though
she fights against it.
Anita believes that as the middle child she is not as important
as the eldest or the youngest sibling. The meaning she draws
from being ignored at family time is that she cannot compete
with her siblings be 'seen' or 'heard' and so she becomes selfreliant and does well at school. She appears self-confident and
able but does not feel that anyone understands her.
Raman sees that he has to do little to get both his parents
interested in him. He does not like the fighting at dinner time
and cannot understand why Tina will not play with him. He sees
that his father and mother argue about him and his mother is
often scolded by father. He starts spending more time on the
computer or out with his friends.
3. Context gives meaning for the events and behaviours of a family system.
For example in the above family, the relevant contexts could be:
•
i) Family belongs to middle class and there are cultural rules about
proper behaviour for a father, mother, eldest child, middle child and
youngest child;
ii) Cultural beliefs about gender and desirability of a male child;
iii) Extended family experience and meaning of having two girls and a
boy with gaps of several years;
iv) Parental and marital context for the couple;
v) Family coming together at the end of the day; and
vi) Argument at dinnertime.
Definition of context: Context is the frame in which behaviour, verbal
and non-verbal messages become meaningful. Just as the meaning of a
sentence comes from the text in which it is placed, so must behaviour
be understood as being influenced by its context. Different rules for
Systemic Family Therapy
57
Schools of Family Therapy
58
behaviour are present in different contexts according to certain rules and
functions. For example, rules for a sibling relationship are different from
rules for a friendship, and the rules are again different for the same
sibling relationship depending on whether the siblings are married or
single. The symptoms of the individual/couple/family must be seen in the
context of its meaning for the family and the wider social system. Each
individual is embedded in a 'transactional field' and each family is also
embedded in its 'transactional field' whose frame of reference is unique.
Therapy always means a change in the individual context as well as in
the collective family context.
4. . A system develops patterns creating meanings and beliefs which then
influence behaviours that reinforce existing systems in a recursive or
circular loop.
5. Meanings can come from contexts that can be arranged in a hierarchical
structure (Pierce and Cronen, 1985). Some contexts at higher levels are
abstract, derive from nationality or culture and can apply to many families,
while others are more personal and can apply to relationships such as a
husband-wife relationship from a particular local culture.
In the case vignette of the family above, the contexts are placed
hierarchically from the highest level to the lowest level as below:
i) Family's middle class and cultural rules about proper behaviour for a
father, mother, eldest child, middle child and youngest child,
ii) Intergeneration patterns of interaction between genders,
iii) Marital quality of the parents,
iv) Rules of conflict between the members of this family (who can argue?
Who can't?), and
v) Argument at dinner-time today.
Each level impacts and gives meaning to all other levels.
6. There are forces for change and forces for no-change or stability
(homeostasis) in the system and the family's problems are seen as a
struggle between these forces.
7. Disturbance in one part will affect all other parts and change in one part
will affect other parts.
8. Change can come from any part of the system. Systemic therapists work
towards creating the context for change, primarily in the family's thinking
about the problem behaviour differently.
9. Therapists help bring about change in the family's thinking about the
problem by listening carefully and posing questions which generate new
ideas.
10. The therapist is part of the system, not an objective outsider and can get
stuck with a limited view of the system, hence many views are presented
in the therapeutic session.
\ ,
11.4.4 Definition of a Problem in Systemic Therapy
Difficulties are considered as arising from relationships and not from individual
people. Unlike psychodynamic therapies, family therapists do not locate
problems in the individual's internal states, emotional, cognitive or behavioural,
or in their personalities or individual history.
For instance, in the above case vignette, the family with 3 children, the family
came in saying that they are worried that their 15 year old is an angry person
and that this would affect her future life. The systems therapist would be
interested in their construction of their daughter as an 'angry person' and
would use circular questioning to get a behavioural description of what
behaviours they call 'angry' and 'not-angry', and what it means to be either.
The therapist asks 'who else in the family likes to fight and who likes to be
peaceful?' 'In what situations, and with which persons, does daughter show
more interest in being peaceful?'
This shift away from individual guilt and individual pathology to looking into
how the parts of the system interact, is an important aspect of freeing the
family from being stuck with a problem definition that is pathologising and
hinders problem solving. Rather the focus is on the parts of the system from
where problems have emerged. In the above case, the focus shifts from a
labeling to an interactive description. The therapist asks, 'how do you explain
her many friends at school and her good interactions with them and the wish
to fight at home?'. It emerged that the daughter felt discriminated against at
home in comparison to her brother who was favoured by father and
grandparents. Overtime she had only become confrontational with the family.
The family had a cultural bias favouring male children, even though daughters
were cared for and loved. When the family saw that unintentionally they had
sent out mixed signals they talked to elders in the family and made significant
changes in their interaction with the children to correct the imbalance between
boys and girls at home.
Problem development happens when the family is stuck and unable to respond
to emerging situations appropriately. Overtime patterns develop that leave
families with a limited range of options. The rules governing behaviour become
fixed and make it difficult for the family to change. Dominant voices and
views have subjugated other discourses so that this creates problems for the
system.
Wider system~ may also create problems for the family and the individual
members. Attention must be paid to power relationships in immigrant families
as well as to ethnicity, race, gender and all relationships where abuse may
exist because of some people holding greater power because of being a
majority, or of higher status or holding more resources.
Systemic therapists formulate as many hypotheses as they can of what the
problem in the system may be. They are not bogged down by anyone
explanation because they believe that there is no one truth, instead they
believe in multi-versions. Each version may be valid from the standpoint of
the people who see it from their vantage point. But all problems are formulated
in terms of relationships that are recursive. This means that people impact
each other in a circular causality, rather than a linear one.
Systemic Family Therapy
59
Schools of Family Therapy
60
11.4.5 Function of the Symptom
The problem or symptom is seen as serving a function for the system. The
symptom bearer is usually the person who is showing some difficulties and
is brought in by the family to be 'cured'. The family therapist thinks of this
person as the 'identified patient', the symptom bearer for the family system.
The symptom is viewed as a communication about the context of the family.
For example, sadness in one member may be a communication that the family
is mourning the loss of someone, or failing in school leaving exams may be
a communication that the family is not ready to enter the next phase of the
family life cycle. The family therapist becomes very curious about the family
relationships and the purpose of the symptom that the identified patient is
showing. Through talking to the family and exploring the relationships around
the presenting problem, the therapist actively seeks different explanations for
the symptom development. Exploring the context of the family's life and the
meaning they give their present difficulties will lead to a reformulation of the
problem in an interactive form as existing within the domain of relationships.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. List the three forms of systemic family therapy.
2. What are the key featuers of systemic family therapy?
.................................. ~ " .
11.5 CONCEPTS THAT HELP TO UNDERSTAND
FAMILY COMMUNICATION PROCESS
Communication theory has developed 5 principles (Watzlawick et al., 1967)
that can help you to understand complicated communication processes, in
particular the rules governing family interaction. These are discussed below:
• Human communication is a complex process. Verbal and non verbalV
bodily communication is an example of such process. Analogue and
digital is another way of describing human communication process. In
digital communication there is no similarity between the expressed sign
and its meaning-for example the word 'cry' in itself does not have
anything 'crying' about it. Words and language, are digital in
I
communication. They are complex and open to wide interpretation. In
analogue communication, there is similarity between what is expressed
and the manner in which it is expressed, for example tears are a form
of analogue communication. The information can still be ambiguous for
example, tears can be for joy, sadness, anger, relief or other emotions.
As a person acquires language, communication becomes increasingly
'digitalised'. A young child uses the word 'ma' as an analogue
communication to express need for food, love, other sensations and
situations associated with mother. Later, the word is used in a narrower
definition of a person called 'mother'.
• When people are in any kind of relationship with each other, all behaviour
in interpersonal situations contains communication messages. One cannot
not communicate. A person who is not attempting to communicate, who
has withdrawn from an interaction, is paradoxically still communicating
because non-communicating is a form of communication too.
• Every interpersonal communication is not only exchange of information
about some topic, but also contains a message regarding the relationship
between the people interacting.
For example: Two people A and B are discussing what to cook for
dinner. They discuss what vegetables are available (content or subject
talk). During the talk, person A agrees with the opinion of person B
(communication message about the relationship between the two people) .
.Family therapists are more interested in the latter, which is talk about
the process. Did person A show agreement because person B is higher
in hierarchy ( older, higher in the family constellation, employer, teacher
or more experienced) than person A?
If both persons recognise the relationship (student-pupil, employeremployee, or as husband-wife who are equal partners in decision making)
and agree with it, the communication will be clear. However, if the
definition of the relationship is unresolved between them (person A and
person B are rivals for a dominant position) the conversation will lead
to conflict.
• The nature of a relationship between people is determined by the way
they punctuate the communication between them. For example, a husband
. and wife each have their own perception of their interaction as having
happened in a particular sequence, and each of them also have their own
version of cause and effect. The husband says he withdraws because of
his wife's nagging, while the wife says that she nags him because he
withdraws from her. This is one way of punctuating the sequence of
interaction, and it influences the meaning that is given to it. Each of
them blames the other. Their own behaviour is then seen merely as a
reaction and therefore 'innocent'. This type of thinking will lead to
repetition of this interactional pattern. Change can happen when a different
way of punctuation is facilitated by the family therapist. The therapist
and the family have to be able to see the process between people, 'the
process which connects them'. Rather than seeing the individuals and
their individual viewpoints, and debating on who is to blame, or who is
at fault, we have to accept each punctuation as a point of view. We have
Systemic Family Therapy
61
Schools of Family Therapy to understand the process of interaction and be able to have multiple
punctuations of any interaction. This is the crux of the systemic 'circular'
view. It can be challenging for a novice because we are used to thinking
. in terms of either/or. Either good or bad, either in the wrong or in the
right, either this version of events or that version of events, either
responsible or irresponsible, or other dichotomies. Holding different
punctuations or views of an interaction is something that you can start
doing. anywhere-at home, in the office, at the market. Just try to see
things from different viewpoints and theri try to understand the whole
sequence of responses.
• Communication between people is either symmetrical or complementary
.depending on whether it is based on equality or difference. Bateson
(1972) introduced the idea that there is a dynamic equilibrium in
relationships based on these two types of patterns of relating. Examples
of complementary relationship are doctor-patient, mother-child,
aggressive-submissive, that is they are different but 'fit' together based
on hierarchical positions of dominant or inferior. Haley (1963) elaborated
on this by distinguishing two positions of complementary behaviour;
these are:
• One-up (being in control or leader) and one-down (being taken
care of or follower).
• Over-adequate-under-adequate functioning relationship in which
one person does the work of the other, for example when a mother
does the parenting work in order to compensate for the father's
absence from home.
Examples of symmetrical relationships' are siblings competing for parent's
attention, that is in similar position in relation to a third party (in the example,
the third party is the- parent or the parental subsystem), but different in
themselves. Most long term relationships are reciprocal, that is they alternate
between symmetrical and complimentary.
11.6 SYSTEMIC IDEAS ABOUT CHANGE
When unexpected change occurs, in order to survive, a system can:
• try to stay the same by pretending that nothing has changed, or by
reinforcing its rules rigidly, thus causing symptoms to develop,
• Remove itself from the new environment, which is not possible in most
cases,
• Adapt by making small changes, and
• Change its own internal structure of rules, patterns and meanings in a
way that it is authentic and coherent for itself.
Thus, a system has the capacity for both, maintaining stability (homeostasis)
and change (morphogenesis) and both are properties of a family system.
Now, we will discuss these processes in detail.
62 Homeostasis: Homeostasis is the tendency to stability or protects the system
from disorganisation or chaos and is as necessary as the capacity for change.
A system will be consistent with its belief and interaction patterns even when
they cause pain, create problems or are otherwise apparently dysfunctional.
This is because these patterns serve the purpose of consistency or retaining
something that is known. Family members can predict what will happen and
how others will behave. This helps them to reassuringly define themselves
like 'this is who we are, and this is how we do things' . Even the most painful
repetitions of behaviour offer comfort because they are dependably reliable.
In any family the forces of homeostasis can vary from a limited number of
rules about behaviour to a wide range. The system will correct itself when
there are small changes to be made in order to remain stable, like in a seesaw where small adjustments are made in order that the see-saw retains its
position.
Morphogenesis: Morphogenesis or: the forces for change or are also a
property of a system and is seen as a necessity for survival. The capacity to
change causes new behaviours and beliefs to be created. Systems switch
between times when the forces of change are stronger than the forces of
stability and the family feels sufficiently drawn to giving up its fainiliar and
reliable rules and patterns to venture into new and unexplored ways of
relating.
Change Process
A system is able to change in several ways. Some of the ways are discussed
below:
• Some parts of a system can change but the system itself does not
change: These changes are corrective and maintain the stability of the
system The system does not learn anything new, and therefore does not
increase its options for problem solving for the future. Cause and effect
are still only linked in a linear way. This is called first-order change. The
system responds to pain and corrects itself because of the negative
feedback, and thus the system is kept at a constant level.
• The system changes qualitatively: It means, the rules that govern the
system change. This is called second order-change. The system's ability
to learn is enhanced and future adaptability is increased. Second-order
change is evident when small therapeutic interventions produce large
changes in families. Change is based on feedback in which small deviations
are encouraged by positive feedback so that new structures of behaviour,
rules, meanings and beliefs are developed.
The goals of therapy largely determine which type of change is being
consciously or unconsciously sought by the family. The preference of
the family will make itself known in many ways,. stated clearly as well
as shown through behaviour, use of language and repeated phrases, and
it is for the therapist to follow the feedback and to hypothesise what
.meaning and repercussion that change will have for the family. Some
families want a return to status quo, that is, the condition that existed
in the family prior to the appearance of the symptom. If one wants new
patterns of behaviour and improved problem solving abilities then secondorder change is the aim of therapy. In practice it is seen that different
members may want different types of change or families themselves will
Systemic Family Therapy
63
Schools of Family Therapy want different outcomes at different times. When there is more difference
between people about the direction and amount of change there are
more difficulties and symptoms become entrenched.
• Change happens through new information: In second-order change
there is a small or big change but always a fundamental change in
relationships through positive feedback to the system. Bateson (1979)
calls such changes 'a difference that makes a difference'. Systemic
family therapists conceptualise new information somewhat differently
than the normal definition of information. Information is only information
when it is recognised and responded to as being different from earlier
manifestations. For example, when a son who is known in his family for
his 'aloofness, sits together with the family and talks to them, it is different
behaviour. The family responds to this by talking with warmth and
openness. When the family reflects about what was different today, it
emerges that the son had not been criticized today for being a failure in
his board exams by his parents, instead he had been .r.couraged by them
and consequently had joined in the pleasant talking. If no-one had noticed
this new way of relating it would have been forgotten and the more
dominant narrative of 'aloofness' would have continued. Instead, there
is a new narrative of mutual respect and participation in the family.
'News of a difference makes a difference' Bateson's words guide a
systemic therapist to search for and highlight new information or
exceptions to a taken-for-granted way of behaving.
• Change either/or frame to both/and: When we attempt to expand our
frame of reference from either/or to something more inclusive of all
viewpoints or punctuations it is useful to think in terms of a frame of
'both' (either this or that) dichotomous viewpoints plus add some more
viewpoints ('and'). This resulting frame of 'both/and' represents the
systemic idea of there being no one right version but there are multi
versions of any event. This post-modern frame encourages circular
thinking.
• Change from focus on content to process: Most families come in
describing 'what' (content) happened and as pointed out earlier the
narrative is punctuated by individuals from their individual frame of
reference. Such talking, no matter how thorough it is, can not lead to
change with couples or families unless we include talking about 'how'
(process). This switch can lead to punctuation that shows us the patterns
of interactions. The meanings that interactions have for the participants
can only emerge in talk about process of communication. When families
are observed by the therapist as they talk about the content, therapists
can observe the areas where the family is stuck in redundant patterns.
When the therapist intervenes by focusing on process, new information
will emerge about the process of the family's communications, which is
amplified by the therapist to facilitate change for the family.
64
Systemic therapists also are cautious about content talk when it is focused
on symptomatic behaviour that pathologises one or more members of a
family. This kind of talk may be harmful because the more the therapist asks
questions about it, the more it is described, and as the therapist listens it
appears as if the description is being accepted. The power to define the
'problem' is handed over to the person or persons who are describing it. It
is important that the focus shift to the process of how the problem came to
be defined, and who were the people involved in this description and who
were not. The therapist thus feels free not to accept the dominant pathologizing
explanations and descriptions, and instead can show respect and create room
for new descriptions. Another area where it is important to move in and out
of talk about content is when content talk is too dominant about anyone area
of the family's life or relationships. At anyone time there are many areas that
can be usefully explored and it is important for the systemic therapist to keep
moving between them rather than getting stuck with one aspect of it and
drawing too many conclusions or meanings from it. All hypotheses must be
explored. A family session may go like this - move into content, stop short,
move into process, stop short, omitting any conclusion or further exploration.
This way content or process are part of a recursive rhythm that reveals
'many threads that can be woven into a fabric of meaning for the family'
(Inger & Inger 1992).
2. Enlist some ways in which system is able to change.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Match the following:
i) Digital communication a) The tendency to stability
ii) Morphogenesis b) Condition that existed in the
family prior to the appearance of
the symptom
iii) Analogue communication c) No similarity between the
expressed sign and its meaning ,
iv) Homeostasis d) The forces for change
v) Status quo e) Similarity between expressed
emotion and its meaning
Systemic Family Therapy
65
Schools of Family Therapy
66
11.7 PRACTICE OF SYSTEMIC FAMILY
THERAPY
In this Section, we will discuss practice of systemic family therapy.
11.7.1 Convening the Family
Convening the family can be easy or it can be the most difficult part of the
whole therapeutic process (Bumham,1986) depending on therapist's skill,
the nature of the problem, family factors, the institution's intake procedure;
and the referring person. While it is possible to work with parts of the family
system it i~ important to convene the whole family or any significant others
for the following reasons:
i) The systemic nature of the problem is clearer to all, including the family,
ii) "If people don't attend in the beginning it is more difficult to bring them
in later, which is also true in couples work,
iii) The interactional nature of the problem and it's solution is revealed with
all present, and
iv) The therapist is less likely to be influenced by the people present about
the people who are absent.
Convening skills: The more the convening is done in a routine matter-offact way by everybody concerned, including the telephone operator or
receptionist, the more compliant the family. However, some skills are required
for successful convening. Clients may ask why should everybody come when
the problem is only with Zaheer and the other children are fine? The therapist
should answer in a way that does not blame anyone and also emphasises how
useful she or he has found this way of working. To answer, 'This maybe a
problem in the family' is to blame the family and will discourage the family.
A better response is, 'It is the best way to solve problems and results are
quicker' or, 'In my experience, it helps to use the family's strengths to work
effectively' or, 'We have seen that the family has useful information that helps
us in our work' or 'Right now we need' the views of everybody to help us
with our work'. Avoid using the word family therapy or systemic family
therapy unless directly asked the name of your approach or technique.
Technical jargon is unnecessary, ·calling a session a meeting, or discussion or
'talking together' is more democraticlanguage in which you and the family , .
are equals.
Whose responsibility is it to bring in reluctant family members?
It is better if one or several people in the family take responsibility for
bringing in reluctant members who are significant for family therapy. The
following steps may be followed:
• Listeri to the account of the person who has asked for the therapy,
• Re-state how important and useful it is for you to hear from all the
family members how you can -help them,
• Say that you really need to know. how this problem affects them and
others,
• Work out a meeting time that is suitable to the availability of all the
family members. This takes some time and needs patience, and
• Coach the person present on how to ask the reluctant member to join
the next session.
For a session in which the couple was to attend, if only the wife turns up,
the therapist should follow the above steps, and reduce the time for the
session by 15 to 20 minutes in order to not penalise the person attending but
also to keep to one's way of working which is to see the family members
together. Persistence gives results. In certain circumstances you can offer to
make contact with the reluctant member by telephone, letter or email if the
person will not object. It is better to ask the person attending whether it
would be alright for you to do so. The message conveys 'no blame' and is
an invitation to pres.ent their. viewpoint on the difficulties. It also should
convey that changes may be happening in the sessions that the absentee may
want to contribute to or know about. For example the therapist could write/
or say to a reluctant father - "I know that as a father you would have some
good ideas about your son's growing up and would want to be a part of
anything involving him, so I am calling you to find out when we could
possibly meet?".
Who to Invite
Convention varies, with some therapists insisting that the family therapy can
only happen when all the members are present, to other therapists who will
work with whoever from the family is interested in attending the sessions.
Clarify your own ideas about this prior to the session and then present them
confidently. Generally, you should invite all family members to attend, or any
other significant persons. The composition depends on who is significant to
the problem. Children benefit greatly by talking together with the family and
should be included in family therapy sessions.
Where to Meet
It is best to meet at your work place, meeting in the family's home is more
complicated and the family tends to not value it as much. If you have to meet
at their home because significant members are handicapped or physically
unable to come, then set out formal rules like:
• Ask all members to be present in the room undisturbed for 45 minutes,
• Ask them to switch off phones/TV/radio,
• Ask for chairs to be placed so that all members can see everyone, in a
circle,
• Ask household staff not to disturb the meeting, and
• Children should only have quiet toys or drawing material to play with.
When to Meet
There needs to be structure, as well as flexibility in fixing the time for
sessions. To be too vagu~ and leave session time too 'open conveys a nonseriousness of your intentions, while being too rigid does not work when
Systemic Family Therapy
67
Schools of Family Therapy
68
arranging for the whole family as well as the worker to be available. Leave
some days with fixed timings for family sessions, say, Tuesday and Thursday
afternoon between 10 a.m. and 2 p.m. Thus, you can offer choice to the
family as well as have structure. Say that the session will take an hour to
hour and a half in all, once a week, once a fortnight and later once a month,
and that every family needs a different number of sessions but that you will
try to keep the sessions to a minimum.
11.7.2 Mapping the Family Through the Genogram and
the Cultural Genogram
Genograms are diagrams of the family relationship system, usually involving
several generations. It shows .the. names, ages, dates of marriages, deaths,
divorces, births, illnesses, the emotional closeness or distance, or conflict
between family members. It can be used to map other pertinent information
such as violence in the family, or decision-making dyads in each sub-unit of
the family. The genogram is an important tool when used with a family
'because it can provide a transitional map of the family as it traces each
members and the family as a whole in their various transitions, namely, life
stages, cultural origins, family form, etc. Thus the genogram provides new
information to the therapist and family to support or discard hypothesis. It
is also useful in mapping different rates of change in family subsystems and
can present the family with a view of itself and its functioning. The cultural
genogram is a variation of the genogram in that it maps the influence of the
family's culture on their behaviour, rituals, meanings and transition points.
Both genograms are part of the systemic therapist's tool kit to help the
family to change as it needs to.
11.7.3 Identifying Transition Stage: The Family Life Cycle
Most families experience some difficulties when they are in a transitional
phase in family life. The family life cycle is an important tool to understand
their difficulties. This framework or model outlines different stages that families
pass through. There are cultural variations as well as different life stages for
different family forms but all families change during their span of existence.
At each stage the family has to negotiate various changes in structure,
composition, roles, hierarchy, position in social status etc. Each stage has its
own tasks that have to be accomplished these are emotional, psychological
behavioural, symbolic, rituals, economic tasks etc. The triggers for change
are generally exit and entry of people in the family and formation of bonds
among various members. People may exit through death, divorce, migration,
cut-off, marriage, desertion etc. People enter through birth, marriage,
friendship, work, romance, bond formation, or extra-marital relationship.
For example, an Indian family may experience transition 'points at many
stages as in the example given below which starts with the marriage of young
Mr. and Mrs. Jain, who live in a three generation family.
1. Their marriage-stage tasks: It includes joining of couple formation,
integration of new member in Mr. Jain's household and loss of member
in Mrs. Jain's household and entrance of son-in-law.
2. Birth of first child-stage tasks:It includes change of couple relationship
to include parenting, involvement of other family members in childrearing, rise in status for couple, role change to mother, father, etc.
,
3. Family with adolescent children-stage tasks: It includes negotiating
relationship with between parents and children as they grow older,
preparing children to be responsible as they grow older, negotiating
entry of friends in adolescents' life, negotiating autonomy and cooperation
between different generations of the family, particularly grandchildren.
4. Illness/grandparent's death-stage tasks: It includes taking care of elders
in the family, mourning loss, assumption of more roles for Mr. Jain, renegotiating power hierarchy with his siblings, assumption of seniority
role by Mrs. Jain, their children's involvement with careers and new
relationships.
5. Split with household of father's male siblings-stage tasks: It may
include parents' grieving loss and also relief, re-negotiating relationships
with joint family, loss of old family identity and creation of new one,
changed economic circumstances and responses to that, new dwelling,
new ways of staying connected, maintenance of old rituals in new ways.
Most of the above transitions are culture specific. There will be variations for
families from different places, ethnicities, cultures and religious backgrounds
(Carter & McGoldrick, 1988). The family life cycle for different family forms
will also be different. For example, if the eldest child of Mrs. and Mr. Jain
were to be of a homosexual orientation, the Jains' expected life-cycle would
change in an unforeseen manner and may include task stages such as coming
out, disorganisation of family, conflict and hopefully integration of the life
choices of this family member. Divorce may be another unexpected life event
in any family that requires many small and big changes.
11.7.4 Areas for Investigation
At the initial intake it is useful to ask for information about:
1. The referral source and relationship with family,
2. Clinical information: It may include brief description of the problem and
how it affects every family member,
3. Experiences in previous therapy or other informal help,
4. Family information about all the people who are affected by., or have an
impact on the problem,
5. Expectations from family therapy, and
6. Scheduling information: It means who should attend, timing and frequency
of the sessions.
The first interview should also start the process of therapist and family
joining' to create a therapeutic relationship. The therapist should focus on
following things:
1. Identifying family strengths,
2. Addressing issues of race, gender, age, culture between the family and
the therapist,
3. Starting to track interactional sequences (who says what to whom and
when), and
Systemic Family Therapy
69
Schools of Family Therapy
70
4.· Developing therapeutic contracts by addressing client expectations,
negotiating own role, providing rationale for goals (for example, why it
is important to involve children) and roles (for example, the parents are
.responsible for supervising children in the session), exploring motivation,
and addressing issues of confidentiality.
There are many areas that the therapist explores such as gender issues, race
and culture, life cycle stages, nuclear or joint family experience, and other
areas that impact the particular family. Given below is a sample list of questions
to explore an intergenerational family as an example.
In assessing intergenerational dynamics the therapist may ask questions
regarding family issues from the past, current extended family relationships,
and future hopes for these relationships. Examples of such questions are:
• What stories from your family history have an influence on the thinking
and behaviour of family members?,
• Does your current situation remind you of any other similar situation in
your family of origin?,
• With which extended family member are you most comfortable with?
With which least comfortable?, and
• Do couples relate differently to each other in this generation than in the
previous generation? How will the next generation relate to their spouses?
11.7.5 Hypothesizing,Circularity and Neutrality
There are three guidelines for the therapeutic session (Selvini, et aI., 1980)
and these are:
Neutrality: This is a desired trait for the family therapist. No family member
is given the opportunity to feel that she or he has a special relationship with
the therapist. The same degree of emotional closeness or distance is maintained
to each family member. It helps in preventing the therapist from being drawn
into family strategies that reduce the effectiveness of the therapist in the face
of stormy or disturbing family events. The family therapist has empathy in
relating to the distress and pain and uses circular questions to talk with the
family rather than just reacting emotionally to one member's account.
Hypothesizing: It is the formulation by the therapist of a hypothesis based
on the information that is known about the family which is being interviewed.
It marks the starting point for the ideas that the therapist has and for the
validation or discarding of these ideas. If the hypothesis are incorrect then
new ones are made based on the information acquired during the testing of
the earlier ones.
Circularity: It is the conducting of the session based on feedback received
from the family in response to the information that is asked about relationships,
differences and change. The term circularity or recursiveness or circular
causality are used interchangeably to denote a sequence of cause and effect
that loops back to the cause and according to the feedback loop can impact
it to change. Cause and effect can be reversed in their impact on the individual
or family (in memory, family rituals) if not in time (time cannot be reversed).
For example, a family rule that was established in the past, is applied to the
present, and can be continued or modified in the future, according to the
feedback that the family system receives. The therapist asks circular questions
to elicit information that can be used as:
i) Feedback to the therapist to formulate hypothesis, and
ii) Feedback to the family to remain the same, or change.
11.7.6 Interviewing Techniques
Let us discuss two important interview techniques, that are as follows:
Circular questioning: It is a technique for asking questions about
relationships, specifically about differences and similarities in viewpoints of
family members, about context and meaning. Patterns of behaviour are revealed
as recursive through circular questioning. Questions are based on hypothesis
and help in confirming or discarding of the hypothesis. The purpose is to
gather new information and to create possibilities for change. Circular questions
are of many types.
Reflexive questioning: This type of questioning- is designed to challenge the
couples or families construction of reality, that is, their fixed and limiting
explanations and descriptions of a relationship or an event. Karl Tomm (1988)
has classified them into three categories called as hypothetical questions,
questions about the future and triadic questioning.
11.7.7 Interventions as Part of Therapeutic Process
A therapeutic intervention is the process of entering an ongoing system of
relationships for the purpose of initiating a change in the system. The therapist
intervenes in many ways, verbal as well as nonverbal. Interventions can be
direct or indirect, spontaneous or planned, and are chosen according to the
therapist's experience and the family's requirements.
Family therapy is known for a wide range of interventions, however most of
them involve the following steps:
i) Understanding thoroughly the family and its problems through talking to
them and observing them. The family's dilemmas must be framed in
•
clear terms of behaviour and belief,
ii) A respectful acknowledgement of the pain caused to them by their
difficulties and sincere appreciation of their efforts to seek solutions, and
iii) Selection of intervention for each unique family.
In systemic therapy the interview process is itself an intervention. It uses
following strategies for intervention.
• Questions as interventions: In family therapy the primary interventions
are the questions that the therapists poses to the family thus opening up the
conversation for the family members to examine their situation from all
viewpoints. In the grammatical form of questions there is something that
invites reflection and this creates possibilities for change, for something new
to happen. Even small changes in people's thinking or behaviour can have
profound change because it frees people from their habitual, stuck and rigid
ways. The therapist's questions are directed to help family members generate
Systemic Family Therapy
71
Schools of Family Therapy
72
greater flexibility and increased choices for themselves.
Everything that a therapist does is an intervention, so questions are not
randomly asked. All interventions have to be based on a systemic hypothesis
about the family and the symptom like, Is the symptom a temporary response
to a perceived crisis, or does the symptom serve a function to keep the family
the same, or to bring about desired change? The criterion for the therapist
in selecting questions is to choose those that enhance the family's own ability
to find suitable solutions for their difficulties.
• Reframing: This is an intervention used by systemic therapists and has
eveolved out of the positive connotation technique used by strategic family
therapists. It can also be called positive connotation. The difference appears
to be that the term reframing is more consistent with systemic therapy's
stance on neutrality towards outcome and being respectful of not manipulating
the client's experience.
In reframing, a concept or event or opinion is re-labeled or redefined to a
slightly different and more constructive perspective.
For example, a boy called lazy by his parents, is referred to as a 'boy who
likes to do things in his own time scale'.
A couple's complaint everyone fights a lot in their house at dinner-time, is
reframed by the therapist as having lively and passionate discussions at dinnertime.
This process by which we label feelings, thoughts, attitudes, behaviours and
events has been recognised as having a very significant influence on the way
we perceive reality. It appears that we construct our own reality on the basis
of our views that we impose on our experiences. Reframing effects an alteration
in the family's internal model of the world. Thus, from a systemic perspective,
not only the symptom bearer's behaviour is reframed, all the family members'
behaviour is reframed too. The reframing is based on a hypothesis about the
circular cause of a family's interaction patterns. This ensures therapist neutrality
and avoids linear ideas of causality.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Answer the following questions in your own words as a systemic
family therapist trying to convene a family.
i) The problem is only with Samuel, the rest are normal. Why do you
need all of us to come?
ii) My husband's schedule is so tight, he is traveling all of next week,
and again he will miss the session. Also he says that he does not
think that Sanskritika has any problem, its all in my head. So,
should I just come with Sanskritika?
2. For the next two life stages of Mr. & Mrs. lain's family given in
subsection 11.7.3..write the stage tasks that the family has to do.
i) Marriage of first child
ii) Birth of first grandchild
3) Reframe each of the following in a few words of your own
i) She gets hysterical.
ii) He is a miser, stingy about money.
iii)The children never do as they are told.
11.8 THERAPIST'S ROLE IN SYSTEMIC
COUPLEIFAMILY THERAPY
The therapist's role and function is crucial to the successful outcome of
systemic family therapy. The therapist takes a 'not knowing' stance,
acknowledging that the therapist is not the expert on the family or on what
Systemic Family Therapy
73
Schools of Family Therapy
74
exactly would solve the family's difficulties. The family knows much more
about itself and each of its members and the history of their life. They know
their strengths as well as their problems, and the reasons for each, more than
the therapist does. Sometimes families are too dis-ernpowered by society and
their traumatic experiences; and the professional helping system can disempower them more by taking decisions on their behalf. Hence, it is important
that therapists adopt a stance to give power back to the family.
The therapeutic relationship between the therapist and the family is 'decentred'
(Flaskas, 1996) and the relationship of the clients to their significant
others is central. The therapist's engagement with the family in systemic
therapy requires the therapist to make and hold connections with them that
are based .on respect and compassion. Circular questioning and reframing of
their problems creates a therapeutic bond. It may appear that the systemic
therapist is detached, clinical and uninvolved because of the neutral stance
and the hypothesising and circular questioning that the therapist, of necessity
undertakes. In fact, all of this requires a high degree of empathy. The neutrality
of the therapist does not mean disinterest about the family's distress or the
damaging situations they are experiencing. The therapist's empathy is a source
for the hypothesis and questions that the therapist employs. The therapist
uses her or his empathy to pick up on the possibility of suicide, illness,
violence, or abuse and to accordingly adjust their role to being an advocate
or social controller or doctor. The therapist has to constantly attend to and
adjust her or his relationship with the family and with the wider contexts of
the family.
II.S.1 Key Competency Skills
The important skills that a therapist should have are discussed as follows:
• Acknowledge difference and uniqueness,
• Acknowledge positive efforts from the family and its members. The
therapist appears to take a pro-family stance, giving a feeling of caring,
or sincerely attempting to understand in a non-judgemental way. This is
best done by recognising the desire of families for living in affectionate
and caring relationships,
• Focus on family process rather than an content of talk, including adeptness
at reading non-verbal communication and questioning of what experiences
underlies it,
• Constant reflection on one's actions and intentions, by switching between
taking the role of the other, viewing the world as she or he sees it, and
one's own thoughts and feelings,
• Constant soliciting of feedback from clients of the effect of one's actions
as therapist, the ideas that one brings to bear on therapy and interventions
so that the client voices have equal say in the therapy context,
• Creating a safe context for talking where all members and all views can
find expression, that is, patterns of abusive power relationships are not
repeated in the therapy room, and are blocked by the therapist,
• Constructing new and alternative plans and their consequences, and
• Exploring meaning, determining significance, and making tentative
interpretations.
11.8.2 Working with Co-Therapist, Reflecting Team and
Other Professionals
Working with eo-therapists, reflecting teams and other professionals in the
therapy room are activities that embody the post-modern ideals of openness
and reflectivity.
Co-therapy: Co-therapy refers to therapy in which two therapists work
together in the same room with the same couple or family. Either both are
listening and talking, or one talks with the couple or family while the other
one observes silently until such time that the 'lead' therapist asks the silent
therapist to share her or his observations. Sometimes the two therapists, after
talking with the clients, will turn to each other and have a conversation with
each other for a few minutes reflecting aloud about what they have heard the
clients speak. Then they will ask the clients to reflect aloud or comment if
they wish to, on what they the therapists spoke.
Reflecting team: This is the. method that Tom Anderson (1987) developed.
A team of family therapists observe a live session either on video tape or in
the next room or behind a one-way mirror, and give suggestions to the
therapist conducting the session while the therapy is occurring. They also
deliver the end-of-session message to the family through the therapist.
There are many reasons why teamwork has proven to be particularly effective
in family therapy. Some of them are explained below:
• In family therapy sessions, it is difficult for one person to observe and
process the flood of information that emerges,
• The eo-therapist or reflecting team ensures that the therapist is not
getting involved and drawn into the family dynamics or taking sides with
anyone member or subgroup,
• The main reason for using team work is to ensure that the family hears
a variety of ideas rather than only one interpretation or hypothesis. This
is the systemic post-modern stance of doing therapy collaboratively with
the family. No one view is seen to be better than others, all views are
valid and therefore the search for many explanations and many
descriptions is part of therapy,
•
• Working with eo-therapists or the reflecting team is an attempt to share
the power base of being the 'expert' therapist with other people,
• Encouragement to families to see their problems in a new light by
creating new perspectives from the team about the subjugated narratives
of the family through reframing,
• Using 'I' statements, the reflecting team members talk about the position
of the family members, often pushing the differences in their position to
extreme poles and debate on the dilemmas facing the family, thus clarifying
and opening possibilities for change,
• Observation for training and supervision of the interaction between
therapist and family is easier when the reflecting team can observe behind
the one-way mirror, and
• Heterosexual eo-therapy is recommended to minimise triangulation in
therapy with conflicted, divorcing, or divorced couples.
Systemic Family Therapy
75
Schools of Family Therapy
76
The multi-perspective may be introduced by the eo-therapist or team members
near the middle or end of the session, in the presence of the therapist who
remains silent till the eo-therapist or team has finished. The reflecting team
takes on the position of different family members or subsystems and then,
having experienced the family from different viewpoints, has a discussion in
front of the family. After the reflecting team finishes, the therapist asks the
couple or family members whether they agreed or disagreed and how would
they respond to what was said.
Sometimes other professionals such as the family doctor or a special educator,
religious or spiritual guide, may be invited to the sessions to help with the
therapeutic work. Their experience and advice may be sought by the therapist
in knowing the family dynamics-better.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. In your own words, explain why working with eo-therapists and a
team is useful for families.
11.9 RECOGNISING SUCCESS AND FAILURE
The framing of success or failure in'systemic family therapy is dependant on
the definition of success and failure. Unrealistic and undefined goals to measure
success will lead to a definition of failure either by the family or by the
therapist. Failure or impasse in systemic therapy should be seen by a systemic
therapist as an opportunity to re-think and re-hypothesise about the reason
for the deadlock. It is a challenge for the therapist to reframe the failure. An
impasse or no-change situation can be seen as:
• The family system communicating that it is not ready yet for change,
• The need to be slow and cautious to change is valuable for the family,
• The therapist-family system is at cross purposes with each other, working
towards different goals,
• Feedback to the family system from other contexts is increasing resistance
to change as the therapy is unsupported by other significant people or
institutions, and
• The therapist or therapeutic system is not suitable for a particular family,
and other experts need to be consultants to the therapy (cultural, language,
special educators etc.).
11.9.1 Indications that Therapy is Failing
Let us discuss some of the indications that show therapy is failing:
• Goals for recognising success or failure by the family and therapist are
different, vague or not discussed,
• Talk in sessions is repetitious,
• No new information is emerging,
• The therapist is no longer asking interesting questions,
• The family and therapist appear disheartened,
• The family report that there is no change at all, or things get worse,
• Feedback from others significant to the family is negative,
• Talk in the sessions is very general, and unfocused,
• Conflicts develop between therapist and a family member, and a tussle
for dominance happens repeatedly,
• One or more members talk all the time and others do not speak,
• Sessions are forgotten or missed, and
• Sessions are led by therapist and the family takes an increasingly passive
role.
11.9.2 Indications that Therapy is Successful
There are some indications through which one can judge that therapy is
successful. These are as follows:
• Symptoms decrease and the distress caused by symptoms is less,
• Feedback from the family system and context is positive,
• Talk in sessions is focused and pertinent,
• New information emerges in the talking,
• There are shifts and changes in what people say and do in the session
and outside sessions,
• More complexity and other contexts are brought into the conversation,
• There is a shared responsibility about participation and finding solutions
r
between therapist and family,
• All members participate and contribute to the session, and
• Family is attending sessions regularly as scheduled.
Systemic Family Therapy
77
Schools of Family Therapy
78
11.9.3 Therapist Factors and Therapist Context that
Contribute to Success or Failure
There are various therapist factors and therapist context that may contribute
to success or failure of therapy. Let us study some of these factors and
context in detail.
• The systemic model works best in a team or eo-therapists working
together. A lone therapist, particularly a beginner may find it harder to
see a number of people together, since there are so many people to
observe and attend to,
• Lack of training, supervision and support from the professions in the
mental health field (due to unfamiliarity) is a common reason for the
under-confidence displayed by therapists,
• Lack of fit between therapist and family regarding race, ethnic
background, social class, experience, and value system can cause
misunderstanding. Some theorists believe that a greater fit between
therapist and family is desirable. Certainly the therapist has to work hard
to prepare for working with people who are from different backgrounds.
In doing cross-cultural work, the therapist should do considerable research
on the family's historical and cultural roots,
• The therapist who adapts to the language and pace of change in any
particular family is likely to have a greater chance of success than one
who does not. This adaptation is part of the 'joining' process with a
family,
• The therapist who can regulate the emotional closeness or distance from
the family according to the messages that the family sends has a greater
chance of success. The therapist may not be as neutral with all members
as desired. If the therapist finds that some members of the family are
becoming alienated while others are being sided with by the therapist,
they must 're-punctuate' the relationship by asking themselves what is
the circular nature of these relationships and in which way the family
system has drawn the therapist 'into its patterns of relationships. Selfreflexivity of the therapist and feedback from supervisor or eo-therapist
or team are important aids to therapist neutrality, and
• Lack of support for family therapy in the institution or workplace may
be a reason for the failure of family therapy. The lack of support could
vary from the lack of a meeting room which is not large enough to
accommodate a family, or to questioning the validity of family work.
The most important advantage is that this method frees the therapist from
upholding a 'normative' or ideal view of family form and functioning. It
reduces the chances of therapist's negative judgement and blaming of family.
It also encourages therapists to' include other professionals and institutions
(including themselves and the context of therapy) in their systemic formulations
.thus freeing the therapist to be creative in increasing options for interventions.
/
11.9.4 Family Factors and Family Context
Similarly there are some family factors and family context that leads to
failure or success of family therapy. These are discussed below:
~ Resistance: Resistance by the family to outside help is but natural.
Families who are 'sent' for therapy resist the idea that it may help, and
they feel angry that someone is pointing out that there is something
wrong with them. Hypothesising about the resistance can help in
addressing the issue and thus, some families stay on in therapy. However,
some families may be too attached to their resistance stance in which
case the therapist has no option but to reframe it positively and encourage
the family to attend when they wish. The other type of resistance that
can sabotage family therapy is resistance to change. This often happens
because change has been a negative experience for the family; sometimes
several generations have suffered due to change. For example, a Sikh
family that had lost all 'their possessions due to partition in 1947, again
lost their house and several relatives during the riots of 1984. They
could not bear the pain of expressing hope about a better future. In this
situation the systemic therapist has to formulate a hypothesis that for
this family change has been a terrible experience. After mourning the
losses, the therapist begins to explore exceptions to the rule; that is
when change has been positive.
~ Disagreement about the nature of the problem: The disagreement
may be between family members or between family members and
professionals involved with some aspect of the problem. Examples of
disagreements are; Is the problem due to one member's behaviour or is
it caused by the family? Does the problem need medicines or therapy?
Professionals tend to take sides on such issues and the systemic therapist
needs to accept the various viewpoints and suggest that the family wants
so much to solve their problems that it is worthwhile to try all options
before rejecting any of them.
~ Family members want different outcomes from therapy: This is a
common problem in couples and family work. For example, a husband
wanted to continue his extra-marital relationship and his goal for couples
therapy was that his wife stop being hysterical and accept-the situation
while the wife wanted to come to therapy to make him realise his
mistake and give up the affair. In such a situation, the systemic therapist
has to attend to both and to carefully question the couple to find out a
common goal as a starting point. In this case the common goal agreed
to by both partners was to reduce the conflict between them for the
children's sake.
~ The context of the family: When work with a family is not progressing,
it is important to hypothesise about other sources for problems, for
example, neighbourhood, extended family, workplace, other people
involved with one or several family members etc. and to include that in
the therapy work. For instance.. therapy had not reduced the school fear
that an 8 year old boy was exhibiting until the family and therapist
convened a meeting with his class teacher in the school and it emerged
Systemic Family Therapy
79
Schools of Family Therapy
80
that there was a communication gap between parents and teacher due
to language difficulties, about homework tasks. It could also be
hypothesised that the intervention of a professional on behalf of an
immigrant family aided the creation of a cooperative stance from the
school.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. List atleast four indicators of success of systemic family therapy.
2. What are the indications of failure of systemic family therapy.
11.10 LET US SUM UP
In this Unit, you have studied about the concepts that are used in systemic
family therapy. This method allows the family to be seen together by the
therapist, which is useful in observing and intervening to help the families
resolve their difficulties. The shift in focus from linear to circular thinking is
the most challenging for a beginner. This method is non-judgemental as it
does not have a 'normal family' model. It can be used with families from
different cultural practices and family forms. Theories of communication and
pattern formation feedback loop allows you to understand how problems
develop and also how change can happen. The idea that 'ne~ information'
about the family can be useful to the family to initiate change is a simpleery
and very effective way that systemic therapists can use to help the family.
11.11 GLOSSARY
Analogue communication There is similarity between what is
expressed and the manner in which it is
expressed.
Digital communication There is no similarity between the
expressed sign and its meaning.
Positive connotation Provide families with a positive way of
looking at problematic_ behaviours.
System Any set of interrelated parts that is
structured on feedback.
Status quo The condition that existed is the family
prior to the appearance of the symptom.
The process of entering an ongoing
system of relationship for the purpose
of initiating a change in the system.
Therapeutic intervention
11.12 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise-I
1. i) False
ii) True
iii) True
2. Three common features of systemic family therapy and other models of
family therapy are given below:
i) The unit of treatment is the family; no one family member is singled
out as a patient;
ii) The family members are seen together for the session; and
iii) Therapeutic goals and methods are family centered, and the whole
family's welfare is of concern.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. Following are the three forms of systemic family therapy:
i) Systemic family therapy,
ii) Milan systemic model, and
iii) Narrative therapy.
2. Following are the key features of systemic family therapy:
i) The family or organisation is a system,
ii) Components of a system,
iii) Systemic theoretical concepts,
iv) Definitions of problem in systemic therapy, and
v) Function of the symptom.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. i)-c), ii)-d), iii)-e), iv)-a), v)-b)
2. Following are the various ways in which system is able to change:
i) Some parts of a system can change but the system itself does not
change,
Systemic Family Therapy
81
Schools of Family Therapy
82
ii) The system changes qualitatively,
iii) Change happens through new information,
iv). Change either/or frame to both/and, or
v) Change from focus on content to process.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
1. i) It is my experience that many heads help in solving problems better.
Your family has information and views that would help me a lot and
I would really value their involvement to help Samuel.
ii) .I am sorry your husband is so busy with his work and we have
missed having his contribution in today's session. I would really like
to know his opinion, whatever it is, because as a father he has some
special understanding of the relationships in the family and of the
people in it. Perhaps he could spare some time to tell me about it.
Could you convey this to him from me? Do you think you could
do that? I could adjust my time according to his timings as I am
sure that he would like to be involve in any developments regarding
Sanskritika. I would prefer to wait to start our work in order to
give him the chance to attend.
2. (i) Marriage of first child: Mr. and Mrs. Jain becoming in-laws,
assimilation of new member and another family, supporting couple
formation, re-adjustment of all other family relationships, more
freedom and more responsibilities for married couple, success/failure
in fulfilling social and cultural obligations.
(ii) Birth of first grandchild: New roles again for parents, grandparents,
and siblings, the household is expanding, resources of space, time,
etc. may be stretched. Members who are not married yet need new
roles in family.
3. i) She shows her worry or she shows she cares desperately.
ii) He is careful to preserve family resources or he has a habit of
•
saving.
iii) You have raised your children to have independent minds or the
children show that they are strong individuals already and that they
are not easily afraid of anything.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1. Families benefit from working with two therapists or a team of therapists
because 'they have the benefit of having more than one person thinking
about their difficulties and how to understand and help them. They get
many more new ideas and viewpoints which can open up more avenues
for positive change. They are not restricted by the views of only one
person. The team can also think in detail from the position of each
person in the family and this helps in making differences and similarities
clearer.
,
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1. Following are the indications of success of systemic family therapy:
i) Symptoms decrease and the distress caused by symptoms is less,
ii) Feedback from the family system and context is positive,
iii) Talk in sessions is focused and pertinent, and
iv) New information emerges in the taking.
2. Following are the indications of failure of systemic family therapy:
i) Talk in session is repetitious,
ii) No new information is emerging,
iii) Sessions are forgotten or missed, and
iv) The family and therapist appear disheartened.
11.13 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. What do you understand by the term systemic family therapy?
2. What are the key features of systemic family therapy?
3. Explain the process of systemic family therapy with the help of an
example.
11.14 FURTHER READINGS AND
REFERENCES
Anderson, T. (1987). The reflecting team: Dialogue and meta-dialogue in
clinical work. Family Process, 26, 415-428.
Bateson, G. (1972). Steps to an Ecology of Mind. New York: Ballantine.
Bateson, G. (1979). Mind and nature: A necessary unit. New York: Ballantine.
Burnham, J.B. (1986). Family Therapy. Routledge, London. E.P. Dutton.
Campbell, D., Draper, R. & Huffington, C. (1988). Teaching Systemic
Thinking. London: Karnac Books.
Carter, E.A. & McGoldrick, M. (1988). The changing life cycle: A frame
work for family therapy. New York: Gardner.
Cronen, V. & Pearce, B. (1985). 'Towards an explanation of how the Milan
method works: An invitation to a systemic epistemology and the evolution
of family systems; In: CampbeU, D. & Draper,C. (Eds.), Applications of
Systemic Family Therapy. London: Grune and Stratton
Flaskas, C. & Perlesz, A. (1996). The therapeutic relationship in systemic
therapy. (Eds.) London: Karnac Books.
Systemic Family Therapy
83
Schools of Family Therapy
84
Inger, I.B.& Inger, J. k1992). Co-constructing therapeutic conversations: A
consultation of re;ttt'~int. London: Karnac Books.
Rivett, M. & Street, E., (2003). Family therapy In focus. London: Sage
Publications.
Silva, E.B & Smart, C. (1999). The new family. London: Sage Publications.
Watzlawick, P., Beavin, J.H. & Jackson, D.D. (1967). Pragmatics of human
communication: A study of interactional patterns, pathologies and
paradoxes. New York: W.W. Norton & Co.
,
UNIT 12 COGNITIVE BEHAVIOURAL
FAMILY THERAPY
Structure
12.1 Introduction
12.2 Historical Roots of Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy
12.3 What is Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy?
12.3.1 Assumptions of Cognitive Behavioural Family therapy Approaches
12.3.2 Key Concepts of Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy
12.4 Processes in Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy
12.4.1 Clinical Assessment in Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy
12.4.2 Cognitive Interventions
12.4.3 Behavioural Interventions
12.5 Efficacy and Effectiveness of Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy
12.6 Let Us Sum Up
12.7 Glossary
12.8 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
12.9 Unit End Questions
12.10 Further Readings and References
12.1 INTRODUCTION
The cognitive behavioural perspective has made significant contributions to
understanding and treating psychopathology in individuals, couples and families.
The cognitive model was put forward by Beck in the 1960's. It proposed
that peoples' perceptions or spontaneous thoughts about situations influence
their emotional and behavioural reactions. Distressed individuals often have
perceptions about themselves, others and the world that might be incorrect
and dysfunctional. Cognitive interventions focus on teaching them to identify
and evaluate their cognitions and view reality more clearly. •
The tenets of this perspective are now being used in therapeutic interventions
with couples and families. This Unit focuses on cognitive behavioural family
therapy approaches.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Trace the historical development of the cognitive behavioural perspective
in interventions with couple and family dysfunction;
• Explain 'the primary assumptions and key concepts of cognitive behavioural
family therapy approaches;
• Elaborate on the therapeutic processes and techniques used in cognitive
behavioural family therapy; and
• Critically evaluate the theory and practice in this field. 85
Schools of Family Therapy 12.2 HISTORICAL ROOTS OF COGNITIVE
BEHAVIOURAL FAMILY THERAPY
Early foundations of the cognitive behavioural approach to interventions with
couples and families can be traced to the work of Albert Ellis (1977). The
rational-emotive behaviour therapy approach (REBT) to family work placed
emphasis on each individual's perception and interpretation of the events that
occur in the family environment. Ellis and his colleagues proposed that
relationship dysfunction among couples occurs when an individual;
a) holds irrational or unrealistic beliefs about her or his partner and
relationship, and
h) makes extreme negative evaluations when the partner and relationship do
not live up to such extreme expectations.
These illogical beliefs and distortions serve as the foundation for emotional
distress and lead the individual to behave in negative ways toward the partner.
The A-B-C framework proposed that family members tend to blame their
problems on certain activating events in the family environment (A). They are
taught to probe for irrational beliefs (B) which have emotional and behavioural
consequences (C). These are then to be logically challenged by each family
member and finally debated and disputed (see Fig. 12.1).
Fig. 12.1: A-B-C Theory in Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy
The therapist uses an active and directive approach to modify beliefs and
expectations to fit a more rational basis and thereby improve the quality of
family relationships (Ellis, 1978). However, the 1960's and 1970's were
dominated by the family systems theory and the REBT approach with problems
in intimate relationships did not gain much popularity and acceptance.
Around four decades ago, behavioural interventions with children and adolescents
began to include the reinforcement strategies, contracting and negotiation,
communication skills and problem-solving strategies with family members as
well (Patterson, McNeal, Hawkins & Phelps, 1967; Patterson, 1971; Jacobson
& Margolin, 1979; Liberman, 1970). Gradually, behavioural principles and
techniques that proved their effectiveness with individuals were applied to
distressed couples and families. This behavioural approach too was viewed
as simplistic, and as one which did not account for all the complex interactions
within a family system.
86
Around the late 1970s and 1980's cognitions were included as an important
component of behavioural therapists who worked with individuals, couples and
families (Margolin & Weiss, 1978; Baucom, 1987; Dattilio, 1989). Family
member's thought processes became a central focus and was addressed
systematically. Tracing the historical roots reveals that cognitive behavioural
couples and family therapy grew out of the behavioural approach, initially as
an additional component and later as a more comprehensive system of
intervention which included various aspects of the family's interpersonal and
physical environment.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Describe the A-B-C theory proposed by Albert Ellis as part of Rational
Emotive Behaviour Therapy.
12.3 WHAT IS COGNITIVE BEHAVIOURAL
FAMILY THERAPY?
Cognitive behavioural family therapy approaches are characterised by certain
underlying assumptions and intervention methods. These distinguish cognitive
behavioural approaches from other forms of interventions with families.
Kendall & Hammen (1988) highlighted four basic assumptions underlying
cognitive behavioural therapy. These are as follows:
1. Patients respond to their interpretation of events, not the reality,
2. Thoughts, behaviour, and feelings are interrelated and therefore influence
each other,
3. Successful therapy depends on changing the way patients think about
themselves and the world, and
4. It is important to change both behaviour and thinking.
Cognitive behavioural family therapy is a time-limited and structured approach
with sessions usually held once to twice weekly. Interpersonal factors important
in any form of therapy are also important in cognitive behavioural family
therapy. It emphasises a collaborative approach, fostering a strong therapeutic
alliance, in which the therapist and family members function as a team. The
therapist engages with clients in a process of "collaborative empiricism" to
investigate the validity of their thoughts and beliefs. Within this goal oriented
framework, the therapist helps clients to specify their treatment goals clearly
and teaches them to use skills (cognitive and behavioural) to practise in sessions
and through homework assignments. This educative problem-oriented process
is a hallmark of the cognitive behavioural stance.
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
87
Schools of Family Therapy
88
12.3.1 Assumptions of Cognitive Behavioural Family
Therapy Approaches
Cognitive behavioural family therapy assumes that an individual's emotional
and behavioural reactions to life events are shaped by her or his interpretations,
rather than solely by objective aspects of the events (Beck, 1976; Ellis,
1978). Behaviours of family members are seen as constant life events which
are interpreted and evaluated by other family members (Epstein & Schlesinger,
1996).
This framework explains the development of family conflict as arising from the
mutual influence of family relationships, cognitions, emotions, .and behaviours
on each other. This includes the premise that family members simultaneously
influence and are influenced by each other. Consequently, the behaviour of
one family member leads to behaviours, cognitions, and emotions in other
members, which, in turn, elicit cognitions, behaviours, and emotions in response
in, the former member (Dattilio, Epstein, & Baucom, 1998). The cycle can
escalate the dysfunctional family dynamics and conflicts. As the' number of
family members involved increases, the complexity of interaction also increases
and the conflict can spiral.
Epstein and Schlesinger (1991, 1996) described four ways in which family
members' cognitions, behaviours, and emotions may interact and build to a
crisis and crystallise into family patterns and permanent styles of interaction.
These are outlined below:
1. The individual's own cognitions, behaviours, and emotion regarding family
interaction (for example, the person who notices himself or herself
withdrawing from the rest of the family).
2. The actions of individual family members toward the individual.
3. The combined (and not always consistent) reactions that several members
have toward the individual.
4. The characteristics of the relationships among other family members (for
example, noticing that two other family members usually are supportive of
each other's opinion).
The cognitive behavioural perspective is based on assumptions regarding a
variety of cognitive variables that influence the quality of family relationships
(Baucom & Epstein, 1990; Dattilio, 2005, Epstein & Baucom, 2002). Although,
cognitive processes do not cause all emotions and behaviours, they play a
significant role in the interactions between emotions, behaviours, cognitions and
events.
12.3.2 Key Concepts of Cognitive Behavioural Family
Therapy
Let us discuss some important concepts of cognitive behavioural family therapy.
These are given below :
1. Family schemata: Core beliefs or schema occupy a central position in
cognitive therapy as proposed by Beck (1976). Epstein and associates
(1988) propose that these schemata are "the longstanding and relatively
stable basic assumptions that she or he holds about how the world
, ,
works and her or his place in it". For example, if a child is given love
and attention from parents only in response to specific desired behaviours,
then the child might develop a schema that "love and attention are
conditional". While individuals have basic schema related to themselves,
others, their world and future, families also have jointly held cognitive
beliefs or assumptions formed through the years of interactions together.
Family schemas have strong influences on how individuals think, feel and
behave in the family context. Schwebel and Fine (1994) described family
schemata as: "All of the cognitions that individuals hold about their own
family life and about family life in general. Included in this set of cognitions
are an individual's schema about family life, attributions about why events
occur in the family, beliefs about why events occur in the family, and
beliefs about what should exist within the family unit. The family schema
also contains ideas about how spousal relationships should work, what
different types of problems should be expected in marriage and how they
should be handled, what is involved in building and maintaining a healthy
family, what responsibilities each family member should have, what
consequences should be associated with failure to meet responsibilities or
to fulfill roles, and what costs and benefits each individual should expect
to have as a consequence of being in a marriage".
The unconscious and conscious beliefs associated with two types of family
schemata influence childrearing patterns and family interactions (Dattilio,
2005). One schemata is related to the experiences, perceptions and
interactions in the parents' families of origin and the other related to
families in general. The family schemata are not static and can change
over time, particularly as a response to major life events like major
illness, death of a family member or divorce.
2. Attributions: These are causal and responsibility explanations for
relationship events or behaviours that have already occurred. Family
members make attributions about both positive and negative characteristics
in each other. For example, "My mother does not listen to what I have
to say because she loves my sister more" or "My parents usually ask me
my opinion because they value what I have to say". Attributions stem
from the underlying beliefs or schemas that family members hold about
•
themselves or about others.
3. Expectancies: These are predictions of what will occur in the relationship
in the future. These can influence the emotional reactions and behaviours
of an individual and the other family members. For example, a woman
who believes that her husband does not enjoy spending time with her,
may predict that he will refuse any request she makes and therefore
withdraws from communication with him. This may further reduce the
couple's interaction, thus reinforcing the wife's initial negative belief.
Expectancies and attributions are closely related. For example, when
couples make negative attributions about their partner's behaviour as being
unlikely to change, it most often leads to emotions like anger and
depression and negative predictions about the future of the relationship.
4. Assumptions: These are beliefs that each family member holds about
other family members and of the relationships. These set of rules are
used to guide and make attributions about the causes of their own and
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
r
89
Schools of Family Therapy others' behaviours. For example, "My worth depends on what others
think: of me".
5. Standards: These involve individual's beliefs about what people and
relationships should be like. For example, how close parents should be
to their children or the manner in which forgiveness is granted.
Schwebel & Fine (1992) described various standards about family life
which forms part of a "family constitution". These include the following:
(i) Standards for interrelationships between family members,
(ii) Standards for division of labour,
(m) Standards for dealing with conflict,
(iv) Standards for boundaries and privacy, and
(v) Standards for individuals outside of the family unit.
The standards held by individual family members might be unrealistic. At
other times, they might create difficulties because although they are realistic,
family members hold different standards.
Automatic thoughts: These are spontaneous cognitions that often occur
in a fleeting manner and are mostly conscious and easily accessible (Beck,
1976). These may be positive or negative but tend to be negative in
conflict situations. For example, after an argument, a wife might think: "It
is too late to save this marriage". Or a husband might think: "My wife
is late again - she does not care about me." Individuals might accept
these negative automatic thoughts without questioning their validity. Often
schemas or bore beliefs might be revealed through an individual's automatic
thoughts.
Cognitive distortions: These are defined as irrational ways of reasoning
or errors of logic that lead to misconceptions or faulty assumptions. Table
12.1 describes some common cognitive distortions.
Table 12.1 : Some common cognitive distortions
Cognitive distortions Explanation
Cdnclusions are made in the absence of
supporting substantiating evidence. For
example, a man whose wife comes home
from work 30 minutes late .concludes,
"She must be having an affair".
Information is taken out of context and
certain details are highlighted while other
important information is ignored. For
example, a woman whose husband fails
to answer her greeting the first thing in
the morning concludes, "He must be
angry at me again".
Overgeneralisation An isolated incident or two is allowed
to serve as a representation of similar
90 - 1.- situations everywhere, related or_
Selective abstractions
Arbitrary inference
--------------------------
Magnification and
minimisation
Personalisation
Dichotomous thinking·
Labeling and mislabeling
Tunnel vision
Mind reading
unrelated. For example, after her
husband forgets to pay the electricity bill
once, the wife concludes, "He is totally
unreliable".
A case or circumstance is perceived as
having greater or lesser significance than
is appropriate. For example, after finding
out that the husband has paid more than
planned for a new car, the wife
concludes, "We are financially ruined".
External events are attributed to oneself
when insufficient evidence exists to come
to this conclusion. For example, when
the husband does not eat dinner after
returning late from work one day, the
wife concludes, "He must be
dissatisfied with my cooking".
Experiences are seen as either black or
white, a complete success or total failure.
This is otherwise known as "polarised
thinking" .
One's identity if portrayed on the basis
of imperfections and mistakes made in
the past, and these are allowed to define
oneself. For example, subsequent to
continual mistakes while learning to drive
a car, a spouse states, "/ am worthless",
as opposed to recognizing her error as
being human.
People only see what they want to see
or what fits their current state of mind.
For example, if mother believes that the
son has no respect for parents, she may
judge all his behaviour in that light.
This occurs when an individual believes
that she or he knows what another
person is feeling or thinking without
communicating directly with the person.
For example, "I know what Ashok will
say when he hears that / will be
working late tomorrow".
The conceptual foundations of cognitive behavioural family therapy have been
integrated to explain the interactions between negative automatic thoughts,
cognitive distortions, various individual and family schemata, life events and
experiences and related emotional and behavioural responses (see Fig.12.2).
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
91
Schools of Family Therapy
Schemas
~Cb~e)~ou0
Cfam~ C§arri~,
@AVIO~
Cognitive
Distortions
~OTI§)
q
Automatic
Thought
l t 10
Fiv. 12.2: Inlt:rrclaliollship~ bcrw ceu UlgnitlH tacrurs (Dauilio. 1(93)
b) Beliefs about what people and
relationships should be like.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the i'ollowing' question carefully and answer in till' space
provided below.
b) Check vour answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Match the following:
i) /\11 m none thinking
ii) I \utornatic thoughts
a) I,ongstanding. stable assumptions about
1:\l1lil) liiC
c) I',xperiences arc seen as either black
or white. a complete success or total
failure. I
d) Causal and rcsponsibilit. explanations I
for relationship events or bcha, iours that
have already occurred.
c) Conclusions are made in the absence
of supporting substantiating evidence.
iii) ,\rbitrdn inference
iv) lamilv schema
v) Standards
vi) /\ ltri but ions
I) Spontaneous cognitions th.u \)IlCIl, (lCClIt',
111 a fleeting manner and arc llluSll:- I
conscious and easily accessible.
12.4 PROCESSES IN COGNITIVE
BEHAVIOURAL FAMILY THERAPY
In this section, we focus on the processes in cognitive behavioural family
therapy. The areas examined are: the first phase of clinical assessment, followed
by the distinct cognitive and behavioural therapeutic techniques and processes.
12.4.1 Clinical Assessment in Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
The stage of detailed clinical assessment is essential before commencing
therapeutic intervention with distre~sed couples or families. Dattilio (2005)
listed the aims of the comprehensive clinical assessment as follows:
i) Identify the strengths and the areas of difficulty in individual family members,
in the couple and other family relationships as well as in the environment,
ii) Place each family member's current functioning in the context of their
developmental life stage and any recent changes or transitions, and
iii) Identify specific intervention targets in the areas of cognitive, behavioural
. and affective functioning.
:...
Similar to other family intervention models, here too the emphasis is on seeing
the family members together for the initial interview. The therapist is able to
make keen observations about the individual members' cognitions, behaviours
and emotional reactions towards each other and formulate hypotheses about
the patterns in their problematic interactions. The assessment specifically focuses
on the negative cognitions associated with conflicts in family interactions. It is
an opportunity to assess each member's reason for seeking treatment and
their specific expectations of change. The assessment spans information across
the family of origins, interactions and relationships (for example, significant
marital discord and violence in the father's parents), individual vulnerabilities
(for example, chronic physical illness in one partner), both current and historical
relationship dynamics (like longstanding differences in the couple's expectations
of intimacy and autonomy), influences of environmental changes and life events
(for example, loss of job), available resources and patterns of help seeking.
The therapist might choose to see family members individually as well, during
the assessment phase. This can serve multiple purposes; allowing individuals to
express their personal difficulties or to assess the need for additional individual
therapy for any member. However, the therapist clearly indicates that information
that affects the wellbeing of another family member cannot be kept confidential.
This ensures that the therapist remains neutral and does not appear to be
taking sides with any family member.
Observations of the family member's verbal and nonverbal communication and
interactions during sessions can yield valuable information. The therapist might
also assign the couple a task during the session; for example to discuss
,
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
93
Schools of Family Therapy
94
regarding their child's request for pocket money; and then observe their
communication and problem solving styles. Additionally, the therapist may use
questionnaires or other self-assessment tools to obtain further information during
this assessment phase.
The clinical assessment ends with a collaborative discussion between the therapist
and family members. The therapist provides a feedback regarding the assessment
and moves towards a consensus on the priorities for change. The therapist
then works with the family members to use a series of cognitive and behavioural
strategies to restructure the core beliefs of the family and altering and modifying
behavioural patterns.
12.4.2 .Cognitive Interventions
In this sub-section we will discuss some of the cognitive intervention. These
are given below:
1. Educating couples or families about the cognitive behavioural model:
The initial step discusses the basic concepts and structure of the planned
intervention. Family members are made aware that home work assignments
focusing on thoughts and behaviours will form an essential part of the
treatment. Ground rules for the therapy are laid out - for example, that
individuals should not tell the therapist secrets that cannot be shared with
other family members, and that verbally and physically abusive behaviour
is not allowed. The planning of explicit agendas for each session is also
discussed at the initial stage.
2. Identification and modification of automatic thoughts: Firstly, the
therapist introduces the concept of automatic thoughts and the need to
monitor those associated with negative emotional and behavioural responses.
Family members are encouraged to keep a systematic record of automatic
thoughts linked with relationship distress or conflict. This homework
assignment helps them to identify the links between these thoughts and
negative emotions and behaviour in their interactions. The therapist coaches
them to recognise that change is possible though exploration of alternative
cognitions that can lead to different emotional and behavioural responses
in those conflictual situations.
3. Identification of distorted cognitions: The therapist helps family members
to identify the distorted cognitions involved in their automatic thoughts
and label them in their daily record of dysfunctional thoughts. The therapist
directs family members to use the dysfunctional thought record and ask
themselves "What's going on through my mind now?" (see Fig.12.3).
Date SITUATION AUfOMATIC EMOTIONS COGNITIVE ALlERNAlE RESPONSE
DESCRIBE: THOUGIITS DESCRIBE: DISTORTIONS RESPONSE OUTCOME
1. Actual
event
leading to
unpleasant
emotion,
or
2. Stream of
thoughts,
day dreams,
or
recollection,
leading to
an
unpleasant
emotion,
or
Any other
thought,
feeling that
is felt.
1. Write
automatic
thought(s)
that preceded
emotion(s).
1. Specify
sad,
anxious/
angry, etc.
1. Write
rational
response to
automatic
thought(s).
1. Re-rate
belief in
automatic
thought(s)
0-100%
For example
Magnification,
Personalisation
etc.
Time 2. Rate
2. Rate belief degree
in automatic 0-100%
thought(s)
0-100%
2. Rate
belief in
alternative
response
0-100%
2. Specify
and rate
subsequent
emotions
0-100%
Questions to help formulate the ALTERNATIVE RESPONSE: (1) What is the evidence
that the automatic thought is true? Not true? (2) Is there an alternative explanation?
(3) What's the worst that could happen? Could I live through it? What's the best that
could happen? What's the most realistic outcome? (4) What should I do about it? (5)
What's the effect of my believing the automatic thought? What could be the effect of
changing my thinking? (6) If (person's name) was in this situation
and had this thought, what would I tell him/her?
Figure 12.3: Dysfunctional thought record (Dattilio; 1993)
4. Cognitive restructuring techniques: A range of cognitive restructuring
intervention strategies can be used to examine evidence to evaluate the
validity of automatic thoughts and cognitive distortions.
i) Socratic Questioning: This technique is the hallmark of the cognitivebehavioural approach and involves a method of questioning in a
nonjudgemental manner that does not requiring a 'correct' answer.
By definition, leading questions cannot be asked. This dialogue helps
family members to clarify and define problems, Assess the
consequences of specific thoughts and behaviours, re-evaluate previous
conclusions and develop new ideas. The aim is for family members
to learn to use this questioning approach themselves. Some examples
of Socratic questions are:
What is the evidence that supports this idea? What is the evidence
against this idea? Is there an alternative explanation for my family
member's behaviour? How can I get additional information that
will help me judge if my thoughts are logical and appropriate? What
is the worst thing that could happen? Could I live through it? What
is the best thing that could happen? What is the most realistic
outcome? What shall I do about it? What is the effect of believing
the thought? If I changed my thinking-what would be the effect?
What would you tell a friend in the same situation? (Epstein &
Baucom, 2002).
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
95
Schools ofFamily Therapy
96
For example, let us consider a situation in which the wife is upset
that the husband spoke to her in a gruff tone. The therapist might
guide the wife to ask herself questions like these:
• Does it follow that because my spouse spoke sharply that he
was angry with me?
• Are there alternative explanations for my spouse's tone of voice
(for example, he could have a cold or be stressed about
something at work)?
• Even if my spouse was angry, does it follow that:
i) My spouse doesn't love me?
ii) My spouse is always unfriendly?
ill) My spouse will make life miserable for me?
iv) I did something wrong?
Behavioural experiments can be used to challenge expectancies. Here
one family member acts in a particular way and then observes if the
other family member(s) behave in the predicted manner or not.
ii) Downward arrow technique: One of the most critical and powerful
techniques in the cognitive behavioural approach is the inductive
"downward arrow" method. This includes a' series of questions to
tap underlying meanings of family members' reactions. The technique
was initially used by cognitive theorists in individual therapy settings,
(Beck, et al, 1979) but has been effectively extended to therapeutic
work with couples and families.
An initial thought associated with an emotional reaction might be
extremely upsetting due to its association with other significant
questions. The therapist may clarify these by asking a series of
questions such as; "And if that happens, what will it mean to you?"
or "What will that lead to next?" Such questions can help uncover
the individual's real concerns and core beliefs or might uncover a
catastrophic expectancy that, in reality, might be unlikely to occur.
Dattilio (1993) discussed a chain of questions using the 'Downward
arrow technique' to uncover the schema underlying a woman's
behaviour of screaming during disagreements with her husband. By
starting with the initial thought and then asking, "If he doesn't listen,
what does that mean to you?" followed by a series of questions
about subsequent thoughts; the underlying schema of vulnerable and
helpless was uncovered (see Fig. 12.4).
DOWNWARD ARROW TECHNIQUE
"I need to scream because Harry doesn't always listen to me".
J-
"If I don't scream, I'll never be heard".
J-
"If I am not heard, I am nobody".
J-
"If I am nobody, I am helpless".
J-
"If I am helpless, people will run over me".
J-
"Harry will run over me and this will give him complete control."
Figure 12.4: Downward Arrow Technique (Dattilio, 1993)
Intervening in Family Schemas Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
Dattilio (2005) proposed a series of steps to facilitate the process of schema
analysis and restructuring:
(i) Uncover and identify shared family schemas and highlight the areas of
conflict and dysfunction that are fuelled by the schema. These are
uncovered by probing automatic thoughts and using techniques such as
the downward arrow technique.
(ii) Trace the origin of the family schemas and how they have evolved to
become a pattern within the family. This can be done by exploring the
couple's or parents' backgrounds and upbringing and comparing this with
their individual schemas.
(iii) Point out the need for change, indicating how the restructuring of a
schema can reduce conflict and promote more harmonious and adaptive
functioning.
(iv) Elicit acknowledgment and encourage cooperation from the entire family
for a need to change the dysfunctional schema.
(v) Assess the family's ability to make changes in their basic beliefs and plan
appropriate strategies as well as assess the degree of resistance to change.
(vi) Implement change through collaborative brainstorming for ideas to modify
belief. It is also critical to consider how family interactions and specific
behaviours would change if they live according to the modified schema.
(vii) Enacting new behaviours by using family exercises and homework
assignments to assess the impact of alternative behaviours and ways of
thinking.
(viii)Solidifying the changes involves establishing the changes through repeated
practice and also being open to future modifications as required.
Dattilio (2005) cautions that, at times, it may be necessary to focus on areas
• of an individual family member's schemas that may be causing the greatest
amount of family conflict. Reworking both individual and family schemas may
be very challenging as they are often rigid and families may be reluctant to
make changes that can disrupt the family balance.
12.4.3 Behavioural Interventions
The behavioural interventions in cognitive behavioural family therapy focus on
various aspects of family members' actions. These include (1) excess negative
interaction and deficits in pleasing behaviours exchanged by family members;
(2) expressive and listening skills used in communication; (3) problem solving
skills; and (4) negotiation and behaviour change skills.
Various clinicians have described the different interventions that are used (Dattilio
& Padesky, 1990; Jacobson & Christensen, 1996; Baucom & Epstein, 2002).
Some of these are discused below:
- 97
Schools of Family Therapy
98
• Communication skillstraining: Cognitive behavioural approaches include
an important focus on each family member's non-verbal and verbal
communication with each other. The therapist provides guidance in both
expressive and listening skills. Some examples of expressive skills are:
pointing out positives as well as problems, talking in specific rather than
in global terms, describing one's emotions as well as thoughts. Examples
of listening skills include nonverbal aspects like eye contact, attempting to
understand and empathise with the other's perspective. These may be
practised initially within the sessions, followed by homework assignments
involving communication on increasingly conflictual topics.
• Problem-solving skills training: The major steps in problem-solving
include: i) a clear definition of the problem in terms of difficult or absent
behaviours, ii) generating possible behavioural solutions without evaluating
either own or family members' responses, iii) weighing the advantages
and disadvantages of each solution, iv) selecting the solution that seems
to be feasible and acceptable to all members, and v) agreeing on a time
frame to implement and then evaluate the effectiveness of the solution.
• Behavioural change agreements: These are an important component
of intervention where the therapist negotiates a verbal or written agreement
with family members to facilitate behaviour change. The essential focus is
for each family member to make a commitment for change without waiting
for others to take the initiative and demonstrate change. These contracts
may include specific agreements to decrease certain negative behaviours
while simultaneously increasing positive behaviours or shared activities in
the family, for a specified time, on specified days of the week. Contracts
can also include contingency plans if conflict arises during the shared
times. Behavioural rehearsal during the sessions can help prepare family
members for the homework assignments.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Mark 'True' or 'False':
i) Cognitive-behavioural family therapy focuses on thoughts, feelings and
behaviours that have unconscious roots. True/False
ii) Individual family members are seen in separate sessions throughout
the assessment phase of cognitive behavioural family therapy.
TruelFalse
iii) Identification of negative cognitions is the hallmark of the assessment
phase in cognitive behavioural family therapy. TruelFalse
iv) Information about interactions and relationships in the families of origin
is an important part of the initial assessment. TruelFalse
/
2. Choose the correct answer:
i) In cognitive behavioural family therapy, the
is the method by which the therapist teaches the client to identify
and document thoughts and cognitions.
a) free association
b) dysfunctional thought record
c) dreams
d) transference
ii) All of the following are components of cognitive behavioural family
therapy except for:
a) downward arrow technique
b) working through
c) socratic questioning
d) cognitive restructuring
iii) A chain of questions using the can be
used by therapists to uncover core beliefs or schema.
a) empty chair technique
b) free association method
c) downward arrow technique
d) dysfunctional thought record
iv) In cognitive behavioural family therapy, analysis
uncovers shared patterns of beliefs held by families.
a) conflict
b) transference
c) schema
d) defense
3. Choose the correct answer:
i) Weighing the advantages and disadvantages of each solution is the
____ step in problem solving skills training. (third, fourth)
ii) Communication skills training includes guidance in listening and
_____ skills. (expressive, cognitive appraisal)
12.5 EFFICACY AND EFFECTIVENESS OF
COGNITIVE BEHAVIOURAL FAMILY
THERAPY
There is increasing research evidence suggesting that cognitive behavioural
family therapy is an effective psychological treatment for couples and families
in distress.
Research has indicated the effectiveness of cognitive behavioural interventions
in reducing couples' relationship distress (Baucom, Shoham, Mueser, Daiuto,
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
99
Schools of Family Therapy
100
& Stickle, 1998). Some studies combined cognitive restructuring techniques
with behavioural interventions and found that cognitively focused interventions
resulted in more cognitive changes while the behavioural techniques influenced
behavioural interactions.
Strengths of the cognitive behavioural perspective include collaborative
therapeutic relationship, problem-solving and skill-building approach and its
inclusion of cognitive, affective, and behaviour realms. Some criticisms of the
cognitive behavioural approach include the directive role of the therapist, its
relative neglect of underlying dynamics of family conflicts and emotional and
affective aspects. Dattilio (2001) has attempted to address some of these
criticisms and clarify the strengths and limitations of the cognitive behavioural
approac~ in family therapy. -
There has been considerable research supporting the role of cognitive
behavioural interventions in individual therapy. Further research is needed on
the effectiveness of cognitive behavioural interventions with distressed couples
and families, specific indications and contraindications, and comparisons with
different therapeutic and other family therapy models.
12.6 LET US SUM UP
In this Unit, we have learnt about cogmtive behavioural approaches ill
therapeutic intervention. The unit focused on:
• Tracing the historical contributors to the development of cognitive
behavioural family therapy approaches;
• Outlining the basic assumptions of cognitive behavioural family therapy;
• Describing the therapeutic processes and techniques in cognitive behavioural
family therapy; and
• Summarising the research evidence on the effectiveness of cognitive
. behavioural family therapy approaches.
12.7 GLOSSARY
Automatic thoughts: Spontaneous cognitions that often occur in
a fleeting manner and are mostly conscious
and easily accessible.
Cognitive distortions: Inaccurate or illogical thoughts which
maintain negative thinking and help to
maintain negative emotions.
Cognitive restructuring: The process of learning to refute cognitive
distortions or "faulty thinking," with the goal
of replacing irrational, illogical beliefs with
more accurate and beneficial ones.
Downward arrow technique: The use of a series of questions used by
the therapist to tap underlying meanings
of an individual's reactions. It's purpose
is to elicit the chain of inferences which
lead the individual to a given conclusion
from a specific fact.
Family schemata: The set of cognitions that individuals
hold about their own family life and about
family life in general.
Socratic questioning: A series of connected open-ended
questions that lead to a more logical
conclusion about an individual's inner
experiences.
Schemas: Cognitive structures that organise thought
and perception and have an integral
influence on emotion and behaviour.
Epstein et al. (1988) define an individual's
schemas as "the longstanding and relatively
stable basic assumptions that she or he
holds about how the world works and
her or his place in it".
12.8 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. The core of Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy is the A-B-C theory.
'A' stands for Activating Event which is an environmental situation or
event; 'B' represents the irrational and/or rational belief arising from the
person's evaluations of the event and 'C' is the emotional and behavioural
consequences following the belief.
~!liil ", '" •
(A) Activating Event
" '
·actual event , .
.• persons' immediate
interpretation of event
(8) Beliefs
• evaluations
.rational \i:
·irrational
-1"'--""
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1.
i) -c)
ii) -f)
iii) -e)
iv) -a)
v) -b)
vi) -d)
Cognitive Behavioural
Family Therapy
101
Schools of Family Therapy Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1.
i) False
ii} False
iii) True
iv) True
2. i) -b)
ii) -b)
iii) -c)
iv). -c)
3. i) third
ii) expressive
12.9 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. What are cognitive distortions? illustrate the important cognitive distortions
that are assessed in cognitive behavioural family therapy.
2. Elaborate on the concept of family schemas. Outline the steps involved
in modifying schemas during cognitive behavioural family therapy.
3. Describe the use of the dysfunctional thought record as a cognitive
restructuring technique.
4. Illustrate the use of socratic questioning and the downward arrow
technique.
5. Briefly discuss the use of communication skills training and problemsolving skills training in sessions with distressed couples and families.
12.10 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Baucom, D. H. & Epstein, N. (990). Cognitive-behaviour marital therapy.
New York: BrunnerIMazeL
Dattilio, E M. (1993). Cognitive techniques with couples and families. The
Family Journal, 1 0), 51-65.
Dattilio, E M. (2001). Cognitive-Behaviour family therapy: Contemporary myths
and misconceptions. Contemporary family therapy, 23.0), 3-18.
Datillio, EM. & Epstein, N.B. (2005). Introduction to the special section: the
role of cognitive-behavioural interventions in couple and family therapy. Journal
of Marital and Family Therapy.
Friedberg, R. (2006). A cognitive-behavioural approach to family therapy.
Journal of Contemporary Psychotherapy, 36 (4), 159-165.
Schwebel, A. I & Fine, M.A. (992). Cognitive-behavioural family therapy.
Journal of Family Psychotherapy, 3, 0), 73 - 91.
102
103
UNIT 13 INTEGRATED APPROACH TO
FAMILY THERAPY
Structure
13.1 Introduction
13.3 Historical Evolution of Family Therapy in India
13.3 Family Therapy - Integrative Sytemic Model
13.3.1 The Initial Phase of Family Therapy
13.3.2 Middle Phase of Family Therapy
13.3.3 Termination Phase of Family Therapy
13.3.4 Special Sociocultural Issues in Family Therapy
13.3.5 Constraint Factors in Family Therapy
13.4 Let Us Sum Up
13.5 Glossary
13.6 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
13.7 Unit End Questions
13.8 Further Readings and References
13.1 INTRODUCTION
In the previous Units, you have learnt the different schools or models of
family therapy. The main schools are the behavioural and psychodynamic schools
and the structural and strategic schools. The proponents of these schools
would necessarily teach and train in the pure forms of these techniques that
they described. In actual practice of family therapy though, the therapist must
decide on the school that best suits the family for therapy. F.or example,
behavioural therapy techniques require the clients to be extremely cooperative
in doing home work assignments and also role plays of sessions which may
not be possible with the rural and socio-economically backward families.
Psychodynamic therapy requires the clients to introspect quite a lot and talk
about influences and emotions from the past. This would require a certain
degree of psychological mindedness and sophistication. On the contrary, we
must also look at the comfort and knowledge of the therapist in doing the
different techniques. Novice therapists may find it difficult to understand or
actually carry out strategic interventions like paradoxical interventions and they
may rather be more comfortable with behavioural exercises that are more
concrete and structured. Hence in real day to day practice the therapist must
choose the therapy depending on the client, therapist and therapy fit. This
particular model would really be eclectic in its theory and would integrate
techniques from the different schools you have learnt so far about.
Schools of Family Therapy
104
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to :
• Know the historical evolution of family therapy in India;
• Understand an integrated model of family therapy; and
• Identify the constraint factors in family therapy.
13.2 HISTORICAL EVOLUTION OF FAMILY
THERAPY IN INDIA
Mental health professionals in India have always involved families in therapy.
But formal involvement of families occurred about one to two decades after
this therapeutic modality was started in the West by Ackerman.
Vidyasagar is credited to be the father of Family Therapy in India though he
wrote sparingly of his work involving families at the Arnritsar Mental Hospital
(Vidyasagar, 1971). Bell (1971) brought out a small volume based on this
seminal work. The therapy carried out by Vidyasagar focused mainly on the
index patient and involved families in the care of these patients. Families of
the patients supported each other though group participation. Subsequent to
Vidyasagar's pioneering work, two centres in India took up work with families.
The first such work was an unique experiment at the Mental Health Centre
at Vellore (Verghese et al. 1971) where all psychiatric patients were (and are
still) admitted with families to unit family rooms. The experiment is unique
because of the obligatory nature of admission with families. Over the years,
the work at this centre has focused on family education and counselling about
how to manage the index patient. Description of this work is available in other
references (Verghese, 2002 & Cherian, 2002).
The second experiment was the experience of dealing with families at the
psychiatric services at NIMHANS, Bangalore (Narayana et al, 1977).
Descriptions of this early work carried out at NIMHANS showed that families
were taught to cope with their burdens through education, counselling and
group support. Subsequent work with these families was elaborated by Bhatti
& Channabasavanna (1979), Bhatti et al., (1980), and Geeta et al., (1980).
These studies showed the usefulness of involving families in the management
of a variety of psychiatric disorders.
Box 13.1 Historical Evolution of the Model of Family Therapy at
Family Psychiatric Centre, NIMHANS
The Family Psychiatry Centre at NIMHANS was formally opened in
1977 though family work had been going on at the Institute since the
1960's. The Family Psychiatry Centre is essentially a referral centre with
patients being referred from adult psychiatry units, child guidance centres
and neurological services from all over India but mainly from Southern
states. NIMHANS also takes self referrals and referrals from outside
agencies like Family Counselling Centres and Family Courts.
The development of family therapy may be arbitrarily divided into 3
phases, the first phase in the 1970's, second phase in the 1980's and the
third phase 1990's. In the first phase, the work carried out involved the
studies of families with different problems and experiments in therapy.
This phase witnessed the development of different tools, like the Family
~----------------------~-----
Interaction patterns Scale and the Family Typology Scale (Bhatti et al.,
1985 & 1986). The family work at this time involved education,
counselling and coping skills with families of different psychiatric disorders
like hysteria, schizophrenia and bipolar disorders.
In the second phase, during 1980's the postgraduate students were posted
to the Centre and formal training was started. At the same time various
package programmes were started for different disorders like schizophrenia,
hysteria, epilepsy, and marital enrichment programme. These programmes
essentially used a behavioural framework and interventions with families
of the index patients. Some authors call this family psychiatry to indicate
that one of the members has a psychiatric disorder as opposed to family
therapy where family therapists predominantly deal with family discord.
The third phase (1990's) saw the Centre handling patients and families
with more difficult and intractable problems like poor prognosis
schizophrenia, conduct disorders in adolescents and personality disorders
in young adults and chronic neurotic conditions. With a simple behavioural
model of therapy, the clients stayed in therapy longer, got more dependent
and caught up with the therapy team and their problems took much time
to change. This caused dissatisfaction and frustration with the model that
was practised. This, together with systemic training and inputs received
from experienced systemic therapists, caused the team to shift to a more
systemic family therapy model. To match this change, the training curriculum
was also changed to more emphasis on looking at families with a general
systems perspective as a base, bringing in the concept of "circularity" and
more emphasis on the structural and strategic schools and also from the
psychodynamic and behavioural schools. This Unit will describe this
integrative systemic model of family therapy. We will discuss the stages
of therapy, the process and techniques used.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Fill in the blanks:
i) ______ is credited to be the father of family therapy in
India.
ii) is the place where family therapy started in India.
13.3 FAMILY THERAPY - INTEGRATIVE
SYSTEMIC MODEL
Most family therapists use an eclectic model to conduct sessions in family
counselling and therapy. As you have seen from the other Units there are
many schools and theoretical models for family therapy. Whichever school is
used the underlying principle and understanding of families is based on our
understanding of the family system. For this we have to be familiar with
An Integrated Aproach to
Family Therapy
105
Schools of Family Therapy
106
systems theory that you have read in earlier Units. Remember that the things
that happen in a family are never simply based on simplelinear cause and
effect. For example, the mother may beat a child because he was having a
tantrumHowever, we must remember that the child's tantrum and the mother's
strictness to the child may be determined by each of their relationships with
the father. The father could be lenient and over indulgent to the boy and
hence, the child shows tantrum. Also, the marital relationship may be strained
and that makes the mother more angry and frustrated with the child's tantrum.
So, we can see that we need to be "circular" to understand family interaction
patters and there is a need to handle all the sub-systems in therapy. The
interventions also have to account for all the persons involved in the family.
In the example given above it is not just enough to do therapy with the child
with tantrums and to help the mother with parent-child training; it is also
, important to work with the couple on their marital relationship so that their
interactions and messages to the child are uniform. With this background let
us- now look at a systemic integrated model of therapy in the Indian context.
You will see how all the schools of therapy have a basis in the family systems
theoretical model.
13.3.1 The Initial Phase of Family Therapy
The initial phase of therapy can be divided into different stages, like:
• The referral intake,
• Family assessment,
• Family formulation and treatment plan, and
• Formal contract for therapy.
• The Referral Intake
Patients and their families are generally referred, They are usually referred as
some family problem has been identified by the mental health professional who
saw them. At the time of the intake the therapist reviews all the available
information in the family from the case file and the referring clinicians. This
intake session lasts for 20 to 30.minbtes and is held with all the available
family members. The tasks of the intake session is to briefly understand the
families' perception of their problem, their motivation and need to undergo
family intervention and the therapist assessments of suitability for family therapy.
Once this is determined, the nature and modality of the therapy is explained
to the family and an informal contract is made about modalities and roles of
therapist and the family members.
• The Family Assessment
The assessment of different aspects of family functioning and interactions takes
about 3 to 4 sessions with the whole family, each session lasting approximately
1 to 1 Y2 hours. Different therapists take assessments in different ways depending
on their style. Hence, given below are a few tasks which the therapist needs
to perform. Usually, it is recommended that the naive therapist starts with a
3 generation genogram and then follows up with the different life cycle stages
and family functions. Let us discuss some of methods of family assessment
which are given below:
i) Genogram: The three generation genogram is constructed
diagrammatically listing out the index patient's generation and two
more related generations, for example parents and grandparents in
an adolescent client, or parents and children in a middle aged client.
The ages and composition of the members are recorded and the
transgenerational family patterns and interactions are looked at to
understand the family from a longitudinal and epigenetic perspective.
ii) Family life cycle: The life cycle of the index family is explored
next. The functions of the family and specific roles of different
members are delineated in each of the stages of the family life cycle
(Duval, 1967). The index family is seen from a developmental
perspective and the therapist gets a longitudinal and temporal
perspective of the family. Care is taken to see how the family has
coped with problems and the process of transition from one stage
to another.
iii) Problem solving: Many therapists look at this aspect of the family
to see how cohesive or adaptable the family has been. Usually, the
family members are asked to describe some stress that the family
has faced, that is some life events, environmental stressors or illness
in a family member. The therapist then proceeds to get a description
of how the family coped with this problem. Here "circular questions"
are employed and therapist focuses on antecedent events, the crisis
and the consequent events to look for patterns that emerge. The
family function (or dysfunction) is heightened when there is crisis
situation and the therapist looks at patterns rather than the content
described. Thus, the therapist gets an "as if I was there" view of the
family. The same enquiry is possible using the technique of enactment
(Umbarger, 1983).
iv) The structural map: Once the enquiry is over, the therapist draws
the structural map, which is a diagrammatic representation of the
family system, showing the different subsystems, its boundaries, power
structure and relationships between people. Diagrammatic notions used
in structural therapy or Bowenian therapy are used to denote
relationships (normal, conflictual, or distant) and subsystem boundaries,
in different triadic relationships. This can also be done on a timeline
to show changes in relationships in different life cycle stages and
influences from different life events.
• Family Formulation and Treatment Plan
A systemic family hypothesis is now postulated by looking at the function of
symptoms for both the client and her or his family. It is known as circular
hypothesis Answers to the following two questions provide the circular
hypothesis:
1) What the client is trying to convey through her or his symptoms?; and
2) What is the role of the family in maintaining these symptoms?
This circular hypothesis can be confirmed on further enquiry with the family
to see how the "dysfunctional equilibrium" is maintained. The family formulation
is discussed by all the therapists and supervisors ("the reflecting team") in a
An Integrated Aproach to
Family Therapy
107
Schools of Family Therapy
108
session lasting about one hour. This leads to a comprehensive systemic
formulation involving three generations. This formulation will determine which
family members we need to see in a therapy, what interventional techniques
we should use and what changes in relationships we should effect. The therapist
and their team will also discuss the minimum, most effective treatment plan
which emerges considering the most feasible changes the family can make.
• Formal Contract for Therapy
A brief understanding of the family homeostasis is presented to the family.
Sometimes the full hypothesis may be given to the family in a non-critical and
positive way ("Positive connotation") appreciating the way in which the system
is functioning. The therapist presents the treatment plan to the family and
negotiates with the-members the plan and action they would like to take up
at the present time. The time frame and modality of therapy is contracted with
the family and the therapy is put into force. The frequency and intensity of
sessions is determined by. the degree of distress felt by the family and the
. geographical distance from the centre, that is, families may be seen as inpatients
at the centre if they are in crisis or if they live far away.
13.2.2 Middle Phase of Family Therapy
This phase of therapy is the major work that is carried out with the family.
Depending on the school of therapy that is used, these sessions may number
from a few (strategic) to many sessions lasting many months (psychodynamic).
This depends on the understanding of the family during the assessment as
much as the family therapist fit. For example, the degree of psychological
sophistication of the clients will determine the use of psychodynamic and
behavioural techniques. Similarly a therapist who is comfortable with structural
or strategic methods would put these therapies to maximum use. The nature
of the disorder and the degree of pathology may also determine the choice
of therapy, that is, behavioural techniques may be used more in chronic
psychotic conditions while the more difficult or resistant families may get brief
strategic therapies. We will now describe some of the important techniques
used with different kinds of problems. These are as follows:
• Psychodynamic therapy : This school was one of the first to be
described by people like Ackerman and Bowen. Recently, this method
has been made more contextual' and briefer by therapists like Nagy (1984)
and Framo (1985). Essentially the therapist understands the dynamics
employed by different members of the family and the inter-relationships of
these members. These family ego defenses are interpreted to the members
and the goal of therapy is to effect emotional insight and working through
of new defense patterns. Family transferences may become evident and
may need interpretation. Therapy usually lasts from 15-30 sessions and
this method may be employed in persons who are psychologically 1
sophisticated, and able to understand dynamics and interpretations.
Sustained and high motivation is necessary for such a therapy. This method
is found useful in couples with marital discord from upper middle class
backgrounds. Time required is a major constraint.
• Behavioural methods : Behavioural techniques are used in many types
of therapies and conditions. It has been extensively used in chronic
psychotic illnesses by workers like, Falloon et al., (1986) and Anderson
et al., (1986). Psychoeducation and skills training in communication and
problem solving are found very useful with families which don't have very
serious dysfunction. Techniques like modeling or role plays are useful in
improving communication styles and to teach parenting skills with disturbed
children. Obviously, motivation for therapy is a major requisite and hence
techniques like contracting, homework assignments are used in couples
with marital discord. Behavioural techniques used in sexual dysfunction
are also possible when adapted for out clients.
• Structural family therapy : Structural family therapy was described by
Minuchin (1974); Fishman et al., (1988) and Umbarger (1983). Indian
families are available with their manifold subsystems of parents, children,
grand parents and structure is easily discerned and changed. Additionally
in recent years a majority of our clients present with conduct and
personality disorders in adolescence and early adulthood. So techniques
like unbalancing, boundary making are quite useful as the common problems
involve adolescents who are wielding power with poor marital adjustments
between parents. These techniques are useful for a large number of our
clients.
• Strategic technique : It is found that these brief techniques can be very
powerfully used with families which are difficult and highly resistant to
change. A family therapist usually employs them when other methods
have failed and the therapist needs to take a U-turn in therapy. Techniques
employed by the Milan school (Palazzoli, 1980 and Tomm, 1984);
reframing, positive connotation, paradoxical (symptom) prescription have
been used effectively. Other techniques like prescription in brief methods
advocated by Erickson (1971) and Watzlawick et al., (1974) have also
been useful. Familiarity and competence with these techniques is a must
and therapy is usually brief and quickly terminated with prescriptions.
13.3.3 Termination Phase of Family Therapy
This last phase of therapy is finished in a couple of sessions. The initial goals
of therapy are reviewed with the family. The family and the therapist review
together the goals which were achieved and the therapist reminds the family
the new patterns or changes which have emerged. The need to continue these
new patterns is emphasised. At the same time, the family is cautioned that
these new patterns will occur when all members make a concerted effort to
see this happen. Family members are reminded that it is easy to fall back to
the old patterns of functioning which had produced the unstable equilibrium
necessitating consultation.
At termination, the therapist usually negotiates new goals, new tasks or new
interactions with the family that they will carry out for the next few months
in the follow up period. The family is told that they need to review these new
patterns after a couple of months so as to determine how things have gone
and how conflicts have been addressed by the family, This way the family has
a better chance of sustaining the change created. Sometimes booster sessions
are also advised after six to twelve months especially for outstation families
who cannot come regularly for follow-ups. These booster sessions will review
the progress and negotiate further changes with the family over a couple of
. sessions. This follow up period, after therapy is terminated is crucial for
working through process and ensures that the client-therapist bond is not
An Integrated Aproach to
Family Therapy
109
Schools of Family Therapy
110
severed too quickly. It is easy to deal with the clients' and therapist's anxieties
if this transition phase is smooth.
13.3.4 Special Sociocultural Issues in Family Therapy
Most Indian families are functionally joint families though they may have a
nuclear family structure. Also unlike the Western world more than two
generations do readily come for therapy. So it becomes necessary to deal
with two to three generations in therapy and also with transgenerational issues.
Indian families also foster dependency and interdependency rather than
autonomy. This issue must also be kept in mind when dealing with parentchild issues. Indians have a varied cultural and religious diversity depending on
the region from which the family comes. The therapist has to be familiar with
the regional customs, practices, beliefs and rituals. The Indian family therapist
has to also be wary of being too directive in therapy as families may give the
mantle of omnipotence to the therapist and it may be more difficult for us to
adopt a one-down or non-directive approach. Hence, while systemic family
therapy is eminently possible in India, one has to keep in mind these
sociocultural factors so as to get a good "family-therapist fit".
13.3.5 Constraint Factors in Family Therapy
The economic backwardness of the majority of the families makes therapy
feasible and affordable, in terms of time and money spent, only to the middle
and upper classes of out society. The poorer families usually drop out of
therapy as they have other more pressing priorities. The lack of tertiary social
support and welfare or social security makes it less possible to network with
other systems. We are also woefully inadequate in terms of trained family
therapists to cater to our large population. In our country distances seem
rather daunting and modes of transport and communication are poor for families
to readily seek out a therapist. We work with these constraint factors and so
the "family-therapy" fit is an important factor for families that are seeking and
staying in family therapy.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. State 'True' or 'False' :
i) Patients and their families are referred by doctors only. _
ii) The three generation genogram is constructed diagrammatically listing
out the therapist's information. _
iii) Hypothesis that is based on the function of symptoms of the clients
and their family is known as circular hypothesis. _
13.4 LET US SUM UP
Family interventions and therapy have been carried out in India for the last
five decades. Over the last few years a clear model has evolved for service
and for training. The model uses a predominantly systemic framework for
understanding families and the techniques for therapy are drawn from different
schools namely the structural, strategic, behavioural psychodynamic therapies.
The therapist integrates different. therapy techniques so as to get a therapy,
client/family and therapist fit. The socioeconomic status of the family place of
residence(rural or urban) and the psychological sophistication of the family
would determine the eclectic mixture of different therapy techniques.
13.5 GLOSSARY
Circular hypothesis Hypothesis based the function of symptoms of
both the client and her or his family.
All the therapists and supervisors participating in
family therapy.
Reflecting team
Termination phase Last phase of family therapy.
13.6 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. i) Vidyasagar
ii) Amritsar Mental Hospital
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. i) False
ii) False
iii) True
13.7 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. What do you understand by the integrated approach to family therapy?
•
Illustrate with the help of an example.
2. What are the phases of family therapy? Explain them with special referrence
to Indian families.
13.8 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Ackerman, N.W. (1966). Treating the troubled family. New York: Basic
Books.
Anderson, C.M., Reiss, DJ., & Hogarty, G.E. (1986). Schizophrenia in the
family? A practitioners guide to psychoeducation and management. New
york : Guilford Press.
Bell, J.E. (1971). The family hospital. Washington DC: The Superintendent
Of Documents. U.S. Govt Printing Office.
Bhatti, R.S & Channabasavanna, S.M. (1980). Social system approach to
understand marital disharmony. Indian Journal of Social Work. 40: 70-80.
An Integrated Aproach to
Family Therapy
111
Schools of Family Therapy
112
Bhatti, RS., Janakiramaiah, N. & Channabasavanna, S.M.(1980). Family
psychiatric ward treatment in India. Family Process. 19: 193-200.
Bhatti, R.S., Channabasavanna, S.M., Prabhu. L., Suba Krishna & Rao, S.
(1985). A manual on family typology scale. Bangalrore: Eastren Press.
Bhatti, R.S., Subha Krishna, D.K. & Ageira, B.L. (1986). Validation of family
interaction patterns scale. Indian Journal Of Psychiatry. 28: 211-216.
Boszormenyi - Nagy, I. (1984). Contextual Therapy: Therapeutic leverages in
mobilizing Trust. In: Green, RJ. & Framo, J.L. (Eds.), Family Therapy:
major contributions. New York: International University Press, Inc.
Bowen, M. (1971). The use of family theory in clinical practice. In : Haley,
1. (Ed.), Changing families. New York: Grune & Stratton.
Cherian, A. (2002). Family involvement in Therapy with Children and
Adolescents. In Bhatti, RS. Varghese, M..& Raguram, A. (Eds.), Changing
Family systems-challenges for the Future. Proceedings of the National
Symposium on Family Therapy-1994, Bangalore, NIMHANS Publications.
Duvall, E. (1967). Family Development. Philadelphia: Lippincott.
Erikson, M. (1971). Indirect hypnotherapy of a bedwetting couple. In Haley,
J. (Ed.), Changing Families. New York: Grune & Stratton.
Fishman, H.C. (1988). Treating troubled adolescents - A family therapy
approach. London : Hutchinson .
•
Framo, J.L. (1985). Family of origin as a therapeutic resource for adults in
marital and family therapy. Year care seminar- family therapy, Cambridge.
151-159.
Fallon, I.R.H., Boyd, J.L. & Mc Gill, C.W. (1984). Family care of
schizophrenia. New York: Gillford Press.
Geeta, P.R, Channabasavanna, S.M. & Bhatti, RS. (1980). The study of
efficacy of family ward treatment in hysteria in comparison with the open
ward and out patient treatment. Indian Journal of Psychiatry. 322:317-323.
Minuchin, S. (1974). Families and family therapy. London: Tavistock
Publications.
Narayana, H.S. (1977). Experience with group and family therapy in India.
International Journal for group psychotherapy. 517 - 519.
Palazzoli, S. M., Boscolo, L., & Cecehin, G (1980). Hypothesizing- Circularity
Neutrality: three guidelines for the conductor of the session. Family Process.
19: 3-12.
Tomm, K. (1984). One prespective on the Milan systemic approach: Part 11.
Description of session format. Interviewing styple and interventions. Journal
of Marital and Family. Therapy. 10: 253-27l.
Umbarger, C. (1983). Structural family therapy. New York : Grune &
Stratton.
Varghese, M,. R.S. Bhatti., Raguram, A Chandra, P.S., Udaya Kumar GS. &
Shah A. (2001). Training in family therapy at NIMHANS. In Kapur, M.,
Shamasunder, C. & Bhatti, R.S. Psychotherapy training m India. (Eds)
NIMHANS publication 36: 112 - 115.
Verghese, A. (1971). Involvement of families in mental health care. Journal of
Christian Medical Association of India. 46. 247.
Verghese A. (2002). Family and Mental Health. In Bhatti, R.S., Varghese M.
Raguram, A. (Eds.), Changing Family Systems-Challenges for the Future.
Proceedings of the National Symposium on Family Therapy-1994. Bangalore:
NIMHANS Publications.
Vidyasagar (1971). Innovations in psychiatric treatment at Amritsar Mental
Hospital. Report on a seminar on the organization and future needs of mental
health services. New Delhi: WHO; SEAl Ment. 19.
Watzlawick, P., Weakland, J., & Fisch, R. (1974). Change: Principles of
problems formation and problem resolution. New York: W.W. Norten.
An Integrated Aproach to
Family Therapy
113
I,:
MCFT-003
COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY: BASIC CONCEPTS
AND THEORETICAL PERSPECTIVES
, BLOCKl INTRODUCTION TO COUNSELLINGAND FAMILY THERAPY
Unit I
Unit 2
Unit 3
Unit 4
Counselling: Meaning, Scope and Applications
Family Therapy: Meaning, Scope and Applications
Career Counselling
Family Theories in Practice
BLOCK 2 SCHOOLS OF COUNSELLING
Unit 5
Unit6
Unit 7
Unit 8
Psychodynamic Approaches
Cognitive-Behavioural Approaches
Person-Centred Approaches
Group Counselling and other Counselling Approaches
BLOCK 3 SCHOOLS OF FAMILYTHERAPY
Ullit9
Unit 10
Systemic h:unily Th{;ntp>
Solution Focused and Strategic Family Therapy
Structural Family Therapy
Cognitive Behavioural FamilyTherapy
An lnregrated Approach tfl Fami Iy Therapy
~'nit 1 j
Unill2
Uni1 iJ
BLOCK 4 MODALITIES OF COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY
Unit 14
Unit 15
Unit 16
Unit 17
Unit 18
Family Interviewing
Crisis Intervention
Supportive Counselling
Psychoeducation
Social Skills Therapy
MANUAL FOR SUPERVISED PRACTICUM (MCFTL-003)
I
I
, I
I
!
I
I
I
I
MPDD-IGNOU/P.O.2T/March.2011
ISBN - 978-81-266-5214-3
/
